The Bank England forecast shortage 250 mln stg money market today. Among factor affect liquidity bill mature official hand treasury bill take-up drain 1.02 billion stg below target bankers' balance far 140 mln. Against fall note circulation add 345 mln stg net effect exchequer transaction inflow 545 mln stg Bank added. REUTER 

The Bank France invite offer category paper money market intervention tender. Money market dealer condition Bank cut intervention rate tender quarter percentage 7-3/4 pct eight reflect ease call money rate week French franc's steadiness foreign exchange market February 22 currency stabilisation accord Group Five Canada. Intervention rate raise eight pct 7-1/4 January 2. Call money quote 7-11/16 7-3/4 pct. REUTER 

The U.S. Amoco Petroleum Corp> report offshore oil Pearl River basin concession South China Sea New China News Agency said. It Liu Hua 11-1-1 A produce 2240 barrel depth 305 metres. The news agency Amoco plan drill give far details. REUTER 

Technology transfer problem delayed finalise contract South Korea's state-owned Korea Electric Power Corp (Kepco) U.S. Firms supply equipment service Kepco's late 950-megawatt nuclear plant Kepco spokesman said. He told Reuters contract Kepco's tenth eleventh station cost billion dlrs due completion February. Kepco negotiate Combustion Engineering Inc (CSP) pressurise light-water reactor General Electric Co (GE) turbines. KEPCO negotiate (Sargent Lundy Engineers) engineering design consultancy services. "We wag tug-of-war transfer advanced technology. But I be optimistic sign contract month" spokesman said. He transfer advanced technology vital South Korea want build future nuclear plant technology. Work plant due start June 1988 completion 1995 1996 site yet chosen said. REUTER 

Keiaisha Co Ltd Tokyo issue 12 mln Swiss franc straight note due March 26 1992 4-5/8 pct coupon lead manager Gotthard Bank said. The note call September 26 1989 101-1/4 decline semi-annually. The issue guaranteed Kyowa Bank Ltd. REUTER 

National Westminster Bank Plc cut base lending rate 0.5 percentage point 10.5 pct today. National Westminster respond ease money market rates. Its move follow signal Bank England earlier afternoon endorse half cut base rate surprise move follow strong signal week move premature. However pound continued gain strongly. REUTER 

Semi-annual dividend 4 ct Pay May 29 Record April 14 Note: full name U.S. Facilities Corp. This dividend declare company complete initial offering November 7. Reuter 

Standard Pacific LP acquire substantially asset liability South Bay Savings Loan Association Newport Beach. The firm weekend conduct saving loan activity Standard Pacific Savings FA Federal stock association. On Friday Federal Home Loan Bank Board Washington approve acquisition South Bay S L 62.5 mln dlr state-chartered stock association Standard Pacific 312.8 mln dlrs assets. The Bank Board Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp cash contribution provide capital loss coverage indemnify Standard Pacific undisclosed liabilities. Reuter 

The Treasury Department temporarily permit import South African uranium ore oxide pending clarification anti-apartheid sanction law pass Congress fall. The decision announce late Friday. It applies July 1 uranium ore oxide import U.S. processing re-export third countries. The Treasury action Congress pass comprehensive South African sanction bill fall President Reagan's veto intend hurt U.S. industry. In addition Treasury permit U.S.-made good import temporarily South African state-controlled organization repair servicing. Reuter 

The special prosecutor Iran arm scandal expect bring indictment include felony charge senior Reagan administration official New York Times reported. It quote law enforcement official knowledge investigation say special prosecutor Lawrence Walsh investigate scandal focus areas. The paper identify conspiracy defraud government obstruct justice make false statement government. It prosecutor rule suspect include current former government officials. MORE 

An exist New York Stock Exchange NYSE rule limit trading activity London stock list exchange source London Exchange said. This arise London Stock Exchange go ahead plan close trading floor. The London Exchange source comment press report NYSE bar firm trading London Exchange interlisted stock period NYSE open. The London exchange seek clarification. London Exchange source possibility restriction NYSE appear reflect rule require exchange recognise NYSE posse trading floor. Last month London Exchange statement plan close floor due course apart floor trade option screen telephone brokerage offices. This development stem Big Bang restructuring market October 27. The demise traditional Stock Exchange floor widely expect date yet. Market source compromise NYSE rule reach partly interest U.S. Securities dealer identical. Some start lobbying NYSE point expansion global trading need base reciprocal arrangements. NYSE brokerage firm trade London Exchange presumably disadvantage non-NYSE U.S. Firms affiliate London Exchange market source said. REUTER 

USAir Group Inc Piedmont Aviation Inc agree acquire 69 dlrs share. The company newspaper advertisement start tender offer Piedmont share price Piedmont board director absent unanimously approve bid. The offer withdrawal right expire April Three unless extend bid follow merger price. USAir Piedmont grant irrevocable option buy 3491030 share circumstances. Piedmont 18.6 mln share outstanding. USAir tender condition receipt share USAir 50.1 pct Piedmont fully dilute basis approval U.S. Department Transportation voting trust agreement permit USAir buy hold share pending review application gain control Piedmont. The company merger agreement Piedmont provide offer amend Piedmont's prior write consent adverse Piedmont shareholder cut share bought Piedmont's consent. USAir reduce Piedmont share purchase offer minimum need cause voting trust condition bid satisfied. In minimum share tender buy share pro rata basis. In February USAir offer pay 71 dlrs share cash 50 pct Piedmont's stock 1.55 1.90 USAir share remain Piedmont share. Last week Carl C. Icahn-controlled Trans World Airlines Inc TWA> conditional offer acquire USAir 52 dlrs share bid reject USAir board. The Transportation Department Friday reject TWA's application acquire USAir ground application fail comply department regulation omit necessary information. TWA refile provide information needed. On Friday TWA already acquire mln share 15 pct USAir. Reuter 

Senior U.S. Arms control official optimistic United States Soviet Union reach agreement way verify pact eliminate medium-range nuclear missile Europe. Chief U.S. Arms control negotiator Max Kampelman NBC television network fair pact hard negotiate "We determine it." Assistant Secretary Defence international security policy Richard Perle side agree method ensure honour missile pact. President Reagan Friday Secretary State George Shultz Moscow month talk arm control U.S.-Soviet summit meeting. The decision send Shultz Moscow follow announcement Soviet leader Mikhael Gorbachev willing separate elimination medium-range missile Europe demand curb U.S. Development Strategic Defence Initiative (SDI) anti-missile system. Kampelman United States Soviet Union definition so-called "intrusive" on-site inspection pact detail tough out. Reuter 

Estimated oil gas drilling completion United States drop 41 cent 1986 1985 American Petroleum Institute said. API industry 42387 well complete total 19741 oil well 8645 natural gas well 14001 dry holes. In 1985 total 71539 well drill - 36834 oil well 13036 gas well 21669 dry holes. reuter 

New credit advanced finance house retailer bank credit card specialist provider credit slip 2.66 billion stg January 2.78 billion December - remain close average level 1986's fourth quarter Department Trade Industry said. Of January total 1.15 billion stg advanced bank credit cards. On three-month basis total advance November January 3.0 pct low previous months. Within total lending consumer fell 6.0 pct lending business decline 5.0 pct. At end-January 1987 total amount outstanding 24.07 billion stg December's 23.77 billion stg 3.0 pct above total month earlier department said. January rise 300 mln stg amount outstanding finance house specialist credit grantor retailers. The department advance credit card rise 1.0 pct late three-month periods. Retailers advanced 3.0 pct late month previous month said. REUTER 

A strike Brazil's 40000 seafarer pay rise 180 pct cost state-owned oil company Petrobras 20 mln dlrs lose export order company's commercial director Arthur de Carvalho quote say press reports. More 170 ship Brazil nine foreign port halt strike February 27. Marines blockading ship Friday strike rule illegal striker run short food National Merchants Marine Union president Edson Areias said. Reuter 

NEC Corp's NEC Informational Systems Inc introduce advanced personal computer fully compatible International Business Machines Corp IBM> PC AT. The computer PowerMate 1 PowerMate 2 BusinessMate base chip Intel Corp INTC>. The PowerMate 1 2 available immediately sell 1995 dlrs 2595 dlrs respectively company said. The BusinessMate schedule April availability sell 6000 dlrs said. Reuter 

The 24 nation Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) hamper sluggish industrial output trade slow economic growth joint balance payment swing deficit 1987 Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said. The EIU World Trade Forecast revise OECD economic growth downwards 2.5 pct compare 2.8 pct growth forecast December. It area weakness West Germany small European country influence Japan hardest hit currency appreciation year. The independent research organisation cut 1987 growth rate forecast West Germany 2.2 pct 3.2 pct December 2.3 pct pct Japan. It expect OECD post current account deficit 13 billion dlrs 1987 1988 due 1.50 dlrs barrel rise 1987 oil prices. It U.S. Current account deficit look likely fall slowly forecast 125 billion dlrs 1987 115 billion 1988 130 billion 1986. It expect West Germany post 31 billion dlr payment surplus Japan 76 billion dlr surplus year. The EIU oil price drop 16.50 dlrs barrel end-1987 15.50 dlrs 1988 18 dlrs adherence OPEC output policy becomes increasingly ragged. It dollar poise resume decline foreign exchange market lose far 13 pct trade-weighted index five pct 1988 year's 18.4 pct drop. The average mark/dollar rate 1.80 mark 1.70 1988 yen/dollar rate expect break 150 yen barrier average value 150 yen 1987 146 yen 1988 said. "This crash scenario dollar's steeper angle descent increase risk end fireball three-point landing" EIU said. "Talking stop dollar's slide February meeting (of finance minister Group Five Canada) produce scant promise either decisive shift expansive policy West Germany Japan tighter U.S. Fsical policy" said. It key dollar's fortune willingness Japanese institution buy U.S. Government asset despite prospect sustain currency loss. "Thus willing" EIC add Japan deter buying U.S. bond dollar collapse. To contain currency crisis dollar rate soar bring recession Third World debt crisis said. On trade EIU prospect 1987 look "increasingly sick." Import growth forecast December 4.5 pct see slow 3.8 pct 1987 recovery 4.2 pct 1988 said. The weakness West German economy big single factor import growth expect feature sluggish 3.5 pct growth 1987 6.5 pct forecast December EIU said. On export weak demand West Germany affect export prospect elsewhere Europe Japan's export 1987 remain flat sale U.S. Exporters respond marginally low competitively-priced dollar. It Europe Japan raw material oil cost domestic currency 1987 1986. Reuter 

Bundesbank president Karl Otto Poehl told close investment symposium West Germany cut lead rate United States make similar move banking source said. The source reporting Poehl's remark symposium Duesseldorf week organise Deutsche Bank Ag. Press representative invited. The source speak separately Poehl told 200 banker reply question cut U.S. Interest rate match measure Germany. "It definite hint low German rates" banker attend symposium. A Bundesbank spokesman central bank comment report remark private meeting. But accord source decline identify Poehl's comment see banker direct pointer far move central bank defend German industry additional revaluation mark. "He Americans drop rate Bundesbank drop them. He quite clearly" source said. In reply question Poehl half-point cut discount Lombard rate January 22 U.S. Had signal prepared attend meeting discus level dollar condition Germany move advance source said. Asked American authority persuade cut German rate bargaining table September source quote Poehl say "No wouldn't been. We checked that." The Paris meeting Group Six industrial nation exactly month German cut rates. Poehl emphasise comment close talk central bank G-6 meeting say financial market fully realise significance Paris session U.S. Agreement stem far fall value dollar source said. For participant summit agree far fall dollar harmful economy include U.S. Poehl said. The source tone Poehl's comment boost grow sentiment dollar stabilise current level international central bank cooperation. One source Poehl's remark underlined Bundesbank prepared accommodative monetary policy prevent far slowdown West Germany's economic growth. Poehl Bundesbank official past stress German central bank direct responsibility growth solely concerned combat inflation. This lead instance introduction tighter monetary stance begin December half-point cut rate late January. The source quote Poehl say current overshoot German monetary target directly respark inflation. The Bundesbank oblige react immediately whenever overshoot occurs. Latest data central bank money stock Bundesbank's main measure money supply show measure grow 7-1/2 pct January outside six pct 1987 target. Share price rise active trading dealer reporting Poehl's remark couple bullish outlook stock price Deutsche symposium brought strong bargain hunt current low levels. REUTER 

Plessey Co Plc PLY.L> won multi-million stg contract supply Colombia System X digital telephone exchange major export contract system. Company source deal worth 15 mln stg. v A Plessey statement contract award National Telecommunications Authority Colombia won competition Telefon L M Ericsson AB NEC Corp Fujitsu Ltd Italtel Italy. "The award regard triumph System X breakthrough South American market" said. Plessey contract large award Telecom Colombia past 10 involve supply 13 telephone exchange include 68000 lines. The award include transmission equipment interconnection exchange exist system. The firm actively marketing System X worldwide contract negotiation country reach advanced stage said. Plessey share 5p 235p have go ex-dividend. REUTER 

The 20.3 billion dlr debt reschedule accord Venezuela sign week ago reduce payment 64 pct accord Finance Ministry figure release weekend. A ministry statistical analysis original accord call payment 3.82 billion dlrs 1987 1989 agreement require debt service 1.35 billion period. In 1987 Venezuela require pay 250 mln dlrs instead 1.55 billion originally agreed. Payments 1988 cut 400 mln 1.20 billion 1989 700 mln 1.11 billion. The ministry's analysis reduction debt service 1987-1989 amount effective grace period Venezuelan negotiator sought creditor bank granted. Most reschedule fall 1994-1998 53.3 pct 11.25 billion dlrs paid. Under February 27 accord Venezuela repay 20.3 billion dlrs sector debt 14 7/8 percentage London interbank offer rate (Libor). This compare February 1986 accord call 12-year term 1-1/8 Libor. REUTER 

MTS Acquisition Corp> company form Martin T. Sosnoff start tender offer share Caesars World Inc 28 dlrs each. In newspaper advertisement MTS offer withdrawal right expire April Three unless extended. Sosnoff New York investor already own mln Caesars' 30.3 mln share outstanding 13.3 pct Caesars' large shareholder. Caesars own casino hotel Nevada honeymoon resort Pennsylvania's Pocono Mountains. It control Caesars New Jersey Inc CJN> own Atlantic City N.J. casino hotel. For quarter end January 31 Caesars World earn 12.6 mln dlrs revenue 190.4 mln dlrs earnings 7500000 dlrs revenue 163.8 mln dlrs before. For fiscal 1986 company earn 41.0 mln dlrs revenue 694.4 mln dlrs. MTS offer condition receipt share Sosnoff majority fully dilute basis arrangement sufficient financing buy Caesars share already own pay related cost approval New Jersey Casino control Commission NEvada Gaming Commission State Gaming Control Board. MTS Marine Midland Banks Inc MM> commit lend 100 mln dlrs acquisition effort syndicate 400 mln dlrs senior financing transaction. It financial adviser PaineWebber Group Inc PWJ> state write subject market condition highly confident arrange commitment 475 mln dlrs "mezzanine" financing. MTS expect problem obtain New Jersey Nevada regulatory approval acquisition ownership Caesars stake already cleared. In June 1986 Sosnoff request seat Caesars World board request yet granted. In September 1986 Sosnoff chairman Atalanta/Sosnoff Capital Corp> file clearance U.S. antitrust law raise Caesars World 25 pct. Sosnoff letter Caesars World chairman chief executive officer Henry Gluck "The decision directly shareholder urge financial legal advisor repeatedly stress lack responsiveness management past." Sosnoff numerous effort express view management way maximize shareholder value Caesars twicce refuse request board seat. "My adviser I advance notice throw obstacle offer give serious consideration" said. Sosnoff hope Caesars World management willing negotiate acquisition agreement him. "As I indicate publicly past I believe operating management company perform appropriate consideration significant equity company follow acquisition" Sosnoff letter Gluck. MTS Sosnoff company fix March 27 record date determination shareholder entitle authorize action meeting -- include election removal directors. Reuter 

Dutch economic growth slow firm guilder cut competitiveness abroad industry reduce pace investment Dutch official planning agency CPB said. The Centraal Planbureau publishing 1987 economic outlook Dutch Net National Income (NNI) expect grow pct pct growth record 1986 2.5 pct 1985 1984. Dutch Gross National Product expect rise 432.20 billion guilder 1987 constant price pct increase year's 423.95 billion. The CPB forecasting 8.5 pct increase value guilder trade-weighted basis compare 10.0 pct dollar expect trade average 2.0 guilder 1987 compare 2.45 guilder 1986. "The high guilder cause substantial fall unit labour cost abroad measure guilder term rise slightly Netherlands" CPB said. More economic growth depend domestic consumption CPB note high margin domestic producer importer mitigate effect purchasing low import cost deflation. Consumer price fall 1.5 pct CPB said. Inflation zero year. Gross investment industry expect grow five pct slowdown compare 11.5 pct growth CPB said. Exchange rate oil price fluctuation continue condition Dutch economy future recent CPB note continued depress impact factor Dutch competitiveness. In addition note slight rise taxation security cost employers. The CPB forecasting rise budget deficit 7.2 pct Net National Income 1987 6.3 pct urge government cut expenditure far bring deficit reduce tax security payment future. Dutch government revenue depressed far fall income natural gas sale 1987 CPB said. It unemployment expect fall 675000 710000 year. While pct GDP growth forecast CPB late forecast issue month 1.5 pct growth figure above recent market estimates. Dutch merchant bank Pierson Heldring en Pierson February economic outlook GDP growth constant price expect 1.1 pct market analyst expect CPB's final forecast below late estimate. "It comment I haven't see document yet seem pessimistic estimates" Pierson economist said. The CPB forecast 2.5 pct export growth volume term 1987 pct growth year. Excluding energy export 1987 figure pct said. Imports rise 4.5 pct compare pct 1986 volume term CPB said. The balance payment sharp decline surplus six billion guilder 1987 compare 12.1 billion CPB forecast. REUTER 

Casino owner real estate developer Donald Trump offer acquire Class B common share Resorts International Inc spokesman Trump said. The estate late Resorts chairman James M. Crosby own 340783 752297 Class B shares. Resorts 6432000 Class A common share outstanding. Each Class B share 100 time voting Class A share give Class B stock 93 pct Resorts' voting power. More 

Iomega Corp laid quarter professional management staff nearly half direct labor force restructuring downsize business. The company receive qualify opinion auditor 1986 financial statement subject outcome suits. The company defendant consolidated class action law suit seek damage unspecified amount defendant related shareholder action. Iomega auditor opinion letter action stage discovery likely outcome determine time. The company corporate wide reduction professional management indirect labor result permanent elimination 183 position functional area company's business. This represent 25 pct professional management indirect employee added. In addition Iomega announce layoff 182 employee principally manufacturing direct labor force. Those affected represent 46 pct direct labor. Commenting layoff Iomega direct labor force affect personnel building Alpha Eight Inch Disk Drive Bernoulli Boxes. "This action require bring finish good inventory inventory distribution channel acceptable levels" explained. The company state layoff affect production 5-1/4 inch Beta 20 product currently built backlog orders. Reuter 

Ground-breaking system store retrieve information usher era computer company computer users. Within past week International Business Machines Corp IBM> Eastman Kodak Co EK> launch product radically increase amount data catalogue shelve computerize libraries. "This flurry technology yield system handle multimedia blitz data" Ian Warhaftig senior analyst International Data Corp Framingham Mass. "We're develop system customer ask them" Peter Giles vice president manager Kodak's mass memory division recent interview. This demand expect soar come years. While estimate vary industry analyst project provide product service gear information storage retrieval 20 billion dlr 1995. A wide range technology need meet vary requirement users. For example credit verification service quickly retrieve credit data relay clients. A law firm computerize law library capacity speed key feature. For architect engineer ability store photograph sketch graphic crucial. Regardless specific application trend convert information - document video film sound recording - digital language zero one understood computers. Saving space key goal digitize data storage. An optical disk size standard compact disk store 550 megabyte data 250000 page typewritten text. For reason compact disk read-only memory CD-ROM already popular data storage media. Last week Microsoft introduce Microsoft Bookshelf 300 dlr contains single CD-ROM disk dictionary thesaurus ZIP code directory Bartlett's Familiar Quotations World Almanac reference works. Scores product already market specialty item Lotus Development Corp's LOTS> CD-ROM data base stock information financial analyst investors. "Microsoft Bookshelf mark arrival CD-ROM package public" Ian Warhaftig International Data Corp. One drawback CD-ROM us laser record read data require special player. CD-ROM player retail market appear year. Moreover IDC's Warhaftig CD-ROM's integrate personal computers. "Eventually CD-ROM's fit inside PC box" said. "Imagine advantage have spell checker thesaurus fingertip you're write word processing program." But CD-ROM's beginning. Also week Kodak unveiled system 12-inch optical disks. The large Kodak us jukebox-like cabinet hold 150 optical disk data retrieve matter seconds. Kodak announce 14-inch optical disk 6.8 gigabyte memory five time memory CD-ROM. The Kodak disk available middle 1988 design user quick access amount data Kodak's Giles. Meanwhile N.V. Philips PGLO.AS> Dutch electronics giant prepare optical disk technology step far disk combine text video sound. Philips call Called CD-Interactive ready year. It include CD-ROM player hook television stereo. Additional breakthrough expect generation computer memory chip introduced. Last month IBM four-megabyte chip capable store data eight CD-ROM's. Meantime Nippon Telegraph Telephone> Japan built 16-megabyte chip. Analysts commercial version chip suspect IBM start volume production four-megabyte chip sometime year. Such chip enable computer maker build computer immense memory capacities. Reuter 

Hundreds marine alert 11 key Brazilian port 40000 seaman decide remain indefinite strike Higher Labour Court Saturday rule illegal union leader said. The halt strike seaman 25 start February 27 union leader return unless 275 pct pay rise. Shipowners offer 100 cent raise seaman rejected. "We lose. If lay worker fine determine carry protest end" union leader said. He decide meeting marine ship seaman abandon vessel marine handle situation themselves. A spokesman Rio de Janeiro Port send marine port Navy Minister Henrique Saboya ground port area security. But incidents. The strike cut export import estimate 160 ship idle. Petrol station owner continued shutdown fear combination stoppage lead serious fuel shortage. Reuter 

The American Bankers Association profitability nation's commercial bank decline 12 pct quarter 1986. During nine month industry's annualized rate return asset drop 0.68 pct 0.77 pct period 1985 ABA said. Return equity fell 10.8 pct 12.3 pct previous year. Despite decline profit ABA banks' capital grow boost industry's capital ratio 6.4 pct 6.3 pct. The size bank lose money period increase significantly ABA said. During nine month 1986 17.5 pct bank hold 9.6 pct banking asset unprofitable said. That compare 13 pct bank hold 8.8 pct asset period 1985 said. The industry's provision loan loss increase 0.73 pct asset period 0.59 pct asset period 1985 said. Reuter 

The American Paper Institute industry head record volume 1987 linerboard particularly strong. "A pro-growth trade policy continued attention currency management fairly low rate climate major tax increase essential ingredient outlook" Red Cavaney American Paper Institute president said. Cavaney industry's performance mimic year's strength. Last paper paperboard production hit record 71 mln ton 5.9 pct above 1985's 67 mln ton industry after-tax profit 1986 exceed 1985 profits. Cavaney inventory play major role year's performance. "Inventories generally low positive factor industry's outlook year" cite market pulp stock currently 21 day supply low industry's term average. Cavaney add result slimmer inventory 1986 shipment 1987 high demand slackens. Cavaney expect demand strong spur consumer spending. The benefit tax reform individual after-tax income consumer good companies' cash flow increase demand communication paper packaging year. In addition Cavaney low mortgage rate support level housing start 1987 increase demand kind package goods. Inventory building demand carton corrugate container added. Cavaney expect export remain fairly 1987 result recent decline dollar major currencies. But importantly improve balance trade 1987 low dollar induce increase industrial activity high packaging demand. Cavaney increase competitiveness cause low cost high productivity improve efficiency contribute strong show industry year. Cavaney Tax Reform Act 1986 negative impact industry year. "For manufacturer removal investment tax credit creates impediment future investment" said. Also API estimate industry lose billion dlrs cash flow five period result reforms. "Adjustments loss require careful evaluation adversely affect capital spending decision individual companies" Cavaney said. Reuter 

West Germany take "very seriously" recent undertaking major industrial country promote exchange rate stability current level Finance Ministry State Secretary Hans Tietmeyer said. Talking journalist meeting European Community Economy Finance Ministers Tietmeyer decline whether February 22 Paris accord Group Five country plus Canada include secret agreement stabilise currencies. But note official communique participant agree cooperate closely foster stability exchange rate current levels. "We're take sentence seriously" said. Tietmeyer remark dollar hardly move mark meeting. He slowdown West German economic growth cause sharp exchange rate swing Paris agreement respect. Economics Ministry State Secretary Otto Schlecht Bonn government current measure bolster economy pay close attention slow growth rule "appropriate timely" action necessary. Schlecht Tietmeyer speak ahead discussion EC minister late EC Commission report economic situation 12-nation bloc. The Commission sharply revise expect German gross product growth pct 3.2 pct predict autumn say Bonn EC country stimulate economic activity. Schlecht upturn West Germany's economy slow fourth quarter quarter 1987. But cumulative downwards trend view quick remedial action necessary. He favourable indicator level investment climate consumption meant recovery expect export pick slightly course year. REUTER 

Al Bank Al Saudi Al Fransi> know Saudi-French double paid-up capital 400 mln riyal 200 mln convert reserve equity bank official said. Jeddah-based Saudi-French 40 pct own Banque Indosuez 60 pct Saudi sign technical service agreement Indosuez Riyadh Tuesday management bank five said. The official increase paid-up capital double share held shareholder add depth market extend trading investors. REUTER 

Compaq Computer Corp introduce 12 megahertz desktop personal computer call Compaq Deskpro 286R. More 

Uganda Africa's large coffee producer disappointed stalemate recent coffee talk London chairman state-run Coffee Marketing Board CMB said. "This coffee producer situation price drop 200 pound tonne robusta coffee" J. Makumbi return London Friday. Producers consumer fail agree quota formula share world's coffee production International Coffee Organisation ICO talk end week. Makumbi blame failure quota suspend Feburary Indonesian demand quota increase dramatically. Uganda -- earns 400 mln dlrs annually coffee export 95 pct foreign exchange earnings -- sought raise ICO quota 3.0 mln 2.45 mln 60-kilo bag accord source close CMB. The CMB estimate production rise 20 25 pct current 1986/87 October-September season mln bags. For Uganda unable meet ICO export quota rebel activity disrupt coffee industry. The Ugandan government depends coffee export duty 60 pct sale tax revenue industry employ half salaried manpower. In Dar e Salaam Tanzania's Agriculture Livestock Development Minister Paul Bomani Third World country suffer failure London coffee talks. "It middleman benefit said. Bomani call ICO convene meeting month say "Once temper cool delegation report headquarters common prevail." Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation CCC authorize additional 8.0 mln dlrs credit guarantee sale vegetable protein meal Hungary fiscal 1987 U.S. Agriculture Department said. The additional guarantee increase vegetable protein meal credit line 16.0 mln dlrs increase cumulative fiscal 1987 agricultural product 23.0 mln dlrs 15.0 mln said. The department announce extension export period September 30 1987 December 31 sale vegetable protein meals. To eligible credit guarantee sale register export September 30. Reuter 

Applied Circuit Technology Inc (ACT) agree principal sell primary computer electronics Sanpao Group> San Francisco. ACT disclose deal's term add 50 pct sale price cash remainder paid period. The deal expect close March 31 ACT said. ACT move concentrate resource pharmaceutical subsidiaries. Reuter 

USAir Group Inc acquire 2292599 Piedmont Aviation Inc share 9.9 pct fully dilute basis Norfolk Southern Corp NSC>. The acquisition Piedmont USAir approve director companies. USAir advise Norfolk Southern company support propose merger intend tender remain 1477829 Piedmont common share response USAir's tender offer today. This total include share issuable conversion Piedmont prefer USAir noted. USAir Piedmont 23.1 mln common share fully dilute basis add offer condition tender 9309394 share represent 40.2 pct oustanding share dilute basis. USAir 3491030 share option buy represent 18.5 pct Piedmont's currently outstanding shares. Reuter 

THE FOLLOWING RAINFALL WAS RECORDED IN THE AREAS OVER PAST 72 HOURS PARANA STATE: UMUARAMA NIL PARANAVAI 1.5 MILLIMETRES LONDRINA NIL MARINGA NIL. SAO PAULO STATE: PRESIDENTE PRUDENTE O.6 MM VOTUPORANGA 12.0 MM FRANCA 28.0 MM CATANDUVA 10.0 MM SAO CARLOS NIL SAO SIMAO NIL. REUTER11:43/VB 

Nationwide Cellular Service Inc complete previously-announced acquisition privately-held Nova Cellular Co Chicago reseller mobile telephone service 1800 subscriber 65000 common shares. Nova Cellular accumulate deficit 650000 dlrs revenue 2600000 dlrs 1986 said. Reuter 

National Westminster Bank Plc cut base lending rate 0.5 percentage point 10.5 pct today. National Westminster respond ease money market rates. Its move follow signal Bank England earlier afternoon endorse half cut base rate surprise move follow strong signal week move premature. However pound continued gain strongly. Reuter 

The Bank England provide market far assistance afternoon buying bill worth 166 mln stg low rate introduce morning. It bought 45 mln stg local authority bill plus 27 mln stg bank bill band 10-3/8 pct together 94 mln stg band bank bill 10-5/16 pct. The bank revise estimate market shortage 300 mln stg 250 mln morning. It total assistance 213 mln stg today. REUTER 

The head Chicago Board Trade CBT Chicago Mercantile Exchange CME address meeting Commodity Futures Trading Commission's financial product advisory committee March 11 Chicago CFTC said. CBT Chairman Karsten Mahlmann objective view CBT's ad hoc committee exchange trading issue CFTC said. CME President William Brodsky discus current issue involve equity index market include factor affect price volatility change settlement procedure margin change price limits. The CFTC committee head Commissioner Robert Davis examines financial future market issues. Reuter 

Container port operator Hong Kong International Terminals Ltd> 89 pct held unit Hutchison Whampoa Ltd HWHH.HK> place 164 mln H.K. Dlr seven quayside container crane 800 ton Japan's Mitsui Engineering Shipbuilding Co Ltd MSET.T> May 1988 August 1989 delivery. Hong Kong International Terminals operates 32 cranes. REUTER 

Istanbul remain virtual standstill snow meter deep shipping move narrow Bosphorus waterway link Sea Marmara Black Sea official said. The authority order government office close Wednesday. Many bank business school stayed shut worker struggle keep main road supply line city 6.5 mln people. The blizzard hit Istanbul week stop yesterday afternoon international airport reopen two-day closure. It shut earlier week. Reuter 

The suspension Ecuador's crude oil shipment earthquake cut oil pipeline month senior Energy Ministry official said. The official Ecuador resume export repair 40 km section 510 km pipeline link jungle oil field Lago Agrio Balao Pacific coast. It 100 mln U.S. Dlrs repair pipeline official name told Reuters. Ecuador oil meet domestic demand 35 day import crude supplement stocks. The earthquake Thursday register six 12-point international Mercalli scale. The damage pipeline severe economic blow Ecuador oil account two-thirds total export 60 pct government revenues. Financially press Ecuador member Organisation Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) recently pump 260000 barrel (bpd) crude 50000 bpd above output quota assign cartel Energy Ministry spokesman said. Last export average 173500 bpd accord central bank. However Ecuador build emergency 25 km pipeline cost 15 20 mln dlrs hook Colombian pipeline official said. He estimate 60 day build. Ecuador squeeze slide oil price 1986 138 mln dlrs net international reserve January equal month's imports. It suspend payment January 5.4 billion dlrs owe 400 private foreign banks. The country's total foreign debt 8.16 billion dlrs eighth large Latin America. In Caracas President Jaime Lusinchi Venezuela loan five mln barrel crude Ecuador month loss damage pipeline. Ecuador loan guarantee domestic supply ship equivalent volume Venezuela repayment May Lusinchi said. A commission head Venezuelan Investment Fund Minister Hector Hurtado include representative interior defence ministry oil company Petroleos de Venezuela travel Ecuador Tuesday evaluate co-ordinate emergency relief said. REUTER 

Blizzards lash Greece pile 10 foot snow place paralyze transport radio call unprecedented weather condition year. Except handful flight airline Olympic Airways blizzard start air traffic Athens international airport cancel radio said. The weather service heavy snowfall continue hours. Cold weather hit southern eastern Italy. Heavy snowfall cause delay difficulty road rail air traffic. Reuter 

Malaysia success talk opening International Natural Rubber Agreement (INRA) depends flexible consumer country are. Rubber producer consumer country meet 12 day Geneva tomorrow try hammer rubber pact fail reach agreement November replace current accord expires October. Primary Industries Minister Lim Keng Yaik statement Malaysia want continue INRA prepared accept modification strengthen agreement. He INRA allow orderly disposal accumulate buffer stock 375000 tonne market capable absorb releases. Reuter 

Pharmacia AB launch 200 mln dlr Eurocommercial paper programme move internationalise company's financing. Market maker Credit Suisse First Boston Morgan Stanley International Svenska Handelsbanken PLC. Pharmacia treasurer Bertil Tiusanen gain direct access short term international capital market improve ability meet dollar borrowing requirement. He natural step internationally know company whose share note Tokyo Stockholm trade counter United States. REUTER 

McDowell Enterprises Inc sign definitive agreement acquire 80 pct privately held Interpharm Inc 19.9 pct McDowell. The company subject contigencies include future sale profit level McDowell four-year period acquire 100 pct Interpharm exchange 51 pct McDowell's voting stock. It transaction expect complete 60 day McDowell board restructure include Interpharm management. Reuter 

The Federal Home Mortgage Corp announce sale 400 mln dlrs residential mortgage First Union Corp's mortgage subsidiary. Freddie Mac First Union Mortgage Corp already swap 70 mln dlrs residential mortgage Freddie Mac phase contract. Freddie Mac buy sell 400 mln dlrs worth mortages make mortgage money available. It guarantor First Union allow convert investment-quality mortgage mortgage-backed security accepted capital markets. Freddie Mac explain security collateral borrowing sell investor employ variety cash management techniques. Reuter 

British Caledonian Airways file application British Civil Aviation Authority license operate San Diego's Lindbergh Field London's Gatwick Airport. It extend exist Los Angeles/London nonstop service San Diego initially offer roundtrips weekly. Reuter 

Regie Nationale de Usines Renault RENA.PA> Chrysler Corp C> sign letter intent Chrysler plan buy American Motors Corp AMO.N> 46 pct own Renault. Renault President Raymond Levy statement issue French car agreement stage Renault's redeployment. "It allow Renault continue export programme U.S. And open perspective cooperation major American constructor" statement said. Under term letter intent Chrysler purchase Renault's stake held form bond shares. The Renault statement quote Chrysler Chairman Lee Iacocca say "We welcome AMC shareholder Chrysler family." He add accord allow Renault Chrysler study development future product destine distribute Renault Chrysler North American markets. "Renault leader industry I be happy work them" Iacocca quote saying. Chrysler pay Renault's AMC interest held bond 200 mln dlr bond pay 350 mln dlrs Renault share interest depend AMC sale future profit Renault statement said. The statement agreement principle give 30 day together definitive accord. Approval necessary Renault Chrysler AMC board AMC shareholder relevant government authorities. If deal go ahead statement AMC shareholder Renault receive Chrysler share share value dlrs. AMC shareholder convertible preferential share possibility exchange Chrysler share condition exchange AMC shares. Reuter 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 285000 300000 versus 292000 week ago 309000 ago. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 125000 131000 versus 129000 week ago 119000 ago. Reuter 

British retailer Burton Group PLC trading American Depositary Receipts start today. Each ADR represent Burton shares. Reuter 

Claire's Stores Inc February sale 46 pct 6360000 dlrs 4350000 dlrs same-store sale 16 pct. The company March sale increase sdame rate Easter fall late April earnings sale quarter significantly ago. In year's quarter end May Three Claire's earn 934000 dlrs sale 18.4 mln dlrs compare earnings 2289000 dlrs sale 16.4 mln dlrs earlier. Reuter 

Southern Co after-tax charge 226 mln dlrs earnings January 1988 project cost Vogtle nuclear plant risen abover amount retail customer Georgia pay. The company's large subsidiary Georgia Power Co budget plant increase 6.3 pct 522 mln dlrs 8.87 billion. However pledge Georgia's Public Service Commission increase cost include utility's retail electric rates. Geogia Power board delayed schedule completion Vogtle's Unit Two June 1989 September 1988. Unit Two 60 pct complete added. The utility fuel load complete Unit One unit series low-power test Nuclear Regulatory Commission full-power license. The nuclear plant locate near Waynesboro Ga. co-owned Oglethorpe Power Corp> Municipal Electric Authority Georgia city Dalton. Georgia Power revise Vogtle budget estimate due factor include additional labor cost incur keep plant's unit schedule commercial operation June. The figure represent change plant's budget August 1985 estimate 8.35 billion dlrs. In March 1986 utility told Georgia regulator "cap" price Vogtle customer pay 3.56 billion dlrs company's share project 8.35 billion dlr total. Under budget Georgia Power share amount 3.87 billion dlrs. Noting Georgia Power's share Vogtle increase 313 mln dlrs Southern result charge earnings 177 mln dlrs taxes. In addition company Georgia Power's contract joint owner require utility buy significant amount Vogtle capacity plant's initial operation. Under term cap cost attempt recover portion budget increase applies buybacks. This bings total amount charge earnings 2326 mln dlrs tax Southern said. Southern rule Financial Accounting Standards Board effective January 1988 require cost determine nonrecoverable charge earnings determination made. The company board approve capital budget 2.1 billion dlrs 1987 include Vogtle project. It 5.9 billion dlr caput budget three-year period 1987-1989 outline board meeting note 700 mln dlrs below comparable figure 1986-1988. Reuter 

Sweden's Stora Kopparbergs Bergslags AB SKPS ST> acquire 90 pct share rival pulp paper maker Papyrus AB passing threshold above compulsorily buy rest company. Remaining shareholder month sell share Stora company statement. Stora announce September acquire Papyrus price 5.8 billion crown form Europe's large forest London-based Reed International Plc REED L>. REUTER 

Export-Import Bank Japan president Takashi Tanaka told Brazil bank continue cooperate refrain make commitment credit Ex-Im official said. In 30-minute meeting Tanaka told Brazilian Finance Minister Dilson Funaro bank consider country's request 300 mln dlr credit context international cooperation official said. They meant Ex-Im Bank grant credit package money International Monetary Fund private banks. Brazil resist IMF fear Fund ask change economic policy throw recession. Brazil request 300 mln dlr credit November develop sale generation electric power. Funaro renew request today. REUTER 

The 24 nation Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) hamper sluggish industrial output trade slow economic growth joint balance payment swing deficit 1987 Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said. The EIU World Trade Forecast revise OECD economic growth downwards 2.5 pct compare 2.8 pct growth forecast December. It area weakness West Germany small European country influence Japan hardest hit currency appreciation year. The independent research organisation cut 1987 growth rate forecast West Germany 2.2 pct 3.2 pct December 2.3 pct pct Japan. It expect OECD post current account deficit 13 billion dlrs 1987 1988 due 1.50 dlrs barrel rise 1987 oil prices. It U.S. Current account deficit look likely fall slowly forecast 125 billion dlrs 1987 115 billion 1988 130 billion 1986. It expect West Germany post 31 billion dlr payment surplus Japan 76 billion dlr surplus year. The EIU oil price drop 16.50 dlrs barrel end-1987 15.50 dlrs 1988 18 dlrs adherence OPEC output policy becomes increasingly ragged. It dollar poise resume decline foreign exchange market lose far 13 pct trade-weighted index five pct 1988 year's 18.4 pct drop. The average mark/dollar rate 1.80 mark 1.70 1988 yen/dollar rate expect break 150 yen barrier average value 150 yen 1987 146 yen 1988 said. "This crash scenario dollar's steeper angle descent increase risk end fireball three-point landing" EIU said. "Talking stop dollar's slide February meeting (of finance minister Group Five Canada) produce scant promise either decisive shift expansive policy West Germany Japan tighter U.S. Fiscal policy" said. It key dollar's fortune willingness Japanese institution buy U.S. Government asset despite prospect sustain currency loss. "Thus willing" EIC add Japan deter buying U.S. Bonds dollar collapse. To contain currency crisis dollar rate soar bring recession Third World debt crisis said. On trade EIU prospect 1987 look "increasingly sick." Import growth forecast December 4.5 pct see slow 3.8 pct 1987 recovery 4.2 pct 1988 said. The weakness West German economy big single factor import growth expect feature sluggish 3.5 pct growth 1987 6.5 pct forecast December EIU said. On export weak demand West Germany affect export prospect elsewhere Europe Japan's export 1987 remain flat sale U.S. Exporters respond marginally low competitively-priced dollar. It Europe Japan raw material oil cost domestic currency 1987 1986. However rate inflation edge 1988 current OECD average pct. Non-oil commodity price show modest dollar price increase 1988 1984 EIU said. After rise 18 pct 1986 dollar price internationally trade manufacture 8.5 pct 1987 five pct 1988 said. It OECD industrial production rise 1.6 pct 1987 weak 1.5 pct increase 1986. Reuter 

Pharmacia AB launch 200 mln dlr Eurocommercial paper programme move internationalise company's financing. Market maker Credit Suisse First Boston Morgan Stanley International Svenska Handelsbanken PLC. Pharmacia treasurer Bertil Tiusanen gain direct access short term international capital market improve ability meet dollar borrowing requirement. He natural step internationally know company whose share note Tokyo Stockholm trade counter United States. REUTER 

The Bank England provide market unspecified late assistance worth 15 mln stg. It market total assistance 228 mln stg compare liquidity shortage estimate revise 300 mln stg. REUTER 

The Bank France cut money market intervention rate 7-3/4 pct eight pct inject money category paper. The bank cut seven-day repossession rate 8-1/2 pct 8-3/4 pct. The intervention rate stood eight pct raise 7-1/4 pct January 2 French franc pressure ahead EMS realignment January 11. The bank purchase effective tomorrow five pct private paper fix rate Treasury bill mature March 25 June 25 Treasury bill mature March 25 1987 March 25 1989. The rate cut expect bank announce money market intervention tender earlier today. Money market dealer condition quarter percentage cut reflect ease call money rate week French franc's steadiness foreign exchange market February 22 currency stabilisation accord Group Five Canada. REUTER 

White Engine manufacturer industrial automotive diesel gasoline engine 100 mln dlrs sale sell investors. White Engine purchase lead Donald Stewart private investment banker White senior executives. A source close transaction purchase price 55 mln dlrs. The company change name Hercules Engines Inc Stewart majority owner president chief executive officer. In addition John Lennon current chairman chief executive officer remain chairman company said. And Joseph G. Scheetz currently president vice chairman accord company. Reuter 

Most commodity agreement close collapse debt continue weigh heavily develop country Bangladesh Commerce Minister M.A. Munim told official 30 Asian country Group 77. The official meeting finalise agenda group's regional ministerial conference Saturday. Delegates 43 Asian member country G-77 expect attend meeting. Commerce Ministry official country try adopt common strategy counter protectionist measure developed country forge develop country cooperation Commerce Secretary A.B.M. Ghulam Mostafa official discus issue relate financial resource commodity international trade developed country formulate "concrete measure towards concert action." Recommendations Dhaka meeting place July United Nations Conference Trade Development meeting Geneva official said. The Dhaka meeting discus possibility set "South Bank" line Asian Development Bank boost financial exchange economic coperation develop countries. It propose formally detail given. Reuter 

Sweden's Stora Kopparbergs Bergslags AB SKPS.ST> acquire 90 pct share rival pulp paper maker Papyrus AB passing threshold above compulsorily buy rest company. Remaining shareholder month sell share Stora company statement. Stora announce September acquire Papyrus price 5.8 billion crown form Europe's large forest London-based Reed International Plc REED L>. REUTER 

Allegheny International Inc enter agreement merge affiliate First Boston Inc's FPC> First Boston Corp transaction value 500 mln dlrs. Allegheny agreement call holder common receive 24.60 dlrs share. Holders company's 2.19 dlrs cumulative preference share receive 20 dlrs share own 11.25 dlrs convertible prefer receive 87.50 dlrs share. Allegheny International agreement call First Boston affiliate start cash tender offer outstanding share Allegheny's common cumulative prefer convertible preferred. The company First Boston commit provide financing necessary acquire security tender offer estimate 500 mln dlrs. It agreement subject waiver March 13 condition company's exist bank credit agreement. Allegheny International's statement name describe First Boston affiliate involve agreement. It offer company's stock condition valid tender security represent majority voting election director company valid tender third's outstanding cumulative prefer convertible prefer shares. Reuter 

French money supply measure term M-3 rise provisional pct January fall 0.7 pct December Bank France said. M-3 main money supply aggregate French monetary authorities. It join main money supply aggregate 1987 M-2 rise provisional 1.2 pct January fall confirm 0.9 pct December. Calculated three-month move average basis M-3 rise 4.4 pct year-on-year quarter base December rise 5.4 pct quarter centre September. The M-2 aggregate centre three-month move average rise year-on-year pct 1987 target range six pct. M-1 rise 2.5 pct 1.1 pct fall December. M-1 measure note coin circulation plus sight deposits. M-2 add short-term bank deposit M-3 add short-term deposits. The central bank's wide measure liquidity L rise 1.5 pct January pct fall December. The bank money supply growth reflect net increase sight deposit renew money market instruments. REUTER 

Genex Corp complete agreement Eberstadt Fleming Venture Capital's Plant Resources Venture Fund II Morgenthaler Venture Partners II account manage Citicorp CCI> provide mln dlr interim credit line. It Eberstadt venture capital fund Citicorp account receive warrant buy 1666667 common share 60 ct representative fund name Genex board. Genex transaction sign emplopyment agreement senior executive name president chief executive officer Genex March completion obligation current employer. The company six month effort increase authorize capital six eight mln dlr right offering holder convertible prefer stock 60 ct equivalent common share proceeds repay sum drawn interim line credit work capital. Genex right transferable separately common stock. It large shareholder Robert F. Johnston Koppers Co KOP> J. Leslie Glick together 34 pct Genex stock provide irrevocable proxy venture firm completion right offering agree exercise right acquire stock right offering. Genex venture firm buy unsubscribed share convertible prefer buy additional share right offer. Reuter 

The Turkish Central Bank Lira/Dollar rate March 10 773.05/776.92 Dollar previous 769.60/773.45. The Bank Lira/Mark rate 417.20/419.29 Mark previous 419.15/421.25. 

Continental Bank Canada subsidiary Lloyds Bank PLC LLOY.L> intend redeem exist prefer share distribute stock dividend common shareholders. The initial distribution cumulative redeemable retractable float rate class A prefer share series II carry retraction enable holder receive 12.75 dlrs share. Continental 58.6 mln dlrs exist outstanding prefer share paid par plus accrue dividends. Continental note carry dividend rate 72 pct prime expect share trade 12.75 dlrs enable shareholder wish receive cash so. The bank expect distribution May subject various approvals. Continental March 2 cash 250 mln dlrs equity 284.6 mln dlrs allow final total distribution 16.60 dlrs common share. Continental Bank continue expect final distribution shareholder range 16.50 dlrs 17.25 dlrs share late 1988 1989. Until initial stock distribution take regular dividend payment maintain exist prefer share bank said. The distribution term Continental Bank Canada's sale banking asset Lloyds Bank Canada subsidiary Lloyds Bank PLC. Continental Bank Lloyds Bank Canada paid balance purchase price low originally anticipate Continental unable transfer income tax deduction Lloyds Bank. Continental far details. More 

A free trade pact United States Canada spur economy side substantially accord study release Institute International Economics. The study Paul Wonnacott successful conclusion free trade talk raise Canada's gross product five pct expand U.S. export's seven pct. He pact resolve knotty issue government subsidy curb trade service investment pave global talk General Agreement Tariffs Trade. The United States Canada - world's big trading partner cross border shipment 150 billion dlrs - open free trade talk June. They aim pact October. Wonnacott economics professor Univerity Maryland agreement include: - Elimination tariff country phase five 10-year period; - Equal access federal government procurement country replace current "Buy America" "Buy Canada" provision "Buy North America" provision; - Fewer restriction trade service chiefly finance transportation; - A commitment screen foreign investment favor domestic producers; - A commission resolve bilateral trade disputes. Wonnacott resolve subsidy side permit export subsidy export 2.0 2.5 pct impose coutervailing duties. The limit subsidy 0.5 pct. He propose attempt impose duty offset subsidy special dispute commission resolution stage. Wonnacott "bilateral free trade contribute efficiency North American economy competitiveness face overseas producers. He U.S. market Canadian good enable benefit economy mass production. Benefits United States few Canada proportionately already U.S. gross product. Wonnacott U.S.-Canada pact area export subsidy creation dispute commission example current attempt GATT write liberal global trading regulations. Reuter 

The head Chicago Board Trade CBT Chicago Mercantile Exchange CME address meeting Commodity Futures Trading Commission's financial product advisory committee March 11 Chicago CFTC said. CBT Chairman Karsten Mahlmann objective view CBT's ad hoc committee exchange trading issue CFTC said. CME President William Brodsky discus current issue involve equity index market include factor affect price volatility change settlement procedure margin change price limits. The CFTC committee head Commissioner Robert Davis examines financial future market issues. Reuter 

Gulf Resources Chemical Corp sell 9534633 share Imperial Continental Gas Association> 720 penny share 68.6 mln stg private transaction pretax gain 19.6 mln dlrs. Gulf Resources own 6.7 mln share Imperial Continental 4.6 pct continue study various alternatives. Reuter 

A Stockholm court appoint bailiff founder troubled Swedish biotech Fermenta AB FRMS.ST> sue 30 million crown disgruntle shareholder. The court heard Refaat el-Sayed sack Fermenta board lose principal shareholding creditor fail reply official court notice action sent week ago. The bailiff appoint el-Sayed gain official response court notice fortnight. Reuter 

Graan Elevator Mij balance port grain oilseed derivative rise 136000 tonne March 7 31000 week earlier arrival 523000 tonne discharge 418000 tonne week. The balance comprise 38000 tonne grain oilseed 98000 tonne derivatives. This week's estimate arrival total 194000 tonne 45000 grains/oilseeds 149000 derivatives. The figure cover 95 pct Rotterdam traffic product concerned. Reuter 

Three London market trade potato soymeal meat future merge form Agricultural Futures Exchange. Legal adviser instruct implement amalgamation London Potato Futures Association LPFA London Meat Futures Exchange LMFE Grain Feed Trade Association's GAFTA Soya Bean Meal Futures Association SOMFA. No timetable given. Members exchange consult Agricultural Futures Exchange secretary Bill Englebright told Reuters objection raise merger. Three market involve exchange ultimately combine five markets. Discussions take Baltic International Freight Futures Exchange BIFFEX GAFTA London Grain Futures Market consider possibility join market market official said. The BIFFEX board expect reach decision merger meeting month consult meeting March 16. The grain future market intend consult soon GAFTA director James Mackie said. The aim amalgamation limit regulatory administrative cost achieve recognition require 1986 Financial Services Act. This legislation require future market Recognised Investment Exchange RIE trading continue. Representatives future market Baltic Exchange discuss possibility single RIE structure begin year. The exchange plan apply Securities Investments Board recognition RIE "at appropriate time" Agricultural Futures Exchange said. "This commitment market enable progress develop strong effective exchange benefit involve industry" chairman formation committee Pat Elmer said. The merge market remain Baltic Exchange. Reuter 

BSN Corp agreement sell 1750000 common share 25 pct 31 unaffiliated European institutional investor 30.4 mln dlrs definitive. The company closing expect shortly filing registration statement Securities Exchange Commission expect month. Reuter 

Gencorp RKO General subsidiary agree sell KHJ-TV Los Angeles Walt Disney Co DIS> 217 mln dlrs cash plus work capital adjustment closing. The company agreement principle RKO's application renew station's broadcast license dismiss compete application Fidelity Television granted. Disney acquire privately held Fidelity 103 mln dlrs adjustments. Renewal KHJ-TV license challenged regulatory proceeding 20 years. The deal subject prior approval Federal Communications Commission company said. Late 1985 Gencorp cut deal Fidelity Los Angeles investor Westinghouse Electric Corp WX> settle license proceeding sell KHJ-TV 313 mln dlrs 70 pct Westinghouse remainder Fidelity. But Jan 28 1987 Westinghouse withdrew deal FCC approve it. In 1986 Gencorp RKO agree sell WOR-TV Secaucus N.J. MCA Inc MCA> 387 mln dlrs. The FCC approve transaction party appealed. The FCC rule appeal accord spokemsan Akron Ohio-based Gencorp. Fidelity Television originally file compete application RKO license KHJ independent station 1965. In 1980 FCC disqualify RKO licensee WNAC-TV Boston cite anti-competitive trade practice inaccurate financial reporting agency cause renewal previously grant RKO New York WOR Los Angeles KHJ denied. Reuter 

Imatron Inc Mitsui Co Ltd Japan purchase mln dlr equity Imatron market price grant 120-day option mln dlr investment price. Imatron Mitsui exclusive importer Imatron's Ultrafast compute tomography scanner Japan schedule delivery scanner month installation cardiology center. It enter preliminary discussion Mitsui formation joint venture finance accelerate development Imatron's technology commercialization Japan. Reuter 

Morocco buoyed economic turnaround week's Paris Club debt reschedule likely obtain 100 mln dlrs worth development aid meeting donor begin tomorrow John Shilling director World Bank's Moroccan division said. "A optimism appear economy effect longer impossible Morocco problem ... We aim 100 mln Special Drawing Rights use" told news conference. The agreement week Paris Club western creditor reschedule 10 900 mln dlrs worth official debt due mid-1988 together accord late reschedule 1.8 billion dlrs commercial bank debt already encourage donor increase aid added. Debt source World Bank concessional loan 200 mln dlrs rationalise Morocco's sector likely agree Washington soon. REUTER 

A. H. Robins Co drug company bankruptcy proceeding due litigation Dalkon Shield contraceptive device report consolidated net earnings month end January 31 17.3 mln dlrs. In correspond year-ago period report net earnings 13.8 mln dlrs. Robins filing U.S. trustee oversee chapter 11 bankruptcy case. Reuter 

Barclays Bank Plc BCS.L> Midland Bank Plc MDBL.L> cut base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct. The cut follow similar move National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> The rate change effect tomorrow. REUTER 

Control Data Corp agree acquire Unisys Inc's UIS> 13 pct stake Magnetic Peripherals Inc>. The letter intent provide Unisys convert owner Magnetic Peripherals customer Control Data's data storage product period. Under agreement Control Data continue furnish disk drive Unisys said. No detail propose agreement available. Magnetic Controls manage data storage product Control Data found 1975 joint venture maintain technological base data storage supply peripheral equipment computer system owners. The venture developer manufacturer performance high-capacity data storage product sell Control Data computer system manafacturers worldwide said. After conversion Unisys Control Data 80 pct Honeywell Inc HON> 14 pct Bull S.A. France six pct said. Reuter 

Casino hotel operator real estate developer Donald Trump agree purchase Class B common stock Resorts International Inc held estate late Resorts chairman James Crosby 135 dlrs share. Trump consider tender offer remain Class B share price Resorts' Class A shares. Trump share agree already buy represent 78 pct Class B stock. The estate own 340783 752297 Class B shares. There 6432000 Class A share outstanding Trump "I Class A shares." Each Class B share 100 time voting Class A share. In Atlantic City Resorts statement Class B share sell Trump represent 73 pct combine voting Resorts. It closing dependent receipt necessary regulatory approval matter closing Trump tender remain Class B share price. Reuter 

USAir Group Inc U.S. District Court Pittsburgh issue temporary restrain prevent Trans World Airlines Inc buying additional USAir shares. USAir issue response suit charge TWA chairman Carl Icahn TWA violate federal law mislead statements. TWA week own 15 pct USAir's shares. It offer buy company 52 dlrs share cash 1.4 billion dlrs. More 

Grease Monkey Holding Corp receive reject unsolicited merger offer Jiffy Lube International Inc LUBE>. The company proposal involve exchange Grease Monkey common stock combination Jiffy Lube security estimate current value substantially below Grease Monkey's current market price. It disclose details. Reuter 

The Supreme Court decline hear appeal U.S. West Inc USW> challenge whether consent decree legally binding seven regional telephone firm create breakup American Telephone Telegraph Co T>. The justice comment stand ruling U.S. Court Appeals August restriction 1982 decree legally binding regional company party it. U.S. West seven regional company argue restriction violate constitutional protection due process law AT T adequately represent subsidiary consent decree proceedings. The Justice Department urge Supreme Court reject appeal say "As parent corporation AT T legal authority bind (its operating subsidiaries) consent decree." Also oppose appeal AT T. The appeal court ruling allow Bell operating company offer service outside territory express permission federal courts. That ruling appeal Supreme Court. Justice Antonin Scalia today's ruling court give explanation. Reuter 

A decision final dump duty frozen orange juice Brazil issue tomorrow Commerce Department official said. They department midnight tonight duty find tomorrow. A preliminary duty 8.54 pct October 17 1986. The final ruling base detailed information official said. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp agree principle French state-owned Renault acquire American Motors Corp. Renault control shareholder deal AMC stockholder Renault receive Chrysler common stock market value dlrs AMC common share hold. Chrysler letter intent deal need government AMC shareholder board approval provide AMC holder receive .0840 .0687 share Chrysler common share AMC common hold. 

Frank B. Hall Co Inc superintendent insurance New York liquidator Union Capital Indemnity Insurance Co New York file lawsuit company Touche Ross Co Hall unit former officer director Union Indemnity seek damage 140 mln dlrs connection Union's insolvency. Union Indemnity unit Hall prior place liquidation New York Insurance Department July 1985. Hall intend oppose action vigorously. Reuter 

Advanced Tobacco Products Inc announcement regard stock halt morning NASDAQ. The company lawyer prepare release company official make announcement hour. The stock's bid 3/8 ask 1/2. Reuter 

Barclays Bank Plc BCS.L> Midland Bank Plc MDBL.L> cut base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct. The cut follow similar move National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> The rate change effect tomorrow. The base rate reduction Bank England cut deal rate morning signal money market resist half percentage drop bank base lending rate market source said. Until week central hold staunchly market pressure low rate apparent effort preserve expect rate cut government's annual Budget March 17. Sterling remain firm 1.59 dlrs compare close Friday 1.5865 dlrs. REUTER 

The U.S. Mint seek offer 4784000 lb special high-grade zinc intend purchase. It sell offer due 1100 hr EST March 24. The Mint increment 1300000 lb delivery week April 13 april 20 Ball Corp Greeneville Tenn. increment 1092000 lb deliver week April 20 April 27 LaSalle Rolling Mills LaSalle Ill. Firms submit offer elect receive payment Mint standard check wire transfer. Awards base whichever method cost advantageous goverment award determined. The offer minimum acceptance period 10 calendar day Mint said. Reuter 

Led non-residential sector Canadian building permit issue November rise 0.7 pct 2.18 billion dlrs seasonally adjust 2.16 billion dlrs October Statistics Canada said. Residential permit fell 3.9 pct 1.25 billion dlrs 1.30 billion dlrs October unit approve fell 17552 19079 units. The value non-residential project rise 7.6 pct 927.6 mln dlrs month. Reuter 

Cambridge Medical Technology Corp pursuant letter intent sign Panbaxy Laboratories> AIDS test jointly manufacture companies. Cambridge test human clinical purpose undergo extensive clinical human test receive approval marketing U.S. Food Drug Administration. The company unable predict test available. Reuter 

Dixie Yarns Inc TI-CARO Inc> jointly sign merger agreement call Dixie acquire TI-CARO's stock exchange mln Dixie's common. The company previously announce merger approve TI-CARO's board expect close April. They revenue combine company 600 mln dlrs Dixie merger dilute 1987 results. TI-CARO take private 1984 management lead leveraged buy-out. Reuter 

Ciba-Giegy Corp>'s Ciba-Giegy Pharmaceuticals division agreement Gipharmex S.P.A.> (Giuliani Group) Milan Italy develop eventually market U.S. gallstone dissolve drug. The company drug ursodeoxycholic acid naturally occur bile acid approve marketing European country Japan. The division hold patent drug dissolve gallstones. Reuter 

A decision final dump duty frozen orange juice Brazil issue tomorrow Commerce Department official said. They department midnight tonight duty find tomorrow. A preliminary duty 8.54 pct Oct. 17. The final duty base detailed information official said. reuter 

The National Weather Service warning gale force wind remain effect lake Erie Huron Michigan. Also warning post wave beach erosion shore Lakes. Winds gusting 45 mph cause six foot wave western southern shore Lake Michigan morning. Advisories low wind chill temperature post across portion upper Michigan northern low Michigan. Early morning gusty wind brought wind chill 15 25 degree below zero. Freezing rain scatter central Colorado mid morning central Kansas northeast Illinois. Snow reach south central Montana across Wyoming western Nebraska western Kansas. Snow extend across northern Wisconsin upper Michigan northern low Michigan. Rain reach northern Pacific Coast across northwest Utah Maryland Deleware Virginia Carolinas Georgia northern Alabama. Reuter 

The Bank England take onto book far billion stg tranche 8-3/4 pct Treasury Loan stock due 1997 payable 40 stg pct application. The stock issue Bank 96.50 stg pct available dealing March 11 remainder amount payable May 5. The Bank bond yield 9.28 pct issue price free tax resident overseas. The issue designate 8-3/4 pct Treasury Loan 1997 "B." A far 100 mln stg reserve National Debt Commissioners. The market drop 1/2 follow Bank's announcement Treasury 13-1/2 pct stock due 2004/08 quote full low 134-12/32 stg pct 20 minute news. Dealers announcement view backdrop intense pressure low U.K. Interest rate built past week result sterling's strength. The Bank morning finally signal prepared low rate U.K. Clearing bank afternoon announce cut base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct. The Bank initially reluctant countenance rate cut dealer authority wish delay reduction U.K. Budget March 17 thereby preserve full impact Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson's package measures. However sterling's apparently inexorable climb authority decide cede pressure allow half-point cut. Today's billion stg tap issue view market move Bank eradicate hope far rate cut arise result strong sterling. Most market participant believe Lawson foster far half rate reduction budget surprised full decline stage. Dealers note authorities' attempt week ease pressure low rate Bank issue billion stg tap stock view subdue Government bond market. To surprise participant issue sell hour become available trading market push register far sharp gains. Dealers stage unlikely issue announce absorbed market rapidly week's. However note sterling edge high follow base rate cut close trade-weighted basis 72.4 ahead Friday's final 71.8 beneath peak 72.5 touch 1300 GMT. REUTER 

President Reagan's denial proceeds Iran arm sale divert Nicaraguan contra rebel challenged former security adviser accord Washington Post. The paper yesterday John Poindexter resign November illegal transfer 20 mln dlrs disclose ready break silence maintain affair. The Post tell special Senate committee investigate Iran scandal told Reagan twice 1986 money Iran sale aid contras. It panel consider grant Poindexter immunity prosecution fund diversion illegal Congressional ban force aid contras. Poindexter invoked Fifth Amendment Constitution protects give evidence self-incriminating. Reagan authorize sale arm Iran hope establish link Iranian moderate deny know proceeds end Nicaraguan rebel hands. A White House spokesman comment Post story David Abshire coordinate White House handle affair Reagan approve illegal action. Abshire CBS television show "Face Nation" comment directly Post story said: "He (Reagan) deeply honest deeply dedicate tell truth say knowledge knowledge." The Post quote source close Reagan say White House expect Poindexter "will direction authority directly indirectly" president diversion funds. The paper former security adviser's testimony damage president's claim unaware fund diversion. It quote legal source say Poindexter lawyer plan contend twice 1986 told Reagan arm sale generate money "contras." The paper quote source say Poindexter tell Reagan illegal diversion fund contra "an ancillary benefit" sales. The Post's source Senate committee grant immunity prosecution month Oliver North fire National Security Council Poindexter resigned. Reuter 

Italian President Francesco Cossiga veteran Christian Democrat politician Giulio Andreotti try form government official said. They Andreotti reserve reply whether accept mandate normal procedure ascertain whether form government. Cossiga nominate Andreotti sole candidate majority Christian Democrats despite stiff opposition Socialists outgo Prime Minister Bettino Craxi. REUTER 

Petro-Canada Canada's state-owned oil company drill delineation well summer Terra Nova oil field offshore Newfoundland. Evaluation test result preliminary engineering Petro-Canada position propose development plan Terra Nova field 1988 company said. Depending require regulatory approval construction begin 1989 oil production 1991 Petro-Canada said. "We degree confidence western portion (Terra Nova) field contains 11 mln cubic meter recoverable oil 70 mln barrel produce economicly use float production system" Petro-Canada said. The Terra-Nova field lie 350 kilometer east St. John's 35 kilometer southeast Hibernia field discover Petro-Canada 1984. "We've encourage result eastern portion field hope summer's drilling prove additional reserve there" company said. Petro-Canada believe Terra Nova field commercial prospect company want move resource towards development start generate return investment Petro-Canada said. Petro-Canada act operator well 75 pct western portion Graven block Terra Nova field 26 pct field's East Flank block company spokesman later. Other field participant include Canterra Energy Ltd Mobil Oil Canada Ltd Gulf Canada Resources Inc ICG Resources Ltd Trillium Exploration Corp partnership PAREX. Petro-Canada estimate reserve Terra Nova field's Graven block 68 mln 70 mln barrel oil company spokesman Bob Foulkes Petro-Canada's Calgary office. Combined reserve Graven Block field's East Flank block estimate 70 mln 130 mln barrel added. Petro-Canada expect spend 500 mln Canadian dlrs bring field production 1991 development budget double company build production combine block field said. Petro-Canada estimate Terra Nova field Graven block produce 25000 26000 barrel average daily production production maximum capacity 40000 bpd company spokesman Foulkes answer query. The company estimate production combine Graven East Flank block Terra Nova field produce 45000 bpd average daily production said. Reuter 

Kingdom Sweden issue 100 mln stg bond due April 15 1997 carry coupon 9-1/2 pct price 101-1/4 Baring Brothers Co Ltd lead manager. The issue payable April 15 1987. The bond callable seven 100-1/8 pct list London Stock Exchange. Fees 1-3/8 pct sell concession 5/8 pct combine management underwriting fee. REUTER 

(Charan Industries Inc) distributor toy consumer product expect 1987 net profit rise 50 pct year's 6.1 mln dlrs president Earl Takefman told reporter annual meeting. "We grow basically 100 pct I'm sure we're able grow 100 pct certainly grow 50 pct year" Takefman said. Charan report profit 3.0 mln dlrs 1985. Takefman expect sale rise 100 mln dlrs 57.3 mln dlrs 1986. Fiscal 1985 end September 30 fiscal 1986 end November 30. Takefman company actively look acquisition consumer product industry likely Canada. The company expect resolve delivery problem hinder growth toy distribution account one-third revenues. Charan exclusive distributor Canada Worlds Wonder> toy include Teddy Ruxpin voice-activated talk plush bear. Takefman product shelf Christmas include small version Teddy Ruxpin talk Mickey Mouse toy dance plush toy doll voice activate sound touch heat talk books. The company marketing extend line "laser tag" kit shoot ray tell you've hit someone. Other product include recorder device allows student leave taped message others' locker retailing 60 dlrs. Reuter 

Mayfair Super Markets sale qtr end Feb 28 122.0 mln dlrs increase 15 pct compare sale 105.9 mln dlrs comparable quarter year. The company sale six month 242.0 mln dlrs 15 pct above 210.1 mln dlrs report period year. This 12th consecutive quarterly gain company said. The company expect release earnings April. Reuter 

Timeplex Inc complete previously-announced redemption 7-3/4 pct convertible subordinate debenture due 2008. The company 35 mln dlrs total principal amount debenture outstanding. Debenture holder entitle convert debenture share company's common stock 22.50 dlrs share 44-4/9 share common stock 1000 dlrs principal amount debentures. Reuter 

PPG Industries Inc investor lead Sterling Group> Houston agree acquire PPG's ethylene product include inteest ethylene glycol joint venture du Pont Co DD> Beaumont Texas undisclosed terms. The company completion expect quarter. It sale 50 mln dlrs 1986. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve expect intervene government security market add temporary reserve via customer repurchase agreement economist said. Most economist Fed add 1.5 billion dlrs temporary reserve via customer repurchase agreement slim chance Fed inject permanent reserve via three-day repurchase agreements. Federal fund open 6-1/16 pct firm 6-1/8 pct trading. Funds average six pct Friday. Reuter 

Barclays Bank Plc BCS.L> Midland Bank Plc MDBL.L> cut base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct. The cut follow similar move National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> The rate change effect tomorrow. The base rate reduction Bank England cut deal rate morning signal money market resist half percentage drop bank base lending rate market source said. Until week central hold staunchly market pressure low rate apparent effort preserve expect rate cut government's annual Budget March 17. Sterling remain firm 1.59 dlrs compare close Friday 1.5865 dlrs. Reuter 

Ecology Environment Inc initial offering mln common share 15 dlrs share. The company sell 919948 share shareholder rest. Prudential-Bache Securities Inc> sole underwriter. Reuter 

About 8000 West German farmer march northern city Kiel protest European Community (EC) agricultural policy organiser said. The demonstrator burn straw effigy West German EC's 17-man Commission Karl-Heinz Narjes Alois Pfeiffer demand removal office. Speakers rally call government tougher stance dealing Commission. The protest late West German farmer Commission proposal cut EC farm spending.The farmer proposal business. Reuter 

RLR Financial Services release statement shortly concern company. RLR's stock halt morning news pending NASDAQ. Reuter 

Angola Uruguay establish diplomatic relation ambassadorial level accord joint communique sign U.N. representative circulate today. Reuter 

Lloyds Bank Plc LLOY.L> cut base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct effective tomorrow. The reduction follow similar move British clearing banks. National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> lead morning Bank England lower deal rate signal tolerate half percentage reduction. The central bank's surprise signal follow strenuous effort week prevent market force bring base rate U.K. Budget March 17. REUTER 

Norcros NCRO.L> Plc intention proceed far talk Williams Holdings Plc's suggestion benefit arise merger groups. Norcros benefit achieve normal trading warrant closer formal association. Norcros share firm 30p 342p news investor speculation hostile bid Williams dealer said. Williams rise 2p 742. Williams earlier inform Norcros hold 2890000 ordinary share 2.2 pct issued. Reuter 

The Burton Group Plc BRTO.L> trading commence U.S. In Burton Group American Depositary Receipts (ADRs). Burton expect ADRs increase significantly North American demand Burton's shares. A programme promote ADRs presentation U.S. Is due soon. Burton share 6p firmer 306p. Reuter 

Lloyds Bank Plc LLOY.L> cut base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct effective tomorrow. The reduction follow similar move British clearing banks. National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> lead morning Bank England lower deal rate signal tolerate half percentage reduction. The central bank's surprise signal follow strenuous effort week prevent market force bring base rate U.K. Budget March 17. Reuter 

The West German Intervention Board accepted 962192 tonne grain start current agricultural month compare 1.8 mln tonne July/February period 1985/86. It accepted 336097 tonne bread wheat (nil year-earlier period) 16818 (nil) tonne quality wheat 33623 (523625) tonne feed wheat 3426 (168682) tonne rye 88494 (32766) tonne quality rye 2313 (105005) tonne summer barley 481421 (972794) tonne winter barley. Reuter 

Lloyds Bank Plc cut base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct effective tomorrow. The reduction follow similar move British clearing banks. National Westminster Bank Plc lead morning Bank England lower deal rate signal tolerate half percentage reduction. The central bank's surprise signal follow strenuous effort week prevent market force bring base rate U.K. Budget March 17. Reuter 

The Hamburg fishmeal market little movement past week demand slack protein feed sector trade source said. Prices edge firmer origin offering level strong dollar. Sellers quote 64 pct fishmeal 640 650 mark tonne free truck spot 630 640 mark April/Dec. International demand slow inquiry Far Eastern buyer note South American producer country source said. Chile catch northern southern fishing ground offer unchanged 330 dlrs tonne c f North German ports. Peru's catch differ regionally stock low. Sellers quote nominal offering level 320 dlrs tonne c f north German ports. Ecuador market catch poor. Denmark seasonally low catch 72 pct meal offer 315 crown 100 kilo cif North European port April/Oct deliveries. Iceland catch seller quote price 5.45 dlrs percentage protein cif North European ports. Norway market. Reuter 

Banque Francaise du Commerce Exterieur (BFCE) issue 150 mln dlr seven pct bond due April 1 1992 par lead manager Societe Generale said. The issue unsecured unsubordinated debt guaranteed France. Fees 1-1/4 pct sell 1/4 pct management 3/8 pct underwriting. Payment date April 1 listing Luxembourg denomination 1000 10000 dlrs. The launch spread 53 basis point equivalent five-year treasuries. REUTER 

A half cut base lending rate announce clearing bank Bank England finally endorse move follow week downward pressure dealer said. During routine intervention market bank trim rate deal discount house half National Westminster lead clearing bank reduce base rate 10-1/2 pct 11 pct. The timing Bank England move operator surprise recent action seemingly design dampen hope base rate cut ahead U.K. Budget March 17. For fundamental lead market push cut base lending rate 10 pct central bank decline follow wholesale money market rate down. Although political consideration -- government's wish fall base rate coincide Budget -- suggest operator week reason Bank's delay action worry real strength sterling market's reaction content Budget behind central bank's caution dealer said. In event sterling continued firm rate cut leave market look half fall. Consequently rate money market ease one-month interbank sterling shed 5/16 10-9/16 7/16 three-months trading 1/16 10-5/16 3/16 pct. Sterling cd's similarly 5/16 month 1/8 year. Overnight interbank money tomorrow indicate 11 pct below level ruling week. Today overnight touch 11-3/4 pct Bank 228 mln stg estimate 300 mln stg shortage. REUTER 

Over 240 mln bushel government grain allocate redemption commodity certificate April 30 accord Commodity Credit Corporation. Redemptions include 11.4 mln bushel corn value 17.0 mln dlrs average per-bushel price 1.492 dlrs current grain catalog issue December 1 CCC. Wheat redemption total 9.6 mln bushel value 23.7 mln dlrs December 1. More 

American Motors Corp study propose merger Chrysler Corp. American Motors receive letter Chrysler Corp "advising proposal enter merger transaction American Motors Corp." In brief statement company "We study proposal. We far comment appropriate." Reuter 

Den Danske Bank af 1871 A/S issue certificate deposit Danish bank CDs six nine 12 month negotiable period. They denomination 10 mln crown commission bank. Interest link money capital market rate paid discount basis certificate sell below par mature par bank statement said. The certificate liable stamp duty. "They flexible supplement negotiate deposit company institutional investor chance organise liquidity" statement said. Bank spokesman Arne Lund "We earlier tax authority certificate liable stamp duty not." He issue assist short-term rates. REUTER 

International Geosystems Corp subsidiary Golden Tech Resources recent order TianMa Chinese Language word processing brought year-to-date sale 2900000 Canadian dlrs. Reuter 

American Express Co's stock fell sharply reflect investors' disappointment company announcement plan brokerage unit Shearson Lehman Brothers trader said. The company study option Shearson unit. Traders investor anticipate announcement weekend spin Shearson Lehman. Also flurry arbitrage related sell program pound market accelerate selloff American Express component Dow Industrial Average. American Express fell 3-1/8 77-3/8. "It program anticipation announcement spinoff Shearson weekend announcement happened" trader said. In minute trading Friday trader stock jumped close 3-3/8 largely anticipation company weekend announcement. Reuter 

Infotron Systems Corp elect Robert E. Purcell chairman board position held vacant years. Reuter 

Ranger Oil Ltd complete March 2 previously announce sale U.S. oil gas property held subsidiary Ranger Oil Co Ranger Inc Ampol Exploration Ltd Australia 18.5 mln U.S. dlrs. Ranger deal retain five pct gross override royalty stake block east cameron 65 82 Gulf Mexico offshore Lousiana. It sale include U.S. property acquire Berkeley Exploration Production PLC> December. Reuter 

Kingdom Sweden issue 100 mln stg bond due April 15 1997 carry coupon 9-1/2 pct price 101-1/4 Baring Brothers Co Ltd lead manager. The issue payable April 15 1987. The bond callable seven 100-1/8 pct list London Stock Exchange. Fees 1-3/8 pct sell concession 5/8 pct combine management underwriting. REUTER 

In unusual move Standard Poor's Corp downgrade U.S. corporate debt issue soon price offering late week. But unlike similar action September 1986 investment banker disrupt financing agency's rate reduction effect trader said. S P announce Friday afternoon cut B B-plus 900 mln dlr issue senior note due 1994 Holiday Inns Inc unit Holiday Corp HIA>. The note price late Thursday sole manager Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. In release Standard Poor's action reflect change note issue's term unsecured form debt secured. That change agency rat note February 20 S P stated. "We action become aware issue's structure changed" Robert Nelson S P. "We generally distinction secure unsecured debt key factor downgrade." A spokesman Drexel action affect Holiday Inns deal already sell investor late Friday afternoon. "The Holiday note trading 100.50 when-issued basis" Drexel spokesman soon S P's announcement. The 10-1/2 pct note price par. That cry late September S P downgrade 215 mln dlr issue subordinate sinking fund debenture due 1998 New World Pictures Ltd NWP> hour pricing. Because rating cut CCC-plus B-minus underwriter halt sale repriced issue. Sole manager L.F. Rothschild Unterberg Towbin initially give debenture 12-1/4 pct coupon par pricing. It repriced issue 97 yield 12.74 pct. New World Pictures increase issue 215 mln dlrs original offering 150 mln dlrs brought S P. The agency cite large financing action believe issuer's cash exist operation adequately service debt. An officer S P rating agency told beforehand issue increase size. Usually issuer underwriter alert rating agency change debt offering said. In case Moody's Investors Service Inc decline follow suit bond trader noted. Indeed Moody's announce Friday original rating B-1 Holiday Inns note remain appropriate. Moody's point seven-year note unsecured obligation Holiday Inns issue benefit negative pledge provision call specify collateral circumstances. The agency B-1 rating continued recognize highly leveraged debt structure result Holiday's recapitalization company's dependence property sale produce adequate cash flow near-term debt service. "Aside Holiday Inns New World Pictures I cannot remember issue downgrade soon pricing" remark corporate bond trader. Holiday Inns sell Thursday via Drexel 500 mln dlrs subordinate debenture due 1999 11 pct coupon par pricing. The debentures' rating B-2 Moody's B-minus S P left unchanged Friday. The combine offering 1.4 billion dlrs second-largest junk bond deal brought market underwriter trader said. They big BCI Holdings' 2.35 billion dlr offering April 10 1986. That Holiday Inns deal sell quickly underscored appetite investor high-yield securities. "People hungry yield. They worried downside risk especially junk bond issue well-known companies" portfolio manager. As result investor expect snap week's plan offering Allied Stores Corp 200 mln dlrs senior note due 1992 rat B-2/B 600 mln dlrs senior subordinate debenture due 1997 rat B-3/CCC-plus. Lead underwriter First Boston Corp Friday tentatively schedule security pricing today. Reuter 

The U.S. Department Agriculture probably decrease estimate 1986/87 Florida orange crop low 123 mln box 129 mln box analyst industry source said. The Department schedule release estimate 1500 hr EST (2100 gmt) today. Analysts market anticipate downward revision bullish impact discounted. The estimate USDA left unchanged October affected recent evidence shortfall midseason crop harvest complete. Analysts base earlier USDA projection harvest five seven mln box large were. "They cut estimate" Bob Tate FCOJ broker Dean Witter Reynolds Miami. "The question whether admit estimate." Tate USDA low estimate lesser amount mln box continue drop estimate subsequent report crop picture clarifies. The late season harvest consist mostly Valencia orange yet start noted. "They'll temper it" Judy Weissman FCOJ analyst Shearson Lehman Bros. "The main drop probably July." She expect today's estimate 126 mln boxes. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 50 mln dlrs debt Florida National Banks Florida Inc lead bank Florida National Bank. Moody's cut parent's subordinate debt Baa-1 A-3 lead bank's long-term deposit obligation A-1 Aa-3. Affirmed Florida National's commercial paper Prime-2 unit's short-term deposit Prime-1. The rating agency cite elevate level non-performing asset concentrate real estate lending. Moody's point loss escalate throughout 1986 expect partial improvement year. Reuter 

Perry Drug Stores Inc February sale 19.5 pct 52 mln dlrs 43 mln dlrs earlier same-store sale five pct. It sale month fiscal 17.0 pct 241 mln dlrs 206 mln dlrs same-store sale five pct. Reuter 

The United Auto Workers UAW> union support Chrysler Corp's proposal buy American Motors Corp create "a match potentially point secure future worker companies." "We believe members' interest serve Chrysler commit make happen" UAW president Owen Bieber vice president Marc Stepp statement. "We believe Chrysler's purchase logical sound step concerned" union said. The UAW negotiate AMC carmaker's demand economic concession cover worker Wisconsin operation AMC cease vehicle production Kenosha Wisconsin assembly plant 1989. Reuter 

A Transworld Airlines Inc official airline comment USAir Group Inc's plan buyout Piedmont Aviation Inc. TWA pursue application Department Transportation takeover USAir accord Mark Buckstein TWA counsel vice president. TWA file revise application follow DOT's rejection Friday incomplete application file week. Earlier USAir agree buy Piedmont 69 dlrs cash share. 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 120 mln dlrs debt Piedmont Aviation Inc airline's agreement acquire USAir Group Inc U>. The rating agency review focus effect acquisition Piedmont's financial leverage debt-service requirements. Moody's examine potential airline's borrowing capacity finance merger. Piedmont currently carry Baa-2 prefer stock Prime-2 commercial paper. Reuter 

The chairman conference International Natural Rubber Agreement (INRA) Manaspas Xuto Thailand imperative try settle main outstanding issue week. The INRA renegotiation conference resume auspex United Nations Conference Trade Development (UNCTAD) schedule March 20. Xuto told delegate session conference present promising opportunity conclude pact current accord expires October. Xuto consultation representative major export import country month "I found constructive attitude willingness flexible concerned." "It imperative try settle major outstanding issue course week considerable amount technical draft remain completed." He immediately start consultation producer consumers. The October negotiation collapse disagreement buffer stock operations. Consumer demand tighter buffer stock control aim prevent INRA follow collapse International Tin Agreement (ITA) reject producer argue unchanged INRA terms. The tin pact fail buffer stock manager ran fund support prices. Three previous round talk rubber producer consumer five-year pact end agreement. The INRA originally due expire October 1985 extend October 1987 facilitate renegotiation. Wong Kum Choon Malaysian delegation cautiously optimistic "that together able save INRA prevent scuttled." Without INRA add price natural rubber volatile. Calling delegate show purpose reality "There reason aside difference successor agreement." Reuter 

Highland Superstores Inc February sale rise 14 pct 46.5 mln dlrs 40.9 mln dlrs ago. The company comparable store basis consider store 24 month sale decline 10 pct. It currently operates 53 stores. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc 212.75 mln dlrs debt USAir Group Inc USAir Inc unit remain review downgrade. The rating agency cite USAir Group's propose acquisition Piedmont Aviation Inc PIE> Trans World Airlines Inc's TWA> propose cash merger USAir. However status TWA's bid USAir Group currently uncertain. The U.S. Transportation Department reject TWA's application acquire USAir deficiency ground TWA file revise application Moody's noted. Under Moody's review downgrade USAir Group's Baa-1 senior debt Baa-2 subordinate debenture USAir unit's A-3 senior debt Baa-1 subordinate debentures. Moody's examine effect propose merger USAir Group's financial measurement potential damage company's financial flexibility probability increase debt-service requirements. Reuter 

Enterra Corp bank reduce revolve credit agreement 40 mln dlrs 60 mln dlrs. Also company unit grant security assets. Enterra change result Enterra's previously announce agreement sell Hale Fire Pump Co Macomson Machine Co 27 mln dlrs restructuring. Reuter 

Royal Bank Canada RT.TO> extend discount brokerage service available Ontario resident Quebec investors. The bank success Ontario service prompt consider make service available provinces. Royal Bank service offer cut 75 pct standard brokerage commission toll-free up-to-the-minute stock quote margin loan U.S. Canadian dollar competitive rates. Reuter 

Bally Manufacturing Corp expect charge earnings quarter 17.3 mln dlrs result deal buy 2.6 mln common share real estate developer Donald Trump. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Chicago-based hotel casino gamble amusement concern anticipate charge quarter earnings deductible federal income tax purposes. Under February 21 deal Bally agree buy 2.6 mln 3.06 mln share held Trump 24 dlrs share 62.4 mln dlrs Trump agree try seek control Bally. The agreement call Bally pay Trump 6.2 mln dlrs agreement claim expense related purchase Bally common stock Bally said. Trump agree buy Bally stock try seek control company 10 said. Bear Stearns Co Inc sign similar standstill agreement Bally Bally said. But deal Bally stock broker said. The deal obligates Bally buy Trump's remain stake company 33 dlrs share stock price reach level February 21 1988 said. Reuter 

Hudson Bay Mining Smelting Co Ltd cut price grade zinc sell North America U.S. cent pound Canadian cent pound effective immediately. The price grade zinc 37 U.S. cent 49-1/2 Canadian cent pound company said. Special grade prime western continuous galvanize grade control lead cost 37-1/2 U.S. cent 50 Canadian cent pound. The price continuous galvanize grade alloyed control lead aluminum addition 37-3/4 U.S. cent 50-1/4 Canadian cent pound. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve enter U.S. Government security market arrange 2.5 billion dlrs customer repurchase agreement Fed spokesman said. Dealers Federal fund trading 6-3/16 pct Fed temporary indirect supply reserve banking system. Reuter 

An appeal Buitoni SpA court ruling accord acquire Italian food firm SME - Societa Meridionale Finanziaria contractually binding reject court official said. An appeal court reject Buitoni's claim 497 billion lira accord industrial company IRI - Istituto la Ricostruzione Industriale binding contract. The decision upholds court ruling July. Buitoni control CIR - Compagnie Industriali Riunite investment company control Ing C Olivetti EC SpA (OLIV.MI> chairman Carlo De Benedetti. Reuter 

American Electric Power Co (AEP) 1.3 mln kilowatt Mountaineer Plant New Haven W. Va. take operation March 13 routine maintenance. AEP Mountaineer own operate Appalachian Power Co AEP System's seven operating companies. Reuter 

Allegheny International Inc consumer product concern announce merger agreement First Boston Corp FBC> affiliate deal worth 500 mln dlrs intend divest unit increase profits. "We're reduce AI size consistent financial resources" Chairman Oliver S. Travers. "We conscious strategic choice small financially sound consumer product company operates predominantly stable political economic environment North America" said. 

Hamilton Oil Corp reserve 1986 59.8 mln barrel oil 905.5 billion cubic foot natural gas 211 mln barrel equivalent 10 mln equivalent barrel before. Reuter 

Computer Sciences Corp join American Telephone Telegraph bid 4.50-billion-dlr ten-year contract provide federal government telecommunication network. AT T prime contractor. The General Services Administration award contract year. Computer Sciences Corp responsible design development maintenance software issue customer bill contract. AT T use resource Boeing Co BA> seven regional hold company formerly Bell Operating Co's contract bid. Reuter 

Rohr Industries Inc raise 150 mln dlrs offering subordinate debenture due 2017 9-1/4 pct coupon par pricing lead manager Dillon Read Co Inc. That 160 basis point yield off-the-run 9-1/4 pct Treasury bond 2016. Non-refundable 10 issue rat Baa-2 Moody's BBB S P. A sinking fund begin 1998 retire five pct debt annually increase 200 pct company's option give debenture estimate minimum 13.9 estimate maximum 20.5 years. Reuter 

Life Technologies Inc sign mln dlr technology transfer licensing agreement Toray Industries Inc Tokyo-based maker synthetic fiber industrial consumer medical products. Under term agreement Life Toray purchase exclusive right market Life's hepatitus B detection technology Japan Korea Taiwan. Moreover Life company agree begin joint research development develop human diagnostic products. Reuter 

UAL Inc United Airlines unit's load factor February rise 63.2 pct 58.9 pct before. The airline schedule capacity month rise 27.7 pct 7.60 billion available seat mile 5.95 billion traffic rise 37 pct 4.80 revenue passenger mile 3.50 billion. February 1987 figure include Pacific route acquire Pan American World Airways 1986. Reuter 

Graham-McCormick Oil Gas Partnership complete sale interest major oil gas field Energy Assets International Corp> 21 mln dlrs. The company sell one-half 50 pct Oak Hill North Rucias field large produce properties. It 20 mln dlrs proceeds prepay principal senior secure notes. Semi-annual principal payment remain 40 mln dlrs note satisfied December 1988 result said. The company note agreement amend reflect ease financial covenant increase 13.5 pct 13.0 pct December 1990. It noteholders exercise price 1125000 warrant reduce 50 ct 1.50 dlrs. The company Energy Assets agree share cost increase production Oak Hill field. Reuter 

Fujitsu America Inc> subsidiary Fujitsu Ltd form joint company GTE Communication System> develop market voice data communication system North American market place. The company Fujitsu GTE Business Systems Inc headquarter Tempe Ariz. schedule begin operation April 11. Fujitsu company 80 pct own Fujustu America 20 pct GTE Communication. No term financial transaction disclose company said. 

Advanced Tobacco Products Inc end talk acquire Sterling Drug Inc STY> resume acquisition talk parties. The company previously announce "major U.S. base company" identify evaluate nicotine technology. Advanced Sterling's board decide enter nicotine product market. It receive 200000 dlr payment deal exclusively Sterling March Six. Advanced suspend merger talk party result exclusivity agreement. Reuter 

Mixed medium Bertelsmann AG BETG.F> subsidiary Publicsoft GmbH agree market Apple Computer Inc's AAPL.O> software product specialized West German computer retail trade. The cooperation agreement Publicsoft Apple's West German subsidiary Apple Computer GmbH involve either company take financial stake Bertelsmann spokesman said. He decline agreement worth. Reuter 

MTech Corp file Securities Exchange Commission registration statement cover 75 mln dlr issue convertible subordinate debenture due 2012. The company name Alex Brown Sons Inc lead manager First Boston Corp Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc co-managers offering. MTech grant underwriter option buy additional 11.25 mln dlrs principal amount debenture cover over-allotments. Reuter 

British Airways introduce short-stay fare call "On The Town" permit passenger book theater holiday London minute spend day England. British Airways package available begin end April 16 New York Boston Chicago Detroit 468 dlrs midweek 518 dlrs weekends. The airline package Pittsburgh Baltimore Washington D.C. price 499 dlrs midweek 549 dlrs weekend Philadelphia 479 dlrs midweek 529 weekends. Reuter 

T.H.E. Fitness INc agree buy Livingwell Inc's manufacturing unit Powercise INternational Inc 11.0 mln T.H.E. Fitness share value 30 mln dlrs. This acquisition include Livingwell's right recently announce Powercise fitness equipment. IN separate transaction Livingwell INc operator 300 health club place six mln dlrs Powercise INternational install Powercise equipment clubs. Reuter 

Oil trader New York Exxon Corp's Exxon U.S.A. increase price charge contract barge customer heating oil New York harbor 1.5 ct gallon effective Saturday March 7. They increase brought Exxon's contract barge price 50 ct gallon. Traders price hike follow high spot future market price heating oil. Reuter 

RLR Financial Serivces Inc National Association Securities Dealers intend delist NASD beleieves market sale RLR's broker/dealer subsidiary RLR Securities Group Inc effective registration statement require Securities Act 1933. RLR NASD intend delist March 12 unless RLR demonstrates compliance law. RLR believe action merit effective registration statement RLR Financial security involve intend defend matter. RLR NASD stay deletion security NASDAQ pending continuous review matter possibility hearing merits. RLR stop market make security pending resolution matter. It delist NASDAQ adverse effect market price securities. Reuter 

Hudson Bay Mining Smelting Co Ltd> cut price grade zinc sell North America U.S. ct pound Canadian ct pound effective immediately. The price grade zinc 37 U.S. ct 49-1/2 Canadian ct pound company said. Special grade prime western continuous galvanize grade control lead cost 37-1/2 U.S. ct 50 Canadian ct pound. The price continuous galvanize grade alloyed control lead aluminum addition 37-3/4 U.S. ct 50-1/4 Canadian ct pound. Reuter 

BankAmerica Corp's Bank America unit complete previously announce sale BankAmerica Finance Ltd Bank Ireland> expect pre-tax gain 23 mln dlrs. BankAmerica Finance provide residential mortgage south east England. Its total asset 1986 1.2 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Rolls Royce U.K.'s state-owned car aircraft engine maker seek 250 mln stg multiple option facility provide additional source financing banking source said. They facility syndicate borrower's relationship bank ahead privatisation Rolls Royce April May. At borrower's request term disclose week banker expect syndication close. But term line market somewhat tight banker said. The banker note Rolls Royce's debt negligible privatisation want range financing arrangement available allow advantage market opportunity available. The financing involve 150 mln stg five-year commit tranche back uncommitted tender panel Rolls Royce able issue bill multi-currency advances. S.G. Warburg Co Ltd arranger financing banker said. REUTER 

The Treasury Department due release fund Brazilian Coffee Institute IBC pay coffee purchase local producer IBC statement. IBC production director Oripes Gomes statement payment official guarantee prices. The statement IBC send document National Monetary Council ask government budget purchase Institute five mln bag coffee June 30. Gomes statement problem concession fund Treasury payment coffee deliver IBC warehouse producers. He producer already deliver 2.2 mln bag 1.5 mln bag paid for. In future accord agreement sign Treasury Institute longer seek approval Treasury seek release additional fund buy coffee statement said. Reuter 

West German private bank late twist long-running battle size holding industry holding fall reject call tighter limit participations. Under West Germany's banking bank hold share non-banking company give seat company supervisory board administer holding shareholder safe custody accounts. Holdings 25 pct veto supervisory board company disclosed. "The claim concentration intensified Monopolies Commission therefore turn accurate ... There reason impose far legal restriction acquisition holding banks" said. The Association's letter late skirmish run battle bank range government office political lobby left right. The holding above 10 pct company nominal share capital mln mark held 10 bank fell 86 1986 129 1976 said. Of 43 reduction 41 represent holding 25 pct 1976. The banks' holding nominal share capital fell 1.70 billion mark 1986 1.34 billion adjust capital change past 10 1.80 billion 1976. Over period total West German nominal share capital rise 235 billion mark 136 billion hold bank German company fell 0.7 pct 1.3 pct. The nominal share capital list non-bank company rise estimate 49 billion mark 1986 35.58 billion 1976 banks' holding fall 1.57 billion mark 3.2 pct 1.61 billion mark 4.5 pct Association said. It argue bank representative minority supervisory board 100 big German company case block non-banking representatives. The survey cover Deutsche Bank AG DBKG.F> Dresdner Bank AG DRSD.F> Commerzbank AG CBKG.F> Bayerische Vereinsbank AG BVMG.F> Bayerische Hypotheken- und Wechsel-Bank AG BHWG.F>. It cover Berliner Handels- und Frankfurter Bank BHFG.F> Berliner Bank AG> Industriekreditbank AG> Vereins- und Westbank AG VHBG.F> Baden-Wuerttembergische Bank AG>. Deutsche hold large stake include 28.5 pct Daimler-Benz AG DAIG.F>. Criticism bank holding Monopolies Commission left-wing parties. An advisory commission report late Economics Ministry urge implementation five pct propose Monopolies Commission promote competition avoid conflicts. The Economics Ministry control liberal Free Democrat Party junior partner centre-right coalition government increasingly favour deregulation. Furthermore West German Supreme Court recently support action private Deutsche shareholder demand transparency bank's balance sheet. The shareholder argue bank's ability declare industrial stake 25 pct temporary holding evade statutory requirement report full. If bank declares stake temporary disclose include security holdings. The due heard Frankfurt high regional court. REUTER 

Shell Canada wholly own subsidiary Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD> raise crude oil price 47 Canadian ct barrel today. The increase riased post price Light sweet crude oil 21.95 dlrs barrel march level. Light sour crude raise 19.95 dlrs barrel company said. Reuter 

The staff Commodity Futures Trading Commission CFTC recommend regulatory agency approve Minneapolis Grain Exchange's application trade fructose corn syrup-55 HFCS-55 future contracts. The commission expect approve application meeting tomorrow. The propose contract provide delivery 48000 lb plus minus pct bulk HFCS-55 liquid food beverage sweetener produce process corn starch corn refiners. Under propose rule shipping certificate limited expires 30 day follow trading expire contract month. A premium charge 14.40 dlrs contract assess proposal. Reuter 

The World Bank intend bring borrowing forward half 1987 expect global rate rise World Bank vice president treasurer Eugene Rotberg said. He told news conference rate U.S. Japan West Germany Switzerland near lows. "The weight opinion (that now) high probability pct high pct low rates" said. The World Bank issue float rate note expectation high rates. The policy World Bank maintain liquidity level give bank flexibility decide borrow Rotberg said. Cash 50 pct years' anticipate net requirement comprise 25 pct outstanding debt 66 pct debt mature five years. Although World Bank pioneer swap market intend launch financial instrument sake innovation Rotberg said. Of total 74.5 billion dlrs debt outstanding eight billion swap currency. Many recent innovation either unfair investor unfair borrowers. Until World Bank confident adopt instruments. The World Bank raise 90 pct fund need method Rotberg said. However 10 pct requirement bank try instrument bond warrants. The World Bank publicly offer 60 bond Germany issue launch 1959 said. 

Comair Inc February load factor fell 34.6 pct 38.0 pct before. The company revenue passenger mile rise 9.5 pct 10.9 mln 9962399 available seat mile rise 20.3 pct 31.5 mln 26.2 mln. For date load factor fell 36.2 pct 40.3 pct revenue passenger mile rise 3.3 pct 119.1 mln 115.3 mln available seat mile rise 15.0 pct 328.5 mln 285.7 mln. Reuter 

ServiceMaster L.P. approve quarter cash distribution 58 ct payable April 10 record March 23. Previously ServiceMaster pay 1987 indicate cash distribution 1.50 dlrs share include 95 ct share paid April 15 1987. In action company May eight date annual shareholders' meeting. Reuter 

Disposable income available employ European Community agriculture rise 0.9 pct 1986 8.8 pct fall previous EC statistic agency Eurostat report. It income available farm holder work hold rise 2.5 pct 13.9 pct fall 1985. Eurostat reason increase high production 1.6 pct increase crop output 0.7 pct rise animal product compare 1985. However Eurostat add 1.6 pct fall price animal product offset 3.1 pct increase crops. It income change varied widely across EC 1986. Disposable income employ agriculture rise 12.9 pct West Germany fell 7.8 pct Denmark income available holder family rise 17.0 pct Britain fell 9.7 pct Ireland. Reuter 

OEA Inc receive division Rockwell International Inc ROK> contract design develop space shuttle egress slide post-mission land conditions. OEA Inflation Systems International Inc subsidiary produce ten post-landing emergency egress slides. The expect allow crew exit space shuttle hatch left crew's compartment said. "There show (the owners') reasonable investment-backed expectation materially affected additional duty retain percentage support structure protect (the law)" Justice John Paul Stevens write court's majority. He join Justices William Brennan Byron White Thurgood Marshall Harry Blackmun. However Chief Justice William Rehnquist join Justices Lewis Powell Sandra O'Connor Antonin Scalia argue law deprive owner constitutionally guaranteed protections. Reuter 

Wertheim Schroder Co Inc appoint Steven Kotler 40 president investment banking security firm. Wertheim Kotler manage director member executive committee firm 50 pct own Schroders PLC> United Kingdom 50 pct own Wertheim partners. Reuter 

The propose 757 mln dlr deal Chrysler Corp acquire American Motors Corp described analyst reasonable deal companies. Ronald Glantz Montgomery Securities AMC common stock fairly value "just five dlrs share" change brought tax reform Chrysler's offer pay dlrs share Chrysler stock AMC holder Renault "a price Chrysler. AMC common share open dlrs morning Renault-Chrysler announcement 3/8 Chrysler share lose 1/4 52-1/4. Though AMC issue statement say study propose buyout comment Glantz regard proposal "done deal" "I can't believe anybody else bid." "It's reasonable deal sides" analyst told Reuters. "Chrysler get jeep franchise (new AMC) Bramalea Ontario plant (new Renault) Premier (mid-sized car) AMC's sale buyer confidence manufacturer service products" Glantz said. Analyst Thomas O'Grady Chrysler get manufacturing capacity include brand-new plant Canada bargain price Renault get return prolong loss-making investment AMC. Reuter 

South Korean Foreign Trade Minister Rah Woon Bae country's firm agree buy 1.8 billion dlrs worth U.S. good two-week buying trip United States. Rah purchase represent shift Japanese firm U.S. firm South Korea's effort reduce seven billion dlr trade surplus United States. South Korea five billion dlr trade deficit Japan. Reuter 

Trust America Service Corp sign agreement First Union Bank Florida 35 mln dlr mortgage warehouse credit line. It agreement double previous 14 mln dlrs line credit. Reuter 

VTX Electronics Corp sign distribution agreement American Telephone Telegraph Co act agent ATT's electronic cable wire fiber-optic cable related product original equipment manufacturer Northeast. Terms contract reach ATT's Network Systems Group disclosed. Reuter 

Rolls Royce U.K.'s state-owned car aircraft engine maker seek 250 mln stg multiple option facility provide additional source financing banking source said. They facility syndicate borrower's relationship bank ahead privatisation Rolls Royce April May. At borrower's request term disclose week banker expect syndication close. But term line market somewhat tight banker said. Reuter 

Spectrum Digital Corp instal multi-node ISDX T-1 multiplexer. The company T-1 instal University North Carolina's Education Computing Service Research Triangle Park N.C. Reuter 

White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater President Reagan's record oppose tax hike "long strong" change. "We're oppose tax increases.... We fight tax increases.... We deal politically forum possible" Fitzwater question whether change administration's position. Fitzwater Reagan's strong feeling tax hike include opposition oil import fee. "The President's position oppose it" said. REUTER 

Supermarkets General Corp receive unsolicited proposal third party acquire company 41.75 dlrs share cash. Supermarkets retain Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc advise board director proposal. Supermarkets General currently 38.5 mln share outstanding. Its stock currently trading 34-1/4 New York Stock Exchange. The Woodbridge N.J. supermarket operator 180 supermarket specialty retail store convenience food store drug stores. For nine month end November 30 Supermarkets report net income 41.7 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Japanese crusher bought 5000 7000 tonne Canadian rapeseed export weekend April shipment trade source said. Japanese crusher continue concentrate rapeseed purchase convert high percentage oil oilseed said. A glut feed meal make oilseed soybean desirable add already meal stocks. Reuter 

Total U.S. slab zinc stock held smelter rise 24735 short ton February 22120 short ton January American Bureau Metal Statistics reported. Zinc production increase 26732 short ton February 25786 short ton January. Shipments smelters' plant decline 23560 short ton February 24564 short ton January. Reuter 

Jefferies Co Inc intend market stock Diamond Shamrock Corp distributed. Diamond Shamrock offer repurchase twenty miillion share common stock 17 dlrs share midnight EST March 9. Reuter 

Holiday Corp Holiday Inn Hotel Group soon introduce chain limited-service hotel international markets. The company chain launch initially Western Europe usually feature 60 150 guest room restuarant/lounge offer few service amenity typical Holiday Inn hotels. It hotel cater commercial traveler small city suburbs. Reuter 

Diamond Shamrock Offshore Partners start development drilling West Cameron 178 block Louisiana Gulf Mexico significant natural gas block. It discovery encounter 46 foot net natural gas pay. No flow test conduct said. Diamond Shamrock Offshore 46.15 pct block Phillips Petroleum Co 28.85 pct Santa Fe Energy Partners LP SFP> 25.00 pct. Diamond Shamrock Corp DIA> own 80.3 pct Diamond Shamrock Offshore. Reuter 

Lead stock held U.S. refiner rise 37295 short ton February 34224 short ton (revised higher) January American Bureau Metal Statistics reported. Production lead decrease 33619 short ton February 38759 short ton January. Shipments plant increase 30467 short ton February 27041 short ton (revised lower) January ABMS said. Reuter 

Technology Research Corp unidentified marketing company agree sell product place initial six mln dlrs. It company sell product protects serious electrical shock. The product sell mass merchandiser retail hardware store said. The company won additional contract worth 500000 dlrs boost total current backlog 14 mln dlrs. Reuter 

BCI Holdings Corp name Stephen Rowley president Day-Timers Inc subsidiary company's Beatrice Consumer Durables effective immediately. It replaces Robert Dorney founder former president remain senior vice president product development company produce management systems. Reuter 

The Federated Group Inc four-week March 1 sale total 25.7 mln dlrs eight pct period ago. The company sale 13 week end March 1 rise 11 pct 136.6 mln dlrs. In 52-weeks end March 1 sale total 430.2 mln dlrs 18 pct earlier company said. Reuter 

Wings West Airlines load factor remain constant February 42.7 pct. The company board 39812 passenger February 22141 ago. Revenue passenger mile February total 6146787 51.8 pct ago available seat mile rise 62.2 pct 14385113 company said. Reuter 

Sharon Steel Corp extend March six March 31 expiration date debt exchange offer allow complete sale Mueller Brass Co unit meet condition offer. The exchange offer cover Sharon's outstanding 13.5 pct subordinate sinking fund debenture due 2000 14.25 pct subordinate sinking fund debenture due 1990. Sharon March six 31.6 pct 13.5 pct note 20.9 pct 14.25 pct note tendered. The Mueller sale condition receipt 80 pct notes. Reuter 

U.K. Insurers 30 mln stg insurance claim follow Zeebrugge ferry disaster spokesman Lloyds London said. It week extent compensation claim passenger crew cargo know know ship salvage David Larner Lloyds. The hull machinery Herald Free Enterprise value 25 mln stg insured Townsend Thoresen's parent company Peninsular Oriental Steam Navigation Co Plc PORL.L>. The vessel turn reinsure London market Lloyds various company Larner said. Passengers crew cargo insured Standard Steamship Protection Indemnity Association shipowners' mutual insurance fund worldwide. These underwritten Lloyds companies. Larner claim passenger expect total five mln stg death normal level liability Athens Convention 1974 30000 stg 50000 death. Shipping source claim soar court found negligence design fault involved. Larner estimate compensation claim "were pure guess work" time. But ship salvage claim total 30 mln stg. Shares insurance London stock exchange fell across board generally weak market. General Accident fell 21p 936 Royal Insurance drop 18p 966 Prudential fell 9p 888. P O share stood late 616 27p low day. REUTER 

Engineering industry employer North Rhine-Westphalia unprecedented offer pay work hours. The offer amid warn strike 33000 worker World War Two employer propose cut work hour see avert repeat nationwide strike 1984 brought auto industry standstill seven week union source said. The employer propose half-hour cut 38.5 hour work week July 1 1988 pay rise 2.7 pct April 1 far 1.5 pct July 1 1988. The engineering union IG Metall Europe's large union want five pct wage rise 35-hour week full pay. It call today's warn strike mostly involve stoppage hour 50 round talk December failed. The employers' offer see break deadlock negotiation union half-hour cut union source said. The offer applies worker North Rhine-Westphalia unclear far offer present talk union employer West German states. REUTER 

Citibank NA> cut British base lending rate 10.5 pct 11 pct effect tomorrow. This move follow similar cut major British clearing bank lead National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L>. Lower rate signal Bank England morning attempt curb recent upward pressure pound market source said. REUTER 

Crane Co redeem March 31 75 mln dlrs outstanding 8-3/4 pct convertible senior debenture due October 1 2005 107.875 pct. It accrue March 31 paid date holder record March 15. The debenture convert common stock 28.80 dlrs share March 24. Reuter 

Oglethorpe Power Corp plan raise electric rate cover high construction cost Alvin W. Vogtle Nuclear Plant Oglethorpe hold 30 pct interest. Earlier Southern Co's SO> Georgia Power Co raise estimate cost building plant nearly six pct roughly 8.87 billion dlrs. Oglethope share increase cost amount 147.5 mln dlrs. "We plan raise rate 39 Electric Membership Corporations serve 1987 result budget increase" company said. Reuter 

The Bank Zambia paid foreign exchange arrears auction conduct bank spokesman said. "We clear auction left worth eight mln dlrs" spokesman specify amount paid out. The bank paid foreign exchange private firm suspend weekly auction January 28. It auction suspend plan introduce modify talk World Bank International Monetary Fund. President Kenneth Kaunda announce month auction retain allocate foreign exchange approve private sector bidder determine kwacha's exchange rate. Last week auction run trouble shortage foreign exchange. The government fix exchange rate nine kwacha dollar effectively revalue kwacha 67.7 pct. REUTER 

A investor lead Melvyn Gelch Providence R.I. surgeon told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 60840 share Datarex Systems Inc 5.5 pct total outstanding common stock. The Gelch bought stake 935000 dlrs investment purpose only. Reuter 

Amoskeag Co> Joseph B. Ely II become chairman addition duty chief executive officer succeed Albert B. Hunt serve position 1972. It James M. Fitzgibbons currently executive vice president chief operating officer beomce president position Ely held. Reuter 

The Ghana Cocoa Board purchase 1323 tonne cocoa 21st week end February 26 1986/87 main crop season compare 1961 tonne previous week 1344 tonne 21st week end March six 1985/86 season board said. Cumulative purchase season stand 216095 tonne 201966 tonne purchase 21st week season Board said. Reuter 

Barton Valve Co Inc shareholder annual meeting approve name change Barton Industries Inc reduction board size five. Reuter 

Wm. Wrigley Jr Co expect cost technological improvement renovation project push 1987's capital expenditure considerably year's 25.4 mln dlrs President William Wrigley told annual meeting. In 1985 company's spending total 26.8 mln dlrs. He pace company's marketing activity 1986 continue advertising merchandising expenditure exceed 1986 level Wrigley "somewhat 100 mln dlrs." Wrigley product line extension continue 1987 company immediate plan venture area outside chew gum. He Wrigley's overall share gum market "a little 50 pct." In answer question Wrigley buyout offer company. He company continue strengthen international presence. Reuter 

The follow import levy raw sugar effective tomorrow European currency unit (ecu) 100 kilos. White sugar denature non-denatured 49.70 versus 50.05 previously. Raw sugar denature non-denatured 41.35 versus 41.35 previously. The rate raw base 92 pct yield. Reuter 

Leon Greenblatt Chicago investor told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 89450 share Technology Development Corp 5.3 pct total outstanding common stock. Greenblatt bought stock 350000 dlrs soley investment intention seek control company. Reuter 

A brokerage executive 25.25 pct stake cumulative convertible prefer stock Piezo Electric Products Inc seek seat company's board directors. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Providence Securities Inc Providence R.I. brokerage firm executive seek seat open dividend payment default prefer holders. The firm president Thomas DePetrillo vice president Vincent DiGuilio seek additional representation company's board. The Cambridge Mass. research firm default dividend prefer holder January 31 automatically give prefer holder elect director executive said. The firm executive hold combine 104500 prefer share originally bought stake investment try motivate company reinstate dividends. DePetrillo propose prefer conversion rate change 85-to-one 10-to-one dividend cut 10 ct share 1.10 dlrs. Reuter 

Vneshtorgbank Soviet Foreign Trade bank seek increase 250 mln stg original 150 mln five sterling bankers' acceptance facility arrange autumn Lloyds Merchant Bank Ltd arranger. The facility 10 basis facility fee 15 basis maximum cap margin. Banking source syndication increase proceed syndication necessarily confine bank participate original group. Banking source reason increase Vneshtorgbank impressed relatively low cost financing mean eligible bill traditional instrument price relation London Interbank Offered Rates (LIBOR). The facility Vneshtorgbank's sterling-denominated bankers' acceptance facility. Banking source note Vneshtorgbank facility market First Chicago Ltd award mandate week arrange 200 mln dlr eight loan 1/8 LIBOR. Reuter 

CheckRobot Inc recieved mln dlrs financing private placement convertible prefer stock. It 2.8 mln dlrs financing already fund exist shareholder Sensormatic Electronics Corp> Southeast Venture Capital Limited II>. Reuter 

Tracor Inc Tracor Aerospace Inc unit won follow-up contract worth 1.9 mln dlrs U.S. Air Force. It unit conduct special study modification system component flight test Peacekeeper Missle. Tracor previously receive 49.3 mln dlrs worth contract defense program. Reuter 

University Patents Inc 4344 Aleges soft bifocal contract lens sell February allowance exchange return 3011 January. It 1800 opthalmologists optometrist fitting product month 1600 month before. Sales lens start May 1986. Reuter 

WearEver-ProctorSilex Inc relocate corporate headquarters Chillicothe Richmond Va. begin fall end 1988. The company Richmond chosen centrally locate main operating facility reduce travel costs. About 150 headquarters employee offer chance relocate company said. WearEver's cookware plant Chillicothe move sale marketing office remain Englewood N.J. Reuter 

Angio-Medical Corp> file Securities Exchange Commission initial offering 1666667 unit share common redeemable warrant buy share common six dlrs unit. It Keane Securities Co Inc KEAN> underwriter. The company security propose trading NASDAQ symbol ANGMU>. Reuter 

Bear Stearns Cos Inc relocate Wall Street headquarters mid-town location Park Ave. sign lease Olympia York>. The firm occupy 537000 square begin January 1988 15 lease. It begin move office year. It space accommodate increase personnel grown 30 pct firm October 1985. It centralize executive office location. Reuter 

Harris Associates L.P. Chicago investment advisory firm cut stake Cyclops Corp 437425 share 11.1 pct total outstanding common stock 524775 share 13.3 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Harris sell 87350 Cyclops common share Jan 6 March 2 price range 65.75 91.00 dlrs share. Harris dealing Cyclops common stock behalf advisory clients. Reuter 

Lotus Development Corp receive 30 mln dlr Micro D Inc Lotus software products. It large receive deliver six months. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp value propose buyout American Motors Corp 757 mln dlrs counting effect contingent payment reach 350 mln dlrs base AMC's future profits. A Chrysler spokesman told Reuters letter intent sign Renault AMC's control shareholder 46.2 pct direct stake include provision Renault paid 35 mln dlrs cash AMC's finance subsidiary 200 mln dlrs form eight pct note. He maturity note. Reuter 

Dart Group DARTA> likely seek buy Supermarkets General SGL> analyst said. "There's rumor they've take position company Wood Gundie analyst Edward Comeau. Last Dart Group owner Auto Trak INc Crown Books compete Kohlberg Kravis acquire Safeway Stores INc. The company reach accord buy 20 pct company Kohlberg Kravis complete leveraged buyout company. The company sell 20 pct stock 180 mln 200 mln dlrs accord analysts. Dart Group Corp immediately available comment. Jerry Ballan analyst Conner Ballan division Edward Viner Co "They Dart> rumor buying supermarket Stop Shop." "My guess Supermarkets General bought out" Ballan. Analysts Supermarkets General face problem due Purity Supreme Rickels operation difficult thwart bid. Supermarkets General expect report 1.70 dlrs share compare 1.73 dlrs share report 1985 post stock split basis. For quarter Comeau predicts company earn 39 ct share 35 ct share ago earn 2.05 dlrs 1987. "But estimation 1.80 dlrs easily due Purity Supreme New England" Comeau said. He competition supermarket get heat company difficulty integrate Purity Supreme Pathmark store operations. Rickels center face problem due industry report low return operating unit accord analysts. Analysts Dart buy Supermarkets General probably divest company's operations. Analyst Comeau "supermarkets seek combination supermarket company." 

ADVO-System Inc report break quarter end March 28 1987 compare loss 1.8 mln dlrs 16 ct share fiscal 1986's quarter end March 29 1986. ADVO previously announce report net loss quarter. Reuter 

National Franchisors Inc franchise development consult launch project Shoesmith shoe-care repair shop. The company negotiate shopping center location initial franchise site soon pilot Shoesmith shop training center. It sign agreement Sutton-Landis Shoe Machinery Co> St. Louis supply franchise machinery support services. Reuter 

British Airports Authority Plc> privatise seek 200 mln stg multiple option facility banking source said. The facility incorporate 100 mln stg revolve standby credit 50 mln stg swingline credit available seven years. There uncommitted tender panel issue sterling multi-currency advance sterling acceptances. A minimum 65 pct revolve credit immediately available facility fee six basis points. Up 35 pct revolve credit available subject month notification. There facility fee basis point utilised fee rise six basis points. Drawings 10 basis point London Interbank Offered Rate plus mandatory liquid asset requirement 10 basis sterling acceptance commission. The swingline available maximum seven days. There participation fee five basis point 12.5 mln stg. The financing arrange Samuel Montagu Co Ltd syndicate restrict basis borrower's relationship banks. REUTER 

This pickup U.S. economic growth inflation Shadow Open Market Committee semi-annual policy statement. The SOMC basically "monetarist" private economist "economic growth accelerate 1987 response powerful stimulative action Federal Reserve." The Fed's action excessive. As result "inflation ultimately recession loom horizon." The SOMC central bank policy rely progressively large swing monetary expansion lead sustainable economic growth stable prices. The specific nominal forecast economic inflation growth policy statement. However Committee Sunday policy-making meeting basically accord projection Jerry Jordan member SOMC economist First Interestate Bancorp. Jordan expect real GNP growth percentage high past years. He expect consumer price rise 4-1/2 pct year. The SOMC recent month rapid money growth principal cause devaluation. To avoid costly inflation disinflation SOMC urge Fed "abandon inflationary policy growth rate monetary base path sustain low inflation." The Fed February longer target narrow M-1 money supply link M-1 economic growth largely severed. 

London Stock Exchange official feel confident problem arise New York Stock Exchange NYSE rule limit trading activity London NYSE solve London Exchange spokeswoman said. The situation sort regular contact exchange added. Recent press report raise possibility NYSE rule bar trading jointly list stock London Exchange hour NYSE open. London plan close trading floor due course NYSE recognises foreign exchange posse trading floor. 

The Dutch current account surplus fell 5.4 billion guilder provisional 12.1 billion guilder Finance Ministry statement. The surplus expect fall far 1987 statement give details. Earlier official planning agency CPB expect surplus fall six billion guilder 1987. The visible good surplus exclude energy fell 5.6 billion guilder 1986 11.4 billion due decline term exchange good import consumer spending investment increased. While energy trade balance surplus rise 5.4 billion guilder 4.7 billion gain cause temporary improvement term exchange aid delay fall oil gas prices. The current account show 5.2 billion guilder deficit invisibles compare balance 1985 Finance Ministry note surplus transport service reduce substantially due low dollar oil price falls. The fourth quarter current account show deficit 1980 700 mln guilder said. REUTER 

Honeybee Inc know reason recent rise stock price. "There corporate development announce unannounced" company statement. "Business continue usual" add engage merger acquisition discussions. The company's stock trading 2-1/8 point 14-1/4. Honeybee plan release month preliminary financial result end January 30. Reuter 

Consolidated Grandview Inc acquire 60 pct stake All Ticket Group PLC> London undisclosed terms. The seller undisclosed. All Ticket special event travel company exclusive European right UAL Inc UAL>'s United Airlines Apollo book United Airlines flight Britain Europe. All Ticket subsidiary co-sponsor various event include British Open golf tournament rowing's Henley Regatta. Its 1986 revenue total 12 mln Canadian dlrs. Reuter 

United Cities Gas Co acquire Lyle Propane Gas Co Cairo Ga. propane gas distributor undisclosed terms. It Lyle sale mln gallon annually serf 4000 customer seven county southwest Georgia north Florida. Reuter 

The U.S. Treasury's weekly auction expect produce average rate 5.63-65 pct three-month bill 5.59-61 pct six-month bill dealer said. Shortly auction bill rate outstanding three-month bill unchanged 5.64 pct bid rate six-month bill basis high 5.68 pct bid. Reuter 

The board Medical Properties Inc declare initial monthly cash dividend 11-1/2 ct share adopt monthly dividend policy. The initial dividend payable April 10 shareholder record March 31. Reuter 

Barter Resources form television shopping unit Television Catalogue Inc. The company investor paid 500000 dlrs funding 51 pct unit. Barter 100000 dlrs funding paid balance due sixty days. Reuter 

wheat Ria Luna 20000 mt Norrkoping Djuron/EC Mexico 12.50 dlrs option load Uddevalla 50 cent 4000/1500 16-23/3 Continental. Reference New York Grain Freights 2 March 6 broker charterer Saturn US Gulf Japan report Nordstrom Thulin Antigone report arrange Tilbury Black Sea Soviet charterers. Reuter 

Air Wis Services Inc February load factor fell 42.9 pct 44.2 pct before. The company revenue passenger mile rise 2.1 pct 22.2 mln 21.7 mln available seat mile 5.3 pct 51.8 mln 49.2 mln. Reuter 

Immucor Inc board director declare five-for-four stock split form 25 pct stock dividend payable April 15 shareholder record March 27. Reuter 

Bermuda Star Line Inc agree principle acquire 815-passenger SS Liberte Barnstead Shipping Ltd New York/Montreal "Northeast Passages" cruise start summer. The company work conclude lease financing financing purchase 23500 ton vessel deliver April rename Canada Star. Terms disclosed. Reuter 

Municipal Assistance Corp New York plan offering week 670 mln dlrs Series 62 bond probably tap market third quarter. The bond sell syndicate lead Salomon Brothers Inc. Their maturity pricing. Proceeds redeem outstanding Series 50 53 54 bond final maturity 2008 bearing 10 pct 9-7/8 pct 9-3/8 pct. Municipal Assistance buy 102 Series 50 bond July 1994 Series 53 54 bond July 1995. Reuter 

MTS Acquisition Corp's> 28-dlr-per-share offering price Caesars World Inc low likely attract suitor hotel/casino company industry analyst said. "I someone else probably (MTS) raise bid" Marvin Roffman analyst Janney Montgomery Scott Inc. MTS company form Martin Sosnoff Caesars World's large shareholder tender offer value 725.2 mln dlrs share Sosnoff doesn't already own. "I offer low five points" Roffman described Caesars World operator "one fine casino world." Sosnoff New York investor already own 13.3 pct Caesars World's 30.3 mln shares. Following news tender offer Caesars World's share trading 27-7/8 3-3/8. A Caesars World spokesman company decline comment Sosnoff move moment Caesars issue statement study offer. Roffman Caesars World considerable growth potential forecasting fiscal 1988 earnings dlrs share. Caesars World own casino hotel Nevada honeymoon resort Pennsylvania's Pocono Mountains. It control Caesars New Jersey Inc CJN> own Atlantic City N.J. casino hotel. For fiscal end July 31 Caesars World report net income 41 mln dlrs 1.36 dlrs primary share. The company report quarter net income 12.6 mln dlrs 41 ct share compare income 7.5 mln dlrs 25 ct share earlier. Daniel Lee analyst Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc Sosnoff's relatively low bid attract suitor willing pay high price Caesars little likelihood compete bid start battle company. 

Merck Co Inc spend 530 mln dlrs research development 11 pct 480 mln dlrs spent 1986 research development. Reuter 

Allegheny International Inc chairman chief operating officer remain position follow merger company affiliate First Boston Corp. "It expect Oliver S. Travers continue chairman president Chief executive officer Thomas J. Albani continue chief operating officer" Allegheny spokesman. Allegheny agree buyout First Boston 24.60 dlrs share. The transaction value 500 mln dlrs. Its stock rise 8-5/8 24 active trading. Reuter 

Imperial Continental Gas Association ICGS.L> IC Gas board make recommendation partial tender offfer 710p share announce Tractebel SA> Groupe Bruxelles Lambert SA>. At board recommend offer share price 710p statement added. Shareholders wonder whether tender either Tractebel consortium rival 700p share partial offer SHV Holdings NV> consult professional advisers. Reuter 

ALC Communication Services Inc Allnet Communications Corp consolidate data center relocate Southfield Michigan office center. The facility employ 300 expect absorb employee exist center Birmingham Chicago company spokesman said. Start-up consolidated computer data center expect late June said. Reuter 

National Heathcare Inc sign agreement sell five rural hospital private corporation 18 mln dlrs include assumption six mln dlrs debt. The company plan complete sale subject various regulatory approval July. National Healthcare expect material gain loss sale substantially proceeds reduce debt. Reuter 

USX Corp chairman David Roderick call low value U.S. dollar currency speed correction U.S. trade deficit reach 170 billion dlrs. In remark prepared speech Economic Club Detroit Roderick "There total resolve dollar versus major currency currency nation have substantial trade surplus continue decline correction trade deficit start road recovery." Roderick U.S. understand "economic pain" trading partner experience result fall dollar. But add "As painful correction trading partner painful leave uncorrected lead inevitable lengthy steep recession." Roderick February 1985 December 1986 dollar fell 40 pct real term major industrial currency 30 35 pct broader currency nearly develop nations. At 1986 value foreign asset U.S. exceed value U.S. asset abroad 240 billion dlrs compare five ago U.S. surplus asset 141 billion. A company spokesman data provide economic consultant USX. The primary reason trade imbalance 70 pct rise dollar 1980 1985 factor involve Roderick said. But wrong "to attribute massive trade deficit fundmental deterioration U.S. productivity American product quality." These area improve root cause trade gap Roderick said. He urge American manufacturer competitive compete global markets. In speech USX chairman call change security law curb call abuse corporate raider speculators. Among proposal present Senate Banking Committee testimony week requirement raider 24-hour notice pct stock acquire company. Roderick propose tender offer cash stockholder equal term raider require financing tender made. Further raider require all-cash tender offer acquire 10 pct target company's stock said. And payment greenmail preferential price target company buy raider's stake prohibit revise laws. Roderick change necessary curb abuse law hurt financial market discourage "fair price all" takeovers. Reuter 

Utilization offshore mobile rig Gulf Mexico unchanged 35.6 pct past week level remain relatively steady January due largely reduction nine rig Gulf fleet Offshore Data Services said. The total work rig 83 week compare 83 week 129 rig ago. Offshore Data Services worldwide utilization rate fell 0.3 pct 53.9 pct total 335 idle rigs. The rig contract worldwide 392. In European-Mediterranean rig utilization remain unchanged 41.3 pct past week 64 155 rig contracted. Reuter 

Canadian Pacific Ltd fourth quarter 1986 operating profit rise 91.6 mln dlrs 30 ct share 50.7 mln dlrs 20 ct share ago. The statement confirm release preliminary earnings figure company release February. A 102.6 mln dlr gain sale CP's Cominco Ltd help raise final 1986 fourth quarter profit 193.8 mln dlrs 65 ct share. The company drop 1986 full-year operating profit 150.1 mln dlrs restate 252.7 mln dlrs 1985 due mainly low oil prices. The company CP Rail division report 1986 net income 119.4 mln dlrs compare 133.4 mln dlrs 1985. It grain traffic recover drought-affected level ago offset weakness traffic area increase expenses. It net loss Soo Line increase 33.5 mln dlrs loss 8.7 mln dlrs loss 1985 mainly due restructuring charges. Canadian Pacific favorable development include reduce bulk shipping loss result recovery tanker market turnaround forest product sector. Reuter 

U.S. drilling activity slow significantly Texas Oklahoma week result U.S. active rotary rig plunge 35 total 766 1212 work rig ago Hughes Tool Co. said. Most decrease rig onshore drilling drop total 671 week's 707. A total 78 rig active offshore 17 work inland water week Hughes Tool said. Among individual Texas lose 23 work rig Oklahoma drop 13 Louisiana New Mexico drop one. Wyoming Kansas California report gain six five rig respectively. In Canada rig count 16 180 398 ago. Reuter 

Ford Motor Co's stock rise 1-1/4 82-1/4 analyst Maryann Keller Furman Selz Mager Dietz Birney raise earnings estimate company trader said. Keller expect company's 1987 earnings rise 13.50-to-14 dlrs share compare 12.32 dlrs share earn year. She Ford's already market share expect remain favorable earnings overseas expect improve. In addition Keller company sell expensive model car profitable. The non-automotive operation include Ford Motor Credit expect post improve earnings year. Keller expect company split stock raise dividend dlrs share year. She note Chrysler Corp's C> announcement merger proposal American Motors Corp AMO> short term effect Ford cut Ford's share truck market term. Reuter 

Italy show British crop wheat recently actual volume book Italian buyer trader said. They purchase 50000 tonne Sept/Dec shipment transact start year. Italian interior market active recent week trader 200000 tonne trade dealer consumers. Some cover market possibly trader said. Reuter 

Dutch food retailer Ahold NV AHLN.AS> expect unchanged profit 1987 advantage low dollar expand far U.S. Turnover grow net profit expect remain 1986 level 132.4 mln guilder due high Dutch tax three-year expansion plan Ahold Chairman Albert Heijn told news conference. The profit forecast allows dollar rate current level guilders. Turnover net profit 1986 hit dollar fell average 2.46 guilder 3.35 1985. Reuter 

Flying Tigers expand air cargo route include Asia-to-Europe jetfreighter flights. The company launch jetfreighter service Milan Italy. Both route operate weekly. Reuter 

Pitt-Des Moines Inc receive qualify opinion auditor 1986 1985 financial statements. It qualification related inability determine effect final resolution suit file Washington Public Power Supply System>. The 1985 suit dismiss 1986 low court action ultimate outcome matter uncertain Washington Public Power appeal U.S. Court Appeals. Reuter 

Reading Co agree principle convey property own Philadelphia Convention Center site city Philadelphia Philadelphia Convention Center Authority. It exchange receive 23 mln dlrs cash right acquire 22 acre adjacent Philadelphia International Airport option acquire development right Gallery II shopping mall Market Street downtown Philadelphia. Reading responsible demolition cleanup property portion cash proceeds escrowed. The company continue operate Reading Terminal Market Philadelphia. The land give amount seven acrease include Reading Terminal Train Shed said. Reuter 

Montedison SpA MONI.MI> acquire 70 pct stake Plant Cell Research Institute - PCRI> California Atlantic Richfield Co ARC.N> "several ten million dollars" senior Montedison executive said. Renato Ugo member Montedison's management committee told reporter Stanford Research Institute International> Menlo Park California act partner purchase acquire stake PCRI 10 pct. PCRI base Dublin California biotechnology research laboratory. Ugo price paid include outlay laboratory technology staff. He negotiation biotechnology company health care diagnostics sector Montedison's health care subsidiary Erbamont NV> give details. "We hope conclude end" said. Montedison currently invests 30 billion lira biotechnology research expect increase figure 50 billion lira years. Reuter 

The London Meat Futures Exchange LMFE cease trading deliverable pigmeat contract April 3 LMFE said. The move enable exchange concentrate cash settle contract introduce year. "This allows exchange concentrate marketing pig live cattle contracts" LMFE official Peter Freeman said. "These already show effectiveness hedge trade contract increasing" added. "Using future market allows planning forward price fix industry needs" chairman Pat Elmer said. Some 131 pig contract settle Meat Livestock Commission's Average All Pigs Price February represent hedge 13000 pig twice cash-settled January LMFE said. Cash settlement cattle pig contract introduce June expectation appeal future market farmer abattoir user meat increase absence delivery requirement. Reuter 

White House communication director John Koehler resign week job say President Reagans' chief staff Howard Baker appoint team. Koehler hire replace Patrick Buchanan Reagan's communication chief day Donald Regan quit president's top aide. "I don't feel I've jerked ... I recognize Senator Baker 22 month he's know understands he's comfortable comfortable him" Koehler appearance White House press room. Reuter 

A senior Iraqi official Iran exaggerated report fight Gulf northern front failure south encourage anti-Baghdad Kurdish rebel support troops. The defence ministry political department Abdul Jabbar Muhsen told Reuters telephone interview fight continue Kurdistan mountain region Iran launch northern offensive Tuesday night. Asked silence Iraqi communique battle "Small unit take big brigade size. 

TCN Inc> distance phone service complete instal state-of-the-art switch system. TCN building fiber optic transmission network initially link San Antonio Austin Dallas Houston Texas. TCN service expand quarter 1987 include service California Florida. Reuter 

The USDA's weekly export inspection report expect show decline soybean export steady slightly low corn wheat export accord CBT floor traders' forecasts. Traders project soybean export 15 mln 16 mln bushel 20.3 mln bushel week ago 25.5 mln bushel ago. Corn guess range 20 mln 25 mln bushel compare 21.9 mln bushel week ago 28.2 mln ago. Wheat guess range 13 mln 18 mln bushel compare 14.1 mln bushel week ago 17.9 mln ago. Reuter 

Two eurosterling bond launch make total 10 deal sector month borrower rush cash bull sterling market fuel strength pound pre-budget euphoria. The Bank England finally give 1/2 cut banks' base lending rate earlier dealer largely discount likely detract current popularity sterling-denominated investments. "Sterling shape form flavor month we're eurosterling deals" dealer said. Today's eurosterling bond 10-year 100 mln stg deal Sweden 9-1/2 pct price 101-1/4 pct lead Baring Brothers Co Ltd 14 60 mln stg convertible deal Storehouse Plc launch SBCI International Ltd. "We proverbial flood deal 14 month seem March beat February hand 10 already" eurosterling specialist said. "Optically psychologically single figure attractive borrower. Eurosterling look cheap attractive raise money" added. This account wide variety borrower tapped sector recently range sovereign Kingdom Sweden continental bank include Commerzbank Deutsche Bank British corporations. Another U.K. Merchant bank analyst note current vogue eurosterling enable corporate borrower month offer paper price below comparative gilt yields. A Storehouse official confirm issue aim Swiss German investor show interest. This entry term international capital market Storehouse British designer Terence Conran's retail conglomerate incorporates U.K. Chain store Mothercare British Home Stores Habitat. "We consider move quite current strength eurosterling sector provide perfect opportunity spur finally tap market" Lance Moir corporate treasurer Storehouse Plc told Reuters. 

McDonnell Douglas Corp recent talk Airbus Industries joint development production jetliner European aircraft manufacturing consortium informal. "If talk casual best" source company. "There lead immediate near-term collaboration" plane. Senior official aerospace firm's St. Louis headquarters unable comment specifically weekend publish report Europe talk joint venture resume broke fall. McDonnell Douglas Airbus spring summer discuss jointly develop building long-range aircraft compete Boeing Co BA> 747 wide-body jetliner successor. Talks end neither want forego plan launch widebody jetliner project - McDonnell Douglas MD-11 Airbus A340. McDonnell Douglas launch MD-11 jetliner successor DC-10 100 order options. Airbus want launch spring seek customer long-range A340 companion plane shorter-range A330. "I don't we're interested collaboration benefit McDonnell Douglas give anything" source told Reuters. "There haven't in-depth discussions." He joint venture affect MD-11 already underway. McDonnell Douglas month claimed Airbus try overturn pledge airline buy MD-11 offering cut-rate price A340. The firm Airbus effort line customer launch engage "predatory practices" price substantially below need recover cost develop building plane. U.S. government aerospace industry official believe Airbus offer low price consortium get government subsidy cover costs. The Reagan Administration decide month consult General Agreement Tariff Trade GATT determine whether Airbus unfairly subsidized. Under GATT rule enterprise subsidize profit. U.S. official Airbus country pour 15 billion dlrs Airbus 1970's consortium yet profit. Reuter 

The volume European export South Africa carry container line vessel decline 40 pct British shipping executive Antony Butterwick said. Butterwick told reporter despite drop low freight rate shipping conference head increase frequency sailing South Africa "very strong act faith confidence" country's future. He chairman Europe South South-East African Conference Lines joint manage director P O Containers Ltd. A statement issue conference frequency Southern Africa/Europe container service sailing increase nine seven days. "This positive development shipping front South Africa main trading partner Europe service operate weekly" said. Reuter 

European consortium Airbus Industrie> comment press report resume talk U.S. McDonnell Douglas Corp.> joint development production airliners. A spokesman Airbus headquarters Toulouse telephone interview: "We knowledge talk comment make." Talks broke autumn rival fail agree cooperation long-range jet. McDonnell Douglas want Airbus build MD-11 Airbus insist McDonnell drop MD-11 cooperate A340. Reuter 

Mathematical Applications Group Inc sign letter intent sell operating propose plan liquidation follow sale. If company unsuccessful obtain approval need sale liquidation company require initiate reorganization proceeding federal bankruptcy law facilitie distribution assets. Mathematical Applications tentatively agree sell direct marketing Pagex Inc 400000 dlrs plus amount equal work capital closing 1.7 mln dlr note payable installment six years. Mathematical Applications business' work capital estimate 600000 dlrs. Pagex form Paul A. Goldner owner Pagex Systems Inc engage direct marketing computer service business. Mathematical Applications tentative agreement call Pagex buy substantially asset liability related direct marketing continue Mathematical Applications name. It sale subject renegotiation real estate lease approval definitive agreement company's board stock holder debenture holders. The company obtain waiver holder six mln dlrs principal amount debenture due March 31 1993 defer payment aggregate 270000 dlrs March 31 1987. The company seek waiver defer payment due March 31 enable company accomplish propose sale operations. Mathematical Applications talk debenture holder landlord lessor equipment marketing operation holder liability assume Pagex arrange distribution asset propose sale add asset significantly liabilities. The company obtain waiver holder six mln dlrs principal amount debenture due March 31 1993 defer payment aggregate 270000 dlrs March 31 1987. The company seek waiver defer payment due March 31 accomplish propose sale operations. Mathematical Applications talk debenture holder landlord lessor equipment marketing operation holder liability Pages assume arrange distribution asset propose sale add asset significantly liabilities. As distribution asset company expect shareholder receive amount base bid price company's stock 1/16 March five. Reuter 

With death Sen. Edward Zorinsky (D-Neb.) Midwestern grain farmer lose ally senior post Senate Agriculture Committee fought hard cutback farm benefits. Zorinsky's passing trim Democrats' majority Senate change makeup Senate farm panel. Zorinsky die heart attack Friday second-ranking Democrat Senate Agriculture Committee chairman crucial subcommittee agricultural production stabilization prices. Once Republican Zorinsky fiscal conservative. But outspoken critic Reagan administration proposal trim target price death gird push mandatory supply controls. If Melcher decides continue chairman subcommittee agricultural research conservation forestry legislation Democrats crack vacate chairmanship. By seniority senator David Pryor (Ark.) David Boren (Okla.) Howell Heflin (Ala.) Tom Harkin (D-Iowa) forceful advocate mandatory supply controls. Reuter 

Financial Corp America's American Savings Loan Association complete previously announce purchase 16 retail saving branch Great Western Financial Corp's GWF> Great Western Savings. American Savings purchase boost deposit 550 mln dlrs affect asset base. Reuter 

American Soviet arm negotiator resume talk curb medium-range nuclear missile tomorrow U.S. Spokesman said. The negotiation nuclear space arm formally recess seventh round Friday. But side agree deal Intermediate Nuclear Forces (INF) continue follow proposal introduce week superpower deep cut weapons. Reuter 

Central banker generally satisfied response Paris accord week ago stabilize currency current levels. Speaking meeting Bank International Settlements (BIS) review agreement welcome rate cut France today's drop British rates. One top official rate cut stimulate growth generally Europe welcome country West Germany see help sustain economy. The central banker spoke condition name meeting governor Group 10 country heard report Michel Camdessus manage director International Monetary Fund IMF's late assessment debt crisis. In particular discuss Brazil's debt moratorium. But urgency Brazil appeal bridging loan BIS central banks. Reuter 

Union Carbide Corp file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission cover 250 mln dlrs senior subordinate note due 1994 250 mln dlrs convertible subordinate debenture due 2012. The note callable 1992 underwritten First Boston Corp. First Boston co-lead underwriter Morgan Stanley Co debenture convertible Union Carbide common prior maturity unless previously redeemed. Union Carbide proceeds issue repay debt incur connection recapitalization plan unveiled November 1986. The plan aim reduce debt level expense strengthen chemical company's finance increase operating flexibility. Reuter 

The Student Loan Marketing Association price 300 mln dlr short-term float rate note offer par yield 25 basis point above bond-equivalent yield 91-day Treasury bill. Sallie Mae previously note settlement March 12 due Sept 10 1987 reset follow weekly T-bill auction. When-issued trading expect begin 0930 hr EST tomorrow said. Sallie Mae generally offer short-term float rate note month. Reuter 

Johnson Products Co Inc complete sale Debbie's School Beauty Culture Inc asset Ultra Precise Beauty Boutique Inc management. It sale price 2533000 dlrs consist 700000 dlrs cash secure promissory note 1506000 dlrs forgiveness debt 327000 dlrs owe Johnson Products Debbie's School. Reuter 

A newly form credit rating agency base London EuroRatings Ltd begin provide evaluation quality eurobond offering include first-ever rating U.K. And Irish clearing banks. The agency already publish rating 90 issue 45 euromarket issuers. Among bank issue rat publicly long-term debt security LLoyd's Bank PLC Allied Irish Banks Bank Ireland Bank Scotland. Shareholders firm Fitch Investors Service inc U.S.-based rating agency Compagnie Belge D'Assurance- Credit S.A. A credit insurance firm subsidiary Societe Generale de Belgique. Reuter 

Eli Lilly Co obtain approval U.S. Food Drug Adminstration market natural sequence human growth hormone humatrope recombinant DNA technolgoy. The company humatrope identical chemistry structure growth hormone produce human body. It commercially available biosysnthetic human growth hormone identical naturally-occurring growth hormone accord company. It humatrope indicate term treatment child growth failure due inadequate secretion body's normal growth hormone. Humatrope join humulin human insulin Eli Lilly Co's line human health care product recombinant DNA origin. Reuter 

USAir Group Inc seek billion dlrs bank debt complete takeover Piedmont Aviation Inc PIE> pending acquisition PS Group Inc's Pacific Southwest Airlines. In filing Securities Exchange Commission detail propose 69 dlr share cash tender offer Piedmont USAir Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co MHC> "indicates willingness" March 6 letter provide 500 mln dlrs financing. Manufacturers Hanover act agent bank raise rest financing USAir said. USAir Manufacturers Hanover affiliate currently agent 400 mln dlrs revelving credit facility replace propose billion dlr financing. USAir total cost complete tender offer 1.7 billion dlrs. Its Pacific Southwest takeover receive federal approval due shareholder approval month 17 dlrs share 400 mln dlrs total. USAir already bought 2.3 mln Piedmont common share 9.9 pct total outstanding Norfolk Southern Corp NSC> 161.9 mln dlrs. The tender offer USAir subsidiary USAG Acquisition Corp valid unless USAir left half Piedmont's total outstanding common stock April 3 expiration. While negotiation term rate bank loan yet complete USAir expect form billion dlr two-year term loan billion dlr seven-year revolve credit facility. The company expect repay two-year loan equity prefer debt offering possibly internal fund sale and/or leaseback aircraft. Reuter 

Pitney Bowes Inc's Dictaphone Corp subsidiary contract exclusive sell Sudbury Systems Inc>'s RTAS digital dictation medical market United States. Inaddition Dictaphone market RTAS non-medical marekts non-exclusive basis. RTAS centralize provide user 24-hour instant access dictate report remote location. Dictaphone sell RTAS 1984. Reuter 

Xyvision Inc receive 1900000 dlrs order computer-integrated publishing system nine commercial customers. Reuter 

Jannock Ltd> acquire 50 pct Intercon Security Ltd five mln dlrs Intercon founder Brian Legge Richard Grange hold remain 50 pct continue manage company. Intercon Security employ 850 provide full range security equipment service Jannock said. Reuter 

Petro-Canada state-owned oil company raise contract price pay crude oil 64 Canadian ct barrel effective March six. Petro-Canada's post price benchmark sweet grade Edmonton/Swann Hills 40 api gravity stand 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl. Their sour grade post 19.88 Canadian dlrs/bbl. Earlier Shell Canada SHC> raise crude posting 47 Canadian cts/bbl bring Edmonton sweet 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl sour crude 19.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl. Imperial oil IMO.A> 70 pct own subsidiary Exxon Corp effective March five raise sweet crude post 21.95 Canadian dlrs/bbl. Reuter 

The Agriculture Department release estimate 1.6 billion dlrs worth in-kind certificate cert corn farmer fall USDA decides maintain equal split total 1986 feedgrain deficiency payment cash cert USDA official said. Final 1986 crop deficiency payment available feed grain producer October. Wheat deficiency payment 1986 crop complete 50/50 cash-certificate split USDA official indicate feedgrains. Over 3.2 billion dlrs estimate 6.0 billion corn deficiency payment already announce 1.42 billion dlrs (43 pct) certificates. The final payment 1.6 billion dlrs cert (57 pct) 50/50 split. However release month 600 mln dlrs deficiency payment equally divide cash cert do bring percentage certs. Some USDA analyst payment reflect hesitation Office Managament Budget allow huge release cert onto market. Bills pending Congress move final feedgrain deficiency payment "as soon five month harvest possible" current lag time. Neither Rep. Edward Madigan (R-Ill.) nor Sen. Bob Dole (R-Kans.) sponsor bill brought legislation forward. Aides timing depend budget discussions. Reuter 

Singer Co flight simulator design train pilot deal wind shear endorse Federal Aviation Administration FAA. The wind sheer profile available Singer's SimuFlite Training International Phase II jet simulator mid-1987 company said. While company device train pilot FAA evaluation qualification FAA act endorsement. Reuter 

J.W. Mays Inc final payment 84519 dlrs due unsecured creditor reorganization plan. The company bankrputcy February 14 1984 final payment creditors. Mays March 1 1988 pay due unsecured creditor elect prepay now. Reuter 

BCI Holdings Corp> Beatrice U.S. Food Corp> retain Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc assist sale bottle business. It product subsidiary base Monterey Park Calif. sell Arrowhead brand name California Arizona Ozarka name Texas Great Bear name 11 northeastern states. Reuter 

The 23 elect joint trade option facility London Commodity Exchange (LCE) International Petroleum exchange (IPE) exchange statement. More firm apply final tranche admit April trading plan start June trading floor Commodity Quay. Traded option volatile liquid future base succeed chairman joint formation committee Jack Patterson exist LCE cocoa coffee sugar IPE gas oil contract difficulty provide this. Reuter 

Dart Group Corp offer buy Supermarkets General Corp 41.75 dlrs share cash. Earlier Supermarkets General "unsolicited third party" offer. Analysts estimate value 1.6 billion dlrs base 38.5 mln share outstanding. Kidder Peabody Co Inc told Dart Kidder's affiliate prepared advance 750 mln dlrs subordinate basis. 

The U.S. Agriculture Department forecast Soviet 1986/87 wheat crop 92.30 mln tonne v 92.30 mln tonne month. It 1985/86 crop 78.10 mln tonne v 78.10 mln tonne month. Soviet 1986/87 coarse grain production estimate 103.30 mln tonne v 103.30 mln tonne month. Production 1985/86 project 100.00 mln tonne v 99.99 mln tonne month. USSR wheat import forecast 15.00 mln tonne 1986/87 v 14.00 mln tonne month. Imports 1985/86 15.70 mln tonne v 15.70 mln tonne month. USDA estimate Soviet 1986/87 coarse grain import 10.00 mln tonne v 8.00 mln tonne month 1985/86 import 13.70 mln tonne v 13.70 mln tonne month. 

The U.S. Agriculture Department project average yield 1.47 gallon frozen concentrate orange juice box (42.0 degree brix equivalent) Florida's 1986/87 crop. That compare 1.46 gallon box previously 1.38 gallon box 1985/86 crop. The crop reporting board estimate 1986/87 season base maturity yield test March 1. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp review debt Caesars World Inc negative implication follow New York investor Martin Sosnoff's 725.2 mln dlr bid buy Caesars World common share yet own. The issue include Caesars World's BB-rated senior debt single-B-plus subordinate debt Caesars World Finance Corp's B-plus subordinate debt guaranteed parent. About 230.8 mln dlrs debt affected. S P successful debt finance acquisition greatly increase firm's financial risk cause marked drop earnings cash flow. Reuter 

The U.S. Agriculture Department estimate 1987 winter potato production base March 1 condition 2788000 cwt (100 lbs) v 2764000 cwt indicate month 2991000 cwt year. The department estimate winter potato harvest 11900 acre v 11900 acre month 12300 acre 1986. The yield harvest acre winter potato estimate 234 cwt acre v 243 cwt year. The department project 1987 spring potato crop plant 79300 cwt v 77400 cwt harvest 76700 acre v 75900 acre harvest year. Reuter 

About 800 United Food Commercial Workers Union UFCWU struck John Morrell's Sioux City Iowa pork processing plant midnight Sunday spokesman UFCWU said. Meatpackers plant work contract pact expire January 31 UFCWU spokesman John Mancuso said. The plant slaughter process 13000 14000 hog estimated. The UFCWU bargaining committee full membership reject late January contract proposal John Morrell subsidiary United Brands Inc said. 

Chrysler Corp phase production Indianapolis Electrical Plant currently employ 975 hourly hourly salaried workers. The company recently conclude study indicate plant operating 50 pct capacity competitive increasingly competitive automotive market production electro-mechanical automotive components. 

MTS Acquisition Corp 907 mln dlrs acquire 31781461 Caesars World Inc share own owner Martin T. Sosnoff. The estimate MTS Acquisition's proxy statement Caesars World shareholder describe offer 28 dlrs share stock announce morning. In announcement MTS Acquisition bank investor banker provide financing total 975 mln dlrs offer. Sosnoff Caesars World's large shareholder 4217675 company's shares. That 11.7 pct outstanding stock fully dilute basis proxy said. Besides sole owner MTS Acquisition Sosnoff own 61 pct Atalanta/Sosnoff Capital Corp's ATL> stock chairman investment management brokerage firm. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc review long-term debt rating Ford Motor Co Ford Motor Credit Co upgrade. About 23 billion dlrs debt affected. Moody's recognizes Ford's recent superior operating result assess whether performance expect continue. The rating agency focus Ford's long-term competitive financial condition. Ratings review include Ford Motor's A-1 rat senior long-term debt Credit unit's A-1 rat senior debt A-2 rat subordinate debt. Reuter 

Carolin Mines Ltd recent assay tailing Hope British Columbia mine range 0.50 0.64 ounce gold ton. There trace amount platinum palladium company said. Carolin result sharply disagreed earlier assay perform Intergold U.S.A. Inc show 1.0 ounce gold ton 0.50 ounce platinum ton. Carolin expect receive result far test assay tailing weeks. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation CCC authorize 25.0 mln dlrs credit guarantee North Yemen cover purchase U.S. wheat Intermediate Export Credit Guarantee Program (GSM-103) U.S. Agriculture Department said. Under credit term extend excess yeras seven years. All sale line register export complete September 30 1987 department said. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation CCC accepted bonus offer exporter sale 4400 tonne barley malt Nigeria U.S. Agriculture Department said. The department bonus award 100.00 dlrs tonne Rahr Malting Co paid form commodity inventory stock CCC. The barley malt schedule shipment April 1987. An additional 76300 tonne barley malt available Nigeria Export Enhancement Program initiative announce December 10 1986 said. Reuter 

Guinness PLC> William G. Pietersen name president Guinness America Inc addition role president company's North American Wine Spirits operations. Guinness John M. Huston name vice president finance North American unit create office vice president counsel vice president human resources. It office counsel fill interim basis Donald J. Lunghino recently retire counsel Unilever United States. Reuter 

Bank Ireland mandate Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd (BZW) arrange 300 mln stg commit certificate deposit issuance facility. The facility fund Bank Ireland's U.K. Home mortgage subsidiary BankAmerica Finance Ltd rename shortly. The certificate sell uncommitted tender panel facility fully underwritten five syndicate bank form BZW. Four banks-- Barclays Bank Plc Canadian Imperial Bank Commerce Lloyds Bank Plc Standard Chartered Bank-- agree underwrite credit pre-syndication agreement act lead manager syndication due begin soon. Bank Ireland appoint BZW sole dealer separate 100 mln stg certificate deposit program. Reuter 

Carolin Mines Ltd recent assay tailing Hope British Columbia mine indicate ounce gold ton range 0.64 0.50. There trace amount platinum palladium company said. Carolin result sharply disagreed earlier assay perform Intergold U.S.A. Inc show ounce gold ton 1/2 ounce platinum ton. Carolin expect receive result far test assay tailing weeks. Reuter 

Bausch Lomb Inc marketing product design lubricate protect cornea eye post-surgical patients. The company product Bio-Cor Fyodorov Collagen Corneal Shield manufacture distribute newly form surgical product unit locate Clearwater Fla. The corneal shield approve U.S. Food Drug Administration January company said. Reuter 

Brazilian marine work unload ship local port strike 40000 seaman enter 10th sign agreement. The halt strike seaman 25 start February 27 union leader return unless receive 275 pct pay rise. Shipowners offer 100 pct raise seaman rejected. "Television report port operating full speed that's true" strike seaman told Reuters. "The marine do don't manpower nor experience control situation quick period" said. Port official halt already cause loss estimate 1.5 mln dlrs. Despite presence marine report incidents. Reuter 

The U.S. Agriculture Department increase estimate Soviet 1986/87 grain import 26 mln tonne month's projection 23 mln tonnes. In monthly USSR Grain Situation Outlook USDA increase reflect return Soviet Union U.S. corn market continued purchase wheat coarse grain major suppliers. USSR wheat import project 15 mln tonne mln month's estimate 700000 tonne below preliminary 1985/86 figure. Soviet grain feed estimate record 129 mln tonnes. Record near-record livestock inventory dry fall likely reduce late season pasturage cold winter increase feed demand USDA said. USSR meat egg production January rise slightly previous January's level milk production increase nearly six pct. Unusually cold weather January small increase roughage supply 1986 1985 kept livestock production expand earlier USDA said. Reuter 

Hartford National Corp China Industry Commerce Development Corp agree exclusively Connecticut National Bank unit banking China six New England states. The company China Industry Commerce provide import export assistance economic information contact introductions. Reuter 

300 fear dead 15000 left homeless thursday's earthquake cost Ecuador close 800 mln dlrs lose petroleum revenue authority said. They estimate cost repair damage oil pipeline 150 mln dlrs. "the magnitude damage cause earthquake gigantic" president leon febres cordero inspect damage napo hardest-hit jungle province 100 mile here. The quake damage 40 km oil pipeline force opec nation suspend crude export month president febres cordero statement issue presidential press office. The country lose estimate 800 mln dlrs crude export pipeline repair president said. It cost 150 mln dlrs repair pipelline carry oil jungle oil field andes Balao pacific ocean port. Crude traditionally account two-thirds ecuador's exports. quake trigger landslide swell aguarico river burst bank carry home hut napo province health minister jorge brancho told reuters. "we fear 300 die napo know exact figure disappeared" said. Other estimate range 500 dead. So 20 corps recover bracho said. Information Minister Marco Lara told reporters: "the dead injured know ... live home hit landslides." Bracho 15000 left homeless cayambe district. Reuter 

The U.S. Agriculture Department estimate Canada's 1986/87 wheat crop 31.85 mln tonne v 31.85 mln tonne month. It estimate 1985/86 output 24.25 mln tonne v 24.25 mln month. Canadian 1986/87 coarse grain production project 27.62 mln tonne v 27.62 mln tonne month. Production 1985/86 estimate 24.95 mln tonne v 24.95 mln month. Canadian wheat export 1986/87 forecast 19.00 mln tonne v 18.00 mln tonne month. Exports 1985/86 estimate 17.71 mln tonne v 17.72 mln month. Reuter 

The U.S. Agriculture Department forecast Australia's 1986/87 wheat crop 17.30 mln tonne v 17.50 mln tonne month. It estimate 1985/86 output 16.13 mln tonne v 16.13 mln month. Australian wheat export 1986/87 forecast 14.50 mln tonne v 15.00 mln tonne month export 1985/86 estimate 15.96 mln tonne v 15.96 mln month. Reuter 

Theodore Cross editor Business Society Review publication investor head offer buy Harper Row Publishers Inc 34 dlrs share cash. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Cross propose takeover board New York publishing today. Cross whose investor include wife Mary already hold 261650 Harper Row common share 6.0 pct total outstanding common stock. They spent 3.5 mln dlrs stake far. Cross propose letter Harper Row company merge company Cross forming. Suggesting total cost complete merger 190 mln dlrs Cross 20 mln dlrs money deal 170 mln dlrs borrow First National Bank Boston revolve credit facility bank agree provide. 

French maize producer ask EC Commission grant permanent maize export rebate follow recent EC/U.S. Accord guarantee U.S. An annual export quota mln tonne maize Spain French maize producer association AGPM said. The Commission already decide accord rebate export 500000 tonne French maize rebate 100000 tonne granted. The request export certificate grant 500000 tonne AGPM said. The association request cover export destination add Soviet Union maize need currently exclude list destination country 500000 tonne French maize. The U.S. Agriculture Department forecast Soviet maize import 1986/87 campaign 4.90 mln tonne 10.40 mln 1985/86. Reuter 

The dollar decline unlikely result complete reduction U.S. current account deficit Anthony Solomon chairman S.G. Warburg (USA) Inc former president Federal Reserve Bank New York. In presentation Japan Society Solomon elaboration expect "significant decline dollar" years. "The dollar fall current account deficit stop reduce reach structural core" said. Solomon described structural core one-half current 150 billion dlr annual deficit. He cite factor prevent elimination deficit. For unlikely investment manufacturing industry shrank dollar uncompetitive level said. In addition U.S. increase propensity import satisify consumer tastes. Solomon forecast inflation 4.5 pct year-end kept below five pct medium-term oil price stable commodity value remain low. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation CCC accepted bonus offer exporter sale 13 dairy cattle Morocco U.S. Agriculture Department said. The department bonus award 1505.00 dlrs Brown Swiss Enterprises Inc. It paid form commodity CCC inventories. The cattle delivery March 9-September 30 1987. The department purchase completes Export Enhancement Program initiative dairy cattle Morocco announce April 16 1986. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation CCC accepted bonus offer exporter sale 75 dairy cattle Canary Islands U.S. Agriculture Department said. The department bonus award 1459.00 dlrs T.K. International Inc. It paid form commodity inventory CCC stocks. The cattle delivery March-June 1987 said. An additional 3925 dairy cattle available Canary Islands Export Enahcnement Program initiative announce July 28 1986 said. Reuter 

Marathon Petroleum Company subsidiary USX Corp X> raise contract price pay grade crude oil effective March 6. Illinois Sweet Indiana Sweet raise 50 ct barrel 16.75 dlrs/bbl Southern Michigan grade raise 25 cts/bbl 16.75 dlrs bbl. The West Texas Intermediate grade unchanged. Reuter 

National Fuel Gas Co board approve two-for-one stock split consider increase cash dividend June meeting. The company management recommend June board meeting increase 12 ct share current annual dividend rate 2.28 dlrs share raise 2.40 dlrs share 1.20 dlrs share split. National Fuel Gas split paid holder record May 29. A spokeswoman distribution date split determined. The company split subject approval Securities Exchange Commission Public Utility Holding Act. The company 11928871 share outstanding. Reuter 

Sensormatic Electronics Corp upped investment CheckRobot Inc form 2.5 mln dlrs convertible prefer stock raise stake CheckRobot 42 pct 37 pct fully dilute basis. Reuter 

Emergy Air Freight Corp shipment rise 12 pct 1190000 month 1067000 February 1986. The company weight shipment 20 pct 52.7 mln pound 44.0 mln earlier. Reuter 

The New York Shipping Association International Longshoremen's Association agree cut cargo assessment Port New York New Jersey 50 pct labor intensive cargos. The charge cargo handle union worker reduce 2.85 dlrs ton 5.85 dlrs ton effective April accord agreement union shippers. The assessment fund workers' benefits. "What do lower price bulk cargo flow here" spokesman New York Shipping Association said. 

Treasury balance Federal Reserve rise March 6 3.879 billion dlrs 3.467 billion dlrs previous Treasury late budget statement. Balances tax loan note account fell 12.453 billion drls 14.350 billion dlrs respective days. The Treasury's operating cash balance total 16.332 billion dlrs March 6 compare 17.817 billion dlrs March 5. Reuter 

CSX Corp's Sea-Land Corp unit offer improve containership service Puerto Rico East Coast Gulf Coast United States begin March 16. The carrier provide shorter door-to-door transit time convenient cargo availability rail connection traffic move Puerto Rico North America. Reuter 

Oshkosh Truck Corp (OTRKB) receive 64.0 mln dlr contract 432 diesel engine drive MK-48 series vehicle Army said. REUTER 

confidential bank report peruvian economy government's strategy offer prospect medium long-term growth likely quickly lead inflation. The report publish economic monthly peru report success president alan garcia's government stimulate output achieve eight pct gross domestic product growth "represents gain short term expense long." Government official immediate comment report advise reduction overall size investment programme great emphasis preservation peru's export potential. The report government succeed cut inflation 50 pct half 1985 70 pct stabilisation reactivation programme encounter increase difficulties. "an renewal inflationary pressure link monetary expansion exchange rate devaluation ease price control appear improbable" added. 

European Community finance minister discuss economic outlook 12-nation bloc recent gloomy forecast EC Commission pessimistic. The Commission EC's executive authority week ago cut forecast economic growth Community 2.3 cent 2.8 cent predict autumn. It economic prospect promising past month sharp fall value dollar slow trade -- factor restrain Community exports. But diplomat member lead West Germany Britain France forecast gloomy especially draft recent agreement lead Western economic power stabilise currency current levels. "Many delegation feel (Commission's) report pessimistic" Belgian Finance Minister Mark Eyskens chair meeting. The Commission slash growth forecast West Germany cent 3.2 cent clear feel Bonn introduce additional measure stimulate economy benefit rest Europe. But top German official State Secretaries Otto Schlecht Hans Tietmeyer told reporter Bonn moment action bolster EC's big economy. The diplomat back Britain France Italy Greece Denmark support Commission's view Bonn bring measure aid EC growth. 

U.S. consumer instalment credit rise seasonally adjust 536 mln dlrs January revise rise 144 mln dlrs December Federal Reserve Board said. The annual rate growth January 1.1 pct 0.3 pct December. Previously Fed consumer credit rise 105 mln dlrs December. Among credit category auto credit fell January 1.02 billion dlrs 2.06 billion dlrs December Fed said. Revolving credit January fell 366 mln dlrs rise 552 mln dlrs December. Mobile credit 130 mln dlrs fall 21 mln dlrs December. The category refer "other" cover bank credit union loan fell 250 mln dlrs January decline 2.44 billion dlrs December Fed said. Before seasonal adjustment consumer credit outstanding total 580.37 billion dlrs January compare 531.29 billion dlrs January 1986. Reuter 

Systemhouse Inc won contract value 2.6 mln dlrs Genstar Stone Products Hunt Valley Md. supplier building material design install operate Genstar's data center Baltimore. The data center schedule begin operating May. The pact three-year deal company said. Reuter 

The chief Viacom International Inc National Amusements Inc> met agree together complete previously announce merger company "as expeditiously possible." A spokeswoman Viacom decline executive timetable closing deal. Viacom week agree acquire National Amusements combination cash stock estimate value 53 dlrs share total 3.4 billion dlrs. 

Officials major brokerage firm express dismay New York Stock Exchange decision force strict compliance rule bar trading NYSE-listed issue London New York trading hours. Most major brokerage house see formal notice NYSE interpretation rule 390. Officials NYSE unavailable explain timing technical detail enforcement rule 390. "It's step backward" Samuel Hunter senior vice president equity trading Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. Hunter perceive problem cause overlap trading ought address search equitable solution instead "hiding behind legalistic technical definitions." The NYSE evidently feel trader London circumvent rule prevent short sale minus tick Hunter said. But believe simultaneous printing trade London New York dual trading element fairness. "I'm advocate view great volume market be" said. Reuter 

The Agricultural Stabilization Conservation Service (ASCS) bought 25.7 mln pound wheat flour cost 2.8 mln dlrs domestic shipment April 1-15 April 16-30 ASCS spokesman said. ASCS bought 11.1 mln pound baker flour 1.1 mln dlrs 1.9 mln pound pasta 408258 dlrs 1.4 mln pound process cereal product 304043 dlrs 4.8 mln pound corn product 474944 dlrs 16.3 mln pound mill rice 2.0 mln dlrs. Reuter 

The Federal Home Loan Bank Board rate fix rate adjustable rate mortgage loan substantially February. The bank board average effective commitment rate fix mortgage maturity 15 purchase drop 9.54 pct February 30 basis decline January. The commitment rate adjustable rate mortgage decline 16 basis point period bring average rate 8.5 pct bank board said. The average effective rate loan close major lender decline 27 basis point January 9.26 pct February low rate March 1978 bank board said. The average effective rate fix mortgage 9.51 pct 30 basis point January level. The average effective rate adjustable rate mortgage decline 22 basis point 8.61 pct bank board said. Reuter 

Cullinet Software Inc reach marketing agreement Epic Data Corp> company sell data collection software product inventory management. Epic make data collection equipment Cullinet software developer. The initial product developed accord expect available said. Separately Cullinet bought fix asset Computer Associates International> 440000 dlrs. The design run data base software customer asset control. Reuter 

American Petroleum Institute President Charles DiBona option reject combat grow U.S. dependence foreign oil. "No action rule out--import fee quota floor price tax incentive alternatives--while dialogue issue continues" DiBona paper institute conference New York today. DiBona unanimity industry stimulate energy production consensus remove government policy hinder investment prospects. DiBona windfall profit tax abolish immediately current proposal increase environmental regulation acid rain waste disposal adopted. He suggest Arctic National Wildlife Refuge Alaska open lease oil company DiBona said. "This battle industry cannot afford lose nation continue benefit Alaskan oil" DiBona said. Since 1986 U.S. oil production fall consumption rise raise dependence import oil particularly OPEC DiBona said. Reuter 

A top Treasury official expect comprehensive Congressional reform U.S. banking industry 1988 presidential election due political pressure lesser extent insider trading scandal Wall Street. George Gould Under Secretary Treasury told Wall Street Planning Group luncheon "legislation happen election ... (people) vote controversial issue election years." "It administration ... done" added. Calls major overhaul U.S. banking industry probably feature wider investment banking power commercial bank met strong opposition private group Securities Industry Association. "These discussion merit ... group try cloak self-interest policy terms" Gould said. "It easy stop going." He described current concern insider trading "a major impediment far progress ... helpful backdrop accomplish financial reform." Similarly Gould lobbying group U.S. League Savings Institutions probably mean Reagan Administration's proposal recapitalization Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp water down. Gould foresaw five billion dlr injection compare original request 15 billion dlrs years. Gould rule government initiative banking reform broad guideline address issue months. Reuter 

National Distillers Chemical Corp complete sale Almaden Vineyards Inc Heublein Inc 128 mln dlrs. Heublein former subsidiary RJR Nabisco Inc RJR> recently acquire Grand Metropolitan PLC>. Almaden base San Jose Calif. make sell table wine champagne brandy premium wine Charles Lefranc Cellars label. Reuter 

SoftTech Inc receive 24.8 mln dlr five-year contract U.S. Air Force Aeronautical Systems Division assist track control development modification Modular Automatic Test Equipment Systems Products. The MATE define acquire support automatic test capability Air Force company said. SofTech role include development maintenance MATE master plan aim keep current evolve technology. Reuter 

Standard Poor's place 6.6 billion dlrs Chrysler Corp security CreditWatch negative implication plan acquire outstanding common share American Motors Corp AMO> Renault Acceptance BV billion dlrs. Among rating review Chrysler's BBB grade senior debt. The AMC purchase large riskier current rating anticipate downgrade Chrysler remain investment grade S P said. American Motors's CCC prefer stock rating add CreditWatch positive implications. Standard Poor's return billion dlr investment Chrysler receive questionable prospects. "The Jeep line worthwhile extension Chrysler's product line presume price seem hard justify. The additional production facility inlcude modern antiquate plant add Chrysler's fix overhead increase breakeven industry face glut automaking capacity. "Chrysler challenged integrate facility distribution network acquiring" S P said. Reuter 

The U.S. Treasury weekly auction three-month bill produce average rate 5.63 pct 5.59 pct rate six-month bills. These rate compare average 5.47 pct three- 5.51 pct six-month bill sell week. The bond-equivalent yield three-month bill 5.81 pct. Accepted bid range 5.61 pct 5.64 pct 29 pct bid stopout rate taken. For six month yield 5.85 pct bid range 5.56 pct 5.60 pct 30 pct bid accepted. The Treasury receive 30.9 billion dlrs bid three-month bill include 1.0 billion dlrs non-competitive bid public. It accepted 6.6 billion dlrs bid include 2.2 billion dlrs Federal Reserve 9.1 mln dlrs foreign international monetary authorities. Some 25.7 billion dlrs bid six-month bill receive include 785 mln dlrs non-competitives. The Treasury accepted 6.6 billion dlrs include 1.9 billion dlrs Fed 942 mln dlrs foreign international authorities. The average price three-month bill 98.577 price range 98.574 98.582. The average price six-months bill 97.174 price range 97.169 97.189. The average yield three-month bill high 5.66 pct Feb 17. The average yield six-month bill high 5.70 pct Feb 17. Reuter 

Prime Minister Brian Mulroney government consider sell Petro-Canada sale proceed so. Mulroney told House Commons asset huge oil company examine decision state-run company study sell Ottawa's privatization program. "The government examine asset nature ascertain continue play appropriate role policy determination cases" Mulroney told daily question period. Asked opposition clairify Finance Minister Michael Wilson's statement Friday Petro-Canada longer pubilic policy role Mulroney government promise sell company run private sector. Outside House Energy Minister Marcel Masse Petro-Canada worth billion dlrs size difficult sell. He prefer Canadians participate privatization detail timing sale. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 12 billion dlrs debt Chrysler Corp unit include Chrysler Financial Corp. It cite Chrysler's propose acquisition American Motors Corp AMO>. Moody's review American's B-1 prefer stock upgrade. Moody's ass effect propose transaction Chrysler's capital structure. Under review parent's Baa-1 senior long-term debt finance unit's Baa-1 senior debt Baa-2 senior subordinate debt Baa-3 junior subordinate debt Chrysler Canada's Baa-1 Eurobonds. Reuter 

The Supreme Court left intact ruling vacate judgment order China pay 41.3 mln dlrs allegedly default 1911 loan finance construction railroad Peking Canton. The Imperial Government China issue bond 1911 construct section so-called Hukuang railroad agreement British German French American banks. According court document payment loan mid-1930s China torn civil war. The government 1949 acknowledge debt. Nine U.S. bondholder sue China repayment loan 1979 normalization relation Washington Peking. A U.S. District Court Alabama 1982 issue judgment bondholder entitle unpaid principal bond total 41.3 mln dlrs. But U.S. Court Appeals July vacate award ruling Chinese government entitle sovereign immunity dismiss lawsuit. Supported Reagan administration China argue held liable debt involve bond issue 1911 enjoy absolute immunity. The Supreme Court comment decline hear appeal bondholder seek reinstate lawsuit. Reuter 

Texas Air Corp's Continental Airlines begin service April Bakersfield Calif. Eugene Medford Ore. hub Denver. From Denver Continental fly daily nonstop one-stop flight city company said. Service Oregon city start April 5 Bakersfield April 22. Reuter 

Noranda Inc> company plan share offer month Noranda Forest Inc unit hold Noranda's forest product interests. Size offer undetermined Noranda said. Noranda Noranda Forest operate freestanding subsidiary Noranda. Noranda Forest hold 100 pct Fraser Inc James Maclaren Industries Noranda Forest Sales 50 pct stake MacMillan Bloedel Ltd MMBLF> Northwood Pulp Timber. Noranda Forest's consolidated 1986 revenue billion dlrs earnings 158 mln dlrs. 

The News Corp South China Morning Post Ltd Hong Kong wholly-owned subsidiary March 7 previously announced. Reuter 

Richmond Hill Savings Bank Riverhead Savings Bank FSB> terminate previously announce merger negotiations. The bank give reason end talk January 14. Reuter 

European consortium Airbus Industrie comment press report resume talk U.S. McDonnell Douglas Corp joint development production airliners. A spokesman Airbus headquarters Toulouse telephone interview: "We knowledge talk comment make." Talks broke autumn rival fail agree cooperation long-range jet. McDonnell Douglas want Airbus build MD-11 Airbus insist McDonnell drop MD-11 cooperate A340. Reuter 

General Cinema Corp low attendence theatre year's record Christmas season lower fiscal quarter operating earnings nine pct 15.9 mln dlrs. "While start fiscal 1987 picked weeks" chairman Richard Smith said. He company expect net pricing high unit volume improve remain quarter fiscal year. The company add operating earnings theatre unit high fiscal 1987 summer season film release perform well. In addition key General Cinema Beverages expect achieve record operating result full Smith said. The company's superstar video rent video cassette supermarket continue operate expect loss company added. General Cinema financing cost associate purchase 3.5 mln Carter Hawley Hale Stores Inc CHH> share 177.9 mln dlrs 89.7 mln sterling investment Cadbury Schweppes PLC> lower quarter net. But loss offset 2.5 mln dlr gain sale common share Sea-Land Corp unit CSX Corp CSX>. Reuter 

Ceasars Wold Inc board study unsolicited conditional tender offer common share 28 dlrs share Martin T. Sosnoff. A company spokesman board expect recommendation "shortly" specify period. Ceasars World Chairman Henry Gluck statement urge shareholder action respect offer prior board's recommendation. Sosnoff offer directly shareholder newspaper advertisement company form call MTS Acquisition Corp. It expires April 3. Reuter 

Americus Trust For Bristol Myers share announce initial dividend 68.75 ct payable May 12 shareholder record April 3. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc review B-2 debt rating Resorts International Inc Resorts International Financing Inc downgrade. Approximately 505 mln dlrs debt affected. Moody's review prompt recent bid Donald Trump acquire control company. The rating agency review focus effect acquisition likely Resorts International's leverage ability service debt. Moody's Resorts already highly leveraged capitalization. Reuter 

United Security Financial Corp Illinois sign letter intent buy Robert Co. Brown Co Inc's RCBI> MAGIC Insurance Group unit. Robert C. Brown Co receive newly issue United Security stock. United Security anticipate stock represent substantial majority share outstanding merger. United Security's principal subsidiary United Security Life Insurance Co Illinois. The MAGIC Group own Pilgrim Life Insurance Co America Middle Atlantic Life Insurance Co. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 215 mln dlrs debt Caesars World Inc unit Caesars World Finance Corp. Moody's review prompt recent bid investor Martin Sosnoff acquire control company. While Sosnoff's bid depends factor include licensing Nevada New Jersey game commission deal result significant increase Caesars World's leverage rating agency said. Caesars currently carry B-1 convertible debt finance same-rated subordinate debentures. Reuter 

There grain ship load ship wait load Portland accord Portland Merchants Exchange. Reuter 

(Warrington Inc) sell shoe division Montreal-based (Taurus Footwear Inc) undisclosed terms. The division manufacture distribute Greb Hush Puppies Kodiak Santana brand shoe revenue 69 mln dlrs Warrington said. It sale shoe division previous sale ski boot business result unspecified net gain. Warrington plan concentrate Canstar Sports Group Inc skate athletic footwear division large ice skate manufacturer distributor Western world. Warrington decide rationalize balance ski business expect result divestment loss outweigh net gain sale shoe ski boot divisions. Taurus acquisition expect increase annual sale 100 mln dlrs Canada's large footwear manufacturer. Reuter 

Up 300 fear dead 15000 left homeless Ecuador's earthquake whose economic cost 950 mln dlrs damage authority said. "The magnitude damage cause earthquake gigantic" President Leon Febres Cordero inspect damage Napo hardest-hit jungle province. Shaking loose earth hill thursday quake trigger landslide swell Aguarico river burst bank carry home hut Napo province health minister Jorge Brancho told reuters. "We fear 300 die napo know exact figure disappeared." Reuter 

Conoco Inc subsidiary DuPont Corp increase contract price crude oil 10 ct dlr barrel effective today. Conoco increase brings price U.S. benchmark crude West Texas Intermediate 17.50 dlrs barrel dlr. South Louisiana Sweet dlr 17.85 dlrs. West Texas Sour 10 ct 16.60 dlrs barrel. Conoco company raise price follow series increase initiate week Sun Co SUN> reverse post price cut February. Reuter 

Chicago Board Trade (CBT) agricultural financial future market period major upheaval exchange go ahead plan renovation. A CBT spokesman told Reuters exchange look option identify cost effective efficient proceed include involve move entire grain floor building nearby MidAmerica Commodity Exchange. "One (CBT Chairman) Karsten Mahlmann's agenda item proceed renovation financial future room" spokesman said. Another CBT official executive vice president George Sladoje issue discuss Friday special meeting exchange floor. A presentation regard renovate financial future Sladoje said. "We've look five six alternative involve flip-flopping trading rooms" added. It conceivable couple plan MidAmerica Exchange temporarily CBT market Sladoje said. "If move floor entirely construction period year" add issue likely membership vote draw board eight month year. The CBT spokesman stress discussion preliminary stage likely begin summer earliest. In renovate crowd financial future pit exchange official discuss provide temporary grains-dominated area. This involve move CBT market U.S. Treasury Bond future Treasury Notes Muni-bonds option T-Bonds T-Notes adjoin corridor utilize MidAmerica floor CBT future contract corn wheat soybean soybean product agricultural options. Any move meet opposition CBT members. One senior floor trader financial future badly need renovating. "There talk grain floor shift MidAm financials move grain area" said. The CBT spokesman option discuss renovate financial floor quadrant quarter time. "The step decide effective proceed architectural engineering drawings" said. He add difficult determine exact frame moves. "This major undertaking process spread year" said. Floor trader MidAmerica Commodity Exchange merge CBT ago prepare vacate floor month. Space recently clear CBT move Major Market Index pit reserve lightly-traded CBT gold silver future share trading area. The MidAm specializes mini-contracts grain livestock metal financials foreign currency option contracts. "Rumor CBT grain come bond crowded" MidAm trader said. Another source MidAm change July August. Reuter 

Fluor Corp won 197.6 mln dlr contract U.S. Army Engineer District follow-on option additional 450 mln dlrs. Fluor's Fluor Constructors Inc unit perform procurement construction Ground Based Free Electron Laser-Technology Integrated Experiment Project White Sands Missile Range New Mexico. Phase I Construction begin month schedule completion September 1990. Based result Phase II follow-on option implement additional company said. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp cut Piedmont Aviation Inc's BBB-minus prefer stock USAir Group Inc's U> propose acquisition airline. While combination strengthen airlines' market position enhance revenue generate capability USAir Group require substantial debt finance 1.6 billion dlr acquisition S P said. USAir's balance sheet cash flow support debt strong industry weaken financing all-cash acquisition Piedmont PSA Inc. USAir's A-rated senior debt already S/P watch downgrade. Reuter 

Beker Industries Corp unable confirm plan reorganization March 5 hearing U.S. Bankruptcy Court necessary agreement reach institutional lenders. The company specific date complete reorganization. At March 5 hearing company file motion approval agreement reach principal unit Freeport-McMoRan Inc FTX> sale Beker's facility Louisiana Florida. Reuter 

A investment firm lead Far Hills N.J. investor Natalie Koether seek information shareholder Prime Medical Services Inc seek control. In filing Securities Exchange Commission include Shamrock Associates include March 6 letter Prime asks complete list shareholder addresses. The want information contact shareholder issue include election opposition slate director board proxy contests. The Koether group's letter give company five day respond request. If response Prime Medical consider demand refuse "other proper steps" information. The already hold 1483886 Prime Medical share 17.5 pct total. It take legal action try force company annual meeting require director stand election. In previous SEC filing decide try seek control Prime Medical tender offer exchange offer proxy contest ways. Reuter 

Grand Metropolitan PLC Grandmet USA Inc unit decide sell physical fitness exercise equipment business. The company Morgan Stanely Co Inc advise sale business. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp's propose acquisition American Motors Corp value 1.55 billion dlrs include cost acquisition 767 mln dlrs American Motor' debt Chrysler assume analyst said. They Chrysler's cost acquisition value 782 mln dlrs paid cash note Chrysler shares. The analyst told Reuters New York briefing Chrysler treasurer Fred Zuckerman outline company's agreement Renault assume AMC's debt 332 mln dlrs unfunded pension liability latter include value transaction. Analysts generally positive Chrysler's propose purchase much-smaller rival expect transaction carry short-term dilution Chrysler's earnings. A Chrysler financial source speak anonymously told Reuters propose purchase price small deal struck impact U.S. tax law remove Chrysler's ability assume AMC's reserve tax-loss carryforwards accumulate loss 1980. "There serious discussion fall didn't pull off" source reference assassination November former Renault chairman Georges Besse. "It's bad tax benefit fell floor. And Renault gotten price we'd year." In addition AMC's debt pension liability source Chrysler assume liability lawsuit safety Jeeps call "an overhang company." Analysts quote Chrysler official have told deal include payment Renault 200 mln dlrs principal form 10-year note eight pct 35 mln dlrs cash Renault's equity AMC's finance subsidiary 25 mln dlrs cash "transaction fees" connection acquisition 522 mln dlrs worth Chrysler stock paid AMC shareholders. "The 767 mln dlrs debt assumption" analyst Jack Kirnan Kidder Peabody Co told Reuters. Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 12 billion dlrs Chrysler Corp unit debt due deal. But Chrysler source assume AMC's liability company refinance low rate AMC debt carry "non-market" rates. He difficulty negotiate previous Renault management acquisition commit group's plan AMC integral part. "The management didn't - AMC wasn't baby" said. Reuter 

The Philippines' bank advisory committee meet tomorrow discus response novel proposal finance minister Jaime Ongpin pay country's bill investment note instead cash banker said. Ongpin outline plan 12-bank advisory committee head Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. Bankers decline comment today's meeting panel's response crucial fate talk week. "The ball's court now" banker committee said. Under Ongpin's reschedule plan Philippines offer payment cash 5/8 pct London Interbank Offered Rate. Banks found rate unacceptably low offer alternative LIBOR payment cash plus margin pct form Philippine Investment Notes PINs banker explained. These tradable dollar-denominated zero-coupon note maturity six redeemable par peso fund investment approve government's debt-equity scheme. Because bank able sell PINs multinational investor relatively discount value total yield boost above 5/8 pct cash margin accord Philippine proposal. Although banker eager foster foreign investment Philippines PINs idea likely run stiff resistance bank advisory committee establish precedent payment paper cash. Ongpin U.S. regulator accountant green idea banker sure. U.S. banker fear able account note accrue cash payment profit suffer accordingly. If bank reject proposal run risk scuttle talk Ongpin insist accept margin above 5/8 pct. The Phillipines ask bank reschedule 3.6 billion dlrs debt fall due 1987 1992 grant easy term 5.8 billion dlrs previously restructure debt. Reuter 

Varity Corp Perkins Engines Varity's British-based diesel engine subsidiary introduce family industrial diesel range 37 400 horsepower. The model include six cylinder unit 12 liter displacement Varity said. Reuter 

Washington National Corp's Washington National Insurance Co bought remain 15 pct United Presidential Corp's UPCO> outstanding share 19 dlrs share cash. The acquisition share plan exchange approve United Presidential shareholder special meeting March 6. The purchase remain United Presidential stake follow Washington National's buying 85 pct United Presidential 19 dlrs share tender offer terminate December 12. Reuter 

Conagra Inc complete merger Sea-Alaska Products Co unit Trident Seafoods Corp.> Conagra company hold 45 pct stake call Trident Seafoods Corp. Charles Bundrant president Trident merger name president company Conagra said. Conagra complete previously announce acquisition Bristol Monarch Corp> Trident complete purchase remain 50 pct stake San Juan Seafoods Inc.> Reuter 

Grain analyst increase mln tonne 1986/87 Soviet grain import unlikely affect market Tuesday. They market already discount high Soviet import partly news month Soviet Union bought mln tonne U.S. corn rumor Reagan administration push authority sell Soviets U.S. wheat Export Enhancement Program. In supply-demand report USDA raise estimate 1986/87 Soviet grain import 26 mln tonne 23 mln. "That already practical purposes" Drexel Burnham analyst Dale Gustafson reflect similar statement analysts. Reuter 

Investors Group Inc unit Power Financial Corp> filing final prospectus previously announce issue mln common share Investors Group secondary offering Power Financial mln Investors Group common receive regulatory approval. The issue price 23.50 dlrs share 1650000 share total issue offer outside Canada. The Canadian offering purchase investment dealer Dominion Securities Inc> Gordon Capital Corp international offering acquire Dominion Securities Gordon S.G. Warburg Securities Investors said. Reuter 

Gull Air Inc> file anti-trust suit Texas Air Corp charge airline broke marketing agreement undertook predatory practice aim shut Gull Air. Gull Air fly commerical route 20 city Northeast Florida Bahamas reach feeder agreement Texas Air Corp March 1986. Under five marketing pact Gull coordinate flight Texas Air Continental Eastern New York Air facilitate connection increase business. But Texas Air acquire People Express Inc unit include Bar Harbor Air Line Provincetown-Boston Airline privately-held Gull become competitor Texas Air unit company said. The company Texas Air broke five agreement previously reach Gull cause lose million dollars. A company spokesman Gull yet monetary value amount damage seek suit. Reuter 

President Reagan sign allow sale U.S. nuclear fuel European Atomic Energy Community (EURATOM) continue far comply 1978 U.S. law. Under law design combat spread nuclear weapon foreign importer U.S. nuclear fuel American consent reprocessing. The United States EURATOM series 11 round talk 1978 1986 renegotiate nuclear cooperation agreement sign 20 ago conform 1978 law. Since 1978 U.S.-EURATOM nuclear coooperation accord extend series presidential waiver orders. State Department official negotiation progress United States offer longterm reprocess consent arrangement require EURATOM U.S. consent fuel delivery. In notify Congress today's extend U.S.-EURATOM nuclear cooperation Reagan said: "A disruption nuclear cooperation eliminate chance progress talk EURATOM related agreement cause serious problem relationships." He far progress talk EURATOM expect year. Reuter 

Atco Ltd Atco Development unit agree sell Canadian Utilities Center Edmonton Alberta Canadian Western Center Calgary. The sale together previously-announced sale Atco's Australian operation gross 114 mln dlrs result after-tax gain 31 mln dlrs reflect Atco's fiscal results. Its fiscal end March 31 company said. In addition sale produce 47 mln dlrs cash debt reduction 67 mln dlrs Atco said. Reuter 

The eliminate "inefficiencies redundancies" behind decision dismiss 200 employee CBS News accord memo Laurence Tisch chief executive officer CBS Inc. CBS memo employes Tisch sought re-assure news employes news divison resource "serve need public" future. Tisch accepted recommendation management CBS News 10 pct force trimmmed. "It assignment anyone relish I enjoy give them" said. Reuter 

A 3.6 billion dlr plan rid European Community (EC) mln tonne surplus butter doubt Spain Portugal refuse drop opposition scheme diplomat said. The plan propose Community's executive Commission aim level EC's huge costly butter mountain dispose total 1.04 mln tonne next. But official Spain Portugal join 12-nation bloc begin continued oppose scheme meeting EC finance minister here. They argue pay disposal surplus create become EC members. The plan already approve farm minister despite opposition Madrid Lisbon sent finance minister final approval. But diplomat finance minister instead refer Commission ask study way solve row soon possible. They Spain Portugal indicate European Court Justice issue Commission satisfactory solution. The scheme run criticism EC's financial watchdog Court Auditors. The Court plan unsound Commission want member foot bill start reimburse annual instalment 1989. Diplomats Spain Portugal back court's view complain complex financial agreement work join EC reimburse now. Commission source appear country hold bid squeeze form compensation partner unclear longer continue block scheme. Reuter 

Bancroft Convertible Fund Inc file lawsuit federal court Newark N.J. seek block hostile 30 dlr share takeover offer Zico Investment Holdings Inc.> Bancroft suit name Michael B. Javett principal officer Zico First Fidelity Bancorp's FFB> First Fidelity Bank unit depositary Zico's offer. Bancroft suit name Georgeson Co Inc> Zico's information agent Luthie Intercontinentale Inc> Panamanian corporation. Bancroft complaint alleges Zico's tender offer material include false mislead information offer violates Investment Company Act 1940. The company stockholder approve proposal insure remains independent. Reuter 

Lavalin Bell Geomat> company own Bell Canada Enterprises Inc engineering company Lavalin Inc> plan bid federal government's map make service Lavalin said. The service annual budget 130 mln Canadian dlrs include survey mapping remote sense branch Energy Mines Resources department hydrographic service Fisheries Oceans department Lavalin president Bernard Lamarre said. Lamarre company official held preliminary talk government discus possibility take service. Reuter 

A confidential World Bank report Peruvian economy government's strategy offer prospect medium long-term growth likely lead renewal inflationary pressure. The report publish economic monthly The Peru Report success president Alan Garcia's government stimulate output achieve growth gross domestic product eight pct "represents gain short term expense long." Government official immediate comment report advise reduction overall size investment great emphasis preservation Peru's export potential. The report government succeed cut inflation 250 pct half 1985 70 pct stabilisation reactivation encounter rise difficulties. "An renewal inflationary pressure link monetary expansion exchange rate devaluation ease price control appear improbable" added. The bank report government's policy reduce inflation short-term increase consumption apparent cost price distortion overvaluation currency balance payment disequilibrium reserve loss sharply diminish creditworthiness. It unless government action quickly fix competitive exchange rate control sector deficit "the high probability government eventually resort drastic curtailment domestic demand either sharp devaluation far control import stem inflation support balance payments." It bank emphasis preservation peru's export potential external link overall economic efficiency. The government's incentive policy towards mining petroleum sector main traditional export suggest accord priority economic viability added. Reuter 

BSD Medical Corp receive patent U.S. Patent Office invasive/external electric field sensors. The company patent fourth seven months. Reuter 

Financier Carl Lindner hold 16.2 pct stake Taft Broadcasting Co told Securities Exchange Commission discuss company possibility seek control it. Lindner Cincinnati Ohio investor control American Financial Corp talk Taft's manager director aim "achieving increase ownership position" company. Lindner increase ownership either make offer acquire control Taft take acquire company. Lindner hold Taft stake American Financial subsidiary consider buying Taft stock market private deals. He whether talk Taft official lead agreement understandings. But Lindner intend review investment Taft involve far talk step regard future control direction Taft. Lindner's investor recently raise Taft stake 1489298 share 16.2 pct 1439498 share 15.6 pct buying 49800 share total 5.8 mln dlrs. Although recently receive clearance Federal Trade Commission raise stake company 24.9 pct Lindner previous SEC filing stress Taft investment seek control company. An investor head wealthy Bass Fort Worth Texas hold 24.9 pct Taft's common stock. Reuter 

New Zealand's total foreign debt fell 32.94 billion N.Z. Dlrs quarter December 31 33.42 billion quarter September 30 revise 33.12 billion dlrs 24.61 billion quarter March 1985 statistic department said. The department release quarterly figure June 1986. It statement Government Corporation foreign debt December quarter fell 5.86 billion 6.78 billion September quarter revise 6.63 billion 5.25 billion March quarter 1985. Private sector foreign debt fell 5.75 billion dlrs 5.89 billion revise 5.74 billion 5.45 billion March 1985. Government department Reserve Bank foreign debt rise 21.32 billion 20.75 billion 13.92 billion. Contributing total fall 0.48 billion dlrs 2.11 billion net realise unrealised exchange gain result appreciation New Zealand dollar currency department said. The U.S. Dollar remain predominant borrowing currency sector economy December 31. Reuter 

An investor include T. Boone Pickens III deadline 1600 EST March 11 offer acquire Japan Fund Inc. The include Sterling Grace Capital Management Inc LP> Anglo American Security Fund LP> willing deposit escrow 100000 Japan Fund share worth mln dlrs insure ability obtain financing Japan Fund approves offer. The Japan Fund respond offer worth 525 mln dlrs current market prices. Reuter 

A affiliate firm lead Warburg Pincus Capital Co L.P. New York venture capital investment partnership acquire 1920527 share Symbion Inc 25.5 pct total outstanding. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Warburg Pincus bought stake investment purposes. Although consider buying share Symbion plan seek control company. Reuter 

Kindness N.V. Bahamas-based firm own U.K. investor Bahamas resident John Templeton acquire 137900 share Hausereman Inc 5.9 pct total outstanding common stock. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Templeton bought share investment purpose intention seek control company. Reuter 

A affiliate investment firm lead Bermuda-based Fidelity International Ltd Boston-based FMR Corp told Securities Exchange Commission raise stake McGill Manufacturing Co Inc. The raise stake 88580 share 6.2 pct total outstanding common stock buying 14135 McGill common share Jan 19 March 2 price range 33.57 34.57 dlrs share. Reuter 

CTS Corp increase 1986 loss continue operation 26.6 mln dlrs previously announce 23.8 mln dlrs loss. The 1986 figure increase include expense involve settlement dispute Dynamics Corp America DYA>. The settlement involve takeover bid CTS Dynamics Corp offer buy share CTS already own. CTS profit 7.9 mln dlrs continue operation 1985. CTS charge additional 2.8 mln dlrs special expense 1986 operation result Dynamics Corp settlement. The additional expense include obligation reimburse Dynamics Corp subject approval CTS shareholder total 2.1 mln dlrs Dynamics Corp's expense cost relate CTS. Reuter 

U.S. authority intervene foreign exchange market support dollar occasion period start November 1986 January Federal Reserve Bank New York report. The Fed's quarterly review foreign exchange operation U.S. bought 50 mln dlrs sale yen January 28. This operation coordinate Japanese monetary authority fund equally Fed U.S. Treasury. The Fed's intervention morning president Reagan's State Union message "in manner consistent joint statement" U.S. Treasury secretary James Baker Japanese finance minister Kiichi Miyazawa January 21 consultations. At meeting reaffirm willingness cooperate exchange rate issues. The Fed's report level intervention occurred. But January 28 dollar close 151.50/60 yen dip low 150.40 yen earlier session. It close 151.05/15 yen previous day. The dollar plumbed post-World War II low 149.98 yen January 19 reach seven-year low 1.7675 mark January 28. It end 1.7820/30 marks. The Fed note trading steadily throughout November half December dollar move sharply low January. It close three-month review period 11 pct mark Continental currency seven pct low yen sterling. It fall pct Canadian dollar. During final day January pressure dollar subsided. Reports U.S.-Japanese intervention operation talk upcoming meeting major industrial country encourage expectation broader cooperation exchange rate economic policy matter Fed said. Moreover doubt developed course U.S. rates. The dollar's swift fall raise question whether Fed short-term rate ease. Thus dollar firm close period 1.8320 mark 153.70 yen. According Fed's trade-weighted index decline nine pct begin period. The dollar risen 2.08 mark 165 yen November. The Fed intervene foreign exchange market November 7 1985 bought total 102.2 mln dlrs worth mark yen. The Fed's action follow September 1985 Plaza agreement five major industrial nation agree promote orderly decline dollar. Reuter 

Louart Corp Los Angeles investment firm raise stake Certron Corp 237000 share 7.8 pct total outstanding common stock 164000 share 5.4 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Louart bought 73000 Certron share Sept 9 March 6 total 109315 dlrs share. It dealing Certron investment increase stake. It plan seek control company. Reuter 

Sono-Tek Corp reduce 350000 400000 share sell initial stock offering. The price offering remains unchanged five dlrs share said. Reuter 

Barnett Banks Florida Inc propose change name Barnett Banks Inc company said. The company shareholder vote proposal 1987 proxy statement annual meeting April 22. Reuter 

Hogan Systems Inc acquire Systems 4 Inc> Durango Colo. 1.7 mln dlrs. Hogan Systems 4 provide integrate application software processing service 30 community banks. Systems 4 revenue 1.5 mln dlrs Hogan said. Reuter 

U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter decline comment publicly rumor Nebraska Gov. Kay Orr consider appoint replace Democratic Sen. Edward Zorinsky die week. However Yeutter told senior staff morning interested replace Zorinsky want continue serve President Reagan's chief trade negotiator aide told Reuters. Orr reportedly consider name Republican replace Zorinsky. Nebraska Republican Reps. Doug Bereuter Hal Daub consider Orr. Reuter 

AirCal February load factor average 53.4 pct slightly 54.2 pct earlier. The company available seat mile 357.1 mln 40.5 pct ago revenue passenger mile 190.8 mln 38.5 pct. Year date revenue passenger mile 383.3 mln February 33.4 pct earlier available seat mile 750.5 mln 39.5 pct. The load factor month 51.1 pct 53.4 pct earlier. Reuter 

Texas Air Corp's Continental Airlines unit begin service Mexico Atlanta May. Continental add non-stop flight Mexico City Puerto Vallarta Cancun Acapulco Ixtapa. Reuter 

The Soviet Union likely honor commitment United States buy minimum mln tonne corn Agriculture Department official said. "They honour agreement there's reason won't year" told Reuters. "They aggressive buying campaign European Community Canada U.S. They're active buyer source point" official explain Department raise Soviet grain import estimate mln tonne 26 mln tonnes. This dramatic shift month ago analyst say USSR buy U.S. corn 15 years. A drawdown corn supply China Argentina concern Soviet winter crop increase competition U.S. corn cite factor create Moscow's recent interest. Lower corn production prospect major supply country stir activity buyer Japan Soviets closely watch situation official said. "The Soviets try out-capitalize capitalists" buy corn price official said. "As soon corn they'll buy it" added. USDA confirm mln tonne corn sell Soviet Union U.S. Soviet analyst purchase stand 1.5 mln tonnes. The USDA official speculate Soviets enter U.S. market again. "There definitely evolve -- situation slow grain buying couple month ago frenetic buying now" official said. However situation wheat "a story" said. Greater supply wheat heavier Soviet purchase commitment competitive U.S. wheat price Soviet purchase U.S. wheat likely said. Speculation continued day U.S. consider make export bonus wheat subsidy offer Soviets U.S. official provide confirmation. Reuter 

T. Boone Pickens Texas oilman financier believe heady day oil service industry 1980s 4500 oil rig report operating return lifetime. Pickens told Reuters expect rig count drop below 600 recovering. He add oil price eventually rise 35 dlrs 50 dlrs 1990. Currently 700 oil rig operating U.S. sharply oil price slip 30 dlrs late 1985 10 dlrs 1986. Prices 18 dlrs. The high work rig 4500 December 1981. "The rig won't price oil get above 30 dlrs" add expect 50 dlr barrel oil expect 2000 rig operating lifetime. Pickens 58. Pickens currently tour country promote autobiography "Boone" believe U.S. impose oil import fee stimulate domestic oil industry. Reuter 

The follow propose security offering file recently Securities Exchange Commission: Angio-Medical Corp - Initial offering 1666667 unit consist share common stock redeemable warrant buy share common stock Kean Securities Co Inc. ABM Gold Corp - Initial offering six mln share Class A common stock estimate seven nine dlrs PaineWebber Inc Advest Inc. COMFED Mortgage Co Inc - Initial offering 2.7 mln share common stock estimate nine 13 dlrs share PaineWebber Inc Bear Stearns Co Inc. MTech Corp MTCH> - Offering 75 mln dlrs convertible subordinate debenture due March 15 2012 lead Alex. Brown Sons Inc. Reuter 

The Arbitration Commission award Australian workforce flat 10 dlrs week wage increase allow trade union begin bargaining second-tier increase pct Commission President Justice Barry Maddern here. The decision effective pay period individual employer deliver Commission's National Wage Case decision. Full-time adult ordinary weekly earnings 453.00 dlrs week male 428.40 dlrs adult accord late official statistics. The wage decision previously announce two-tier replace concept wage indexation. It wage rise partially-indexed increase 2.3 pct award Commission July. The decision compromise Federal government's call Wage Case hearing 10 dlr weekly rise plus pct second-tier ceiling Australian Council Trade Unions' (ACTU) claim 20 dlrs pct. Employer group sought rise all. The Commission willing convene Wage Case October establish wage increase 1.5 pct award Maddern said. He success depend commitment party - employer union governments. He Commission reject employers' call freeze overall labour cost increases. "We outcome feasible need expectation wage salary earners' add freeze destroyed possibility cooperative effort lift Australia's economic performance. The decision ensure effect depreciation Australian dollar adverse term trade reflect wage increase Maddern said. If necessary arbitrate second-tier claim implementation rate pct September far pct July 1988 said. He labour cost rise phase package add second-tier rise mainly achieve restructuring efficiency principle cover elimination restrictive practice improve efficiency productivity reduction demarcation disputes. Maddern Commission rule claim cut weekly work hour below 38 allow employer exempt wage decision basis severe extreme economic adversity. The Commission poor economic outlook note decision persist serious. "The prevail uncertainty lack confidence economy underline economic circumstance allayed halt far decline turn economy around. In connection happens labour cost critical importance" said. REUTER 

Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa Paris currency accord contribute stability exchange rates. Miyazawa told press conference agreement reach month Paris six major industrial nation cooperate bring currency stability prevent speculative concern active money centres. The decision Paris understood market said. The yen-dollar exchange rate move narrow range finance minister Britain Canada France Japan U.S. And West Germany reach accord. REUTER 

New Zealand's total foreign debt continue decline major energy project refinance Finance Minister Roger Douglas said. Statistics Department figure show total debt fell 32.94 billion N.Z. Dlrs December quarter 33.42 billion September government's share rise 21.32 billion 20.75 billion. Douglas statement due boost reserve refinance so-called "Think Big" projects. "These reserve add New Zealand's total indebtedness.... They money bank" said. "As negotiation refinance Think Big project complete exist loan replace debt currently held reserve purpose" Douglas added. This turn result drop quasi-government private debt said. He refinance project allow government borrow favourable term manage Think Big debt effectively. "Both reduce cost Think Big taxpayer time" said. "The refinance pave deregulation oil industry." REUTER 

The Reserve Bank 1230 local offering buy short-dated government security short-term money market. The bank's action follow purchase short-dated government stock six-day repurchase agreement earlier session. Money market trader move aim ease cash market rate risen demand fund meet PAYE tax treasury note settlement commitments. REUTER 

Business group criticise Arbitration Commission's wage decision announce earlier Australian Council Trade Unions (ACTU) give qualify approval. As earlier report commission award 10 dlr week flat rise plus opportunity union bargain immediately extra payment pct base two-tier replace wage indexation. "The decision economically irresponsible industrially naive" Bryan Noakes director-general Confederation Australian Industry's industrial council. 

Police arrest Polish citizen try steal Japanese computer technology local medium report today. The report work computer-related company Tokyo visit Japanese computer maker time come Japan tourist visa October. One report computer specialist Polish technology institute company work manage naturalise Japanese Poland graduate institute. Police official decline comment reports. REUTER 

The leaf disease corenes pora affected rubber tree Sri Lanka Indonesia likely force cut supply push depressed price Malaysian rubber disease researcher said. Trees leaf hit fungus disease cannot save fell Chee Kheng Hoy Head Crop Protection Microbiology Division Rubber Research Institute Malaysia (RRIM) told Reuters. He comment Reuter report corenes pora hit seven pct Sri Lanka's plantation cause output drop below 1987 target 143000 tonnes. The report Sri Lankan Rubber Research Institute ask estate remove tree seriously affected disease add estate affected belong State Plantations Corp Janatha Estates Development Board. Chee corenes pora disease affect rubber clone Sri Lanka Indonesia far clone discontinued. Clones resistant disease Rubber Research Institute Sri Lanka clone 103 Indonesia's PPN 2058 2444 2447 PR 265 Malaysia's RRIM 725 said. Chee corenes pora affected tree RRIM 725 clone plant Malaysia ago curbed clone discontinued. Fungicide curb disease affect leaf 30 specie plant experience proven uneconomical expensive added. "The disease extremely difficult control. If curbed affected country rubber output drop price rise" said. He add RRIM aware disease outbreak Sri Lanka monitoring situation. REUTER 

Japan's Finance Ministry auction 1000 billion yen worth tankoku six month debt-financing paper roll previously issue tankoku mature March 19 spokesman said. The tankoku auction February 12 produce record low yield 3.383 pct reflect expectation half cut Japan's discount rate said. In previous auction 1000 billion yen major Japanese security house 92 pct issue amount attempt meet strong demand institutional investor security manager said. Securities manager expect auction security house try expand inventory tankoku continue response institutional investors. Contrary project low yield tankoku short-term rate resist fall grow demand fund ahead March 31 financial year-end said. The Bank Japan try dampen money market rate late discount rate cut effective vain dealer said. The auction result announce tomorrow. REUTER 

The search continued cargo poisonous chemical substance load Herald Free Enterprise Ferry capsize Zeebrugge harbour Friday. A total 72 drum various toxic material load truck ship's hold recover Belgian authority warn essential recover far 61 container cyanide-based solution. A net thrown gap load door front ship prevent drum float out. Salvage worker move crane alongside wreck 7951 ton roll-on roll-off ferry lie partly submerge sandbank outside harbour. The ferry's owner European Ferries Plc> majority own Peninsular Oriental Steam Navigation Co Plc PORL.L>. The operation vessel yesterday diver abandon search bodies. Experts month refloat ship free 80 body estimate trap amid debris. "The water normally expect work four" Daan Kaakebeen Dutch Salvage expert Smit Tak International Rotterdam. He estimate job require 35 work days. Using reinforce cable salvage expert intend raise ship trench dug alongside. Salvage pinpoint exact cause loss ferry sister vessel ply cross-Channel route England continental Europe. Suspicion focus ferry's main vehicle load door close level. In London Transport Secretary John Moore told parliament yesterday ship keel gush bow doors. He major government inquiry disaster held similar ferry sail Britain inspect owner fit light warn bow door properly closed. Experts carry tank computer test determine accident occur focus attention ship's door ballast crew procedure added. Two investigation disaster begin Belgian ferry's owners. REUTER 

There little chance Soviet export United States rise 1987 Moscow's current trade reform result trade manufacture good future Soviet economist said. Sergey Frolov chief economist Amtorg Trading Corp agent Soviet trade organisation industry told U.S.-USSR meeting Soviet Union produce item western nation want. But reform include upgrade quality good allow joint venture foreign firm encourage modest export gain future. Frolov Soviet Union export 500 mln dlrs worth good United States 1986 import 1.5 billion dlrs worth. He give trade forecast 1987. But obstacle remove total trade country remain billion dlrs year. "The post-detente embargo taught USSR limit trading U.S." said. REUTER 

People throughout China foreign exchange account Bank China official Shenzhen Economic Zone Daily said. Previously resident Guangdong Fujian province this. The paper minimum opening fix deposit account cut 50 yuan equivalent 150 yuan. The minimum current account 20 yuan equivalent. The paper depositor withdraw account subject branch's reserve instead fix amount previously. The paper deposit open French franc already available U.S. Dollar Hong Kong dollar sterling yen marks. Bank China branch Hainan island accept deposit Singapore dollar Wenzhou Zhejiang province accept deposit Dutch guilder paper said. It give far details. REUTER 

The Singapore High Court adjourn summary judgement National Bank Brunei Bhd> loan repayment Khoo Teck Puat 15 associate company court source said. The heard May 4 summary judgement decide civil proceed. Khoo own bank's equity close November Brunei government official charge mismanagement. The bank control Brunei seek repayment 900 mln Singapore dlrs loan guaranteed Khoo. REUTER 

Fujitsu Ltd ITSU.T> assemble computer Oregon sale United States Fujitsu brand name company spokesman said. He rise value yen dollar virtually erase wage differential country Fujitsu medium-size multi-functional computer United States. The Oregon plant own Fujitsu subsidiary Fujitsu America Inc> make magnetic computer disc soon printers. Fujitsu Ltd licensing agreement Amdahl Corp AMH> computer sale U.S. REUTER 

The Sichuan government order meeting interferes fight drought cancel postpone save energy manpower People's Daily domestic edition said. Sichuan six province threaten drought. Wen Wei Po Hong Kong daily drought bad 20 affect nearly mln hectare 100 county Sichuan country's big agricultural producer. Sichuan experienced temperature degree Centigrade high normal rainfall 70 pct normal February affect wheat oil-bearing crop rice plant dryland cash crop said. The paper 43000 hectare Meixian county Guangdong seriously short water. The People's Daily Henan Shaanxi Gansu Hebei suffer drought. Henan's grain output fell 2.5 mln tonne 1985 level drought affect province May. REUTER 

Japanese microchip maker strong-armed compliance U.S.-Japan pact semiconductor halt predatory pricing opening Japan's market foreign chip industry analyst said. But doubt remain whether Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) pressure firm successfully battle market force whether U.S. Industry gear advantage breathing space said. U.S. Threats scrap agreement sign September push MITI try harder recalcitrant Japanese chipmakers abide pact analyst said. "MITI move hot heavy throughout industry done" Bache Securities (Japan) associate vice president Peter Wolffe. Last month MITI told chipmakers cut production January March period 10 pct dry inexpensive chip escape Japan grey market subject pact's price controls. The ministry electronics firm provide distributor certificate designate authorise exporter effort close loophole grey marketeers sneak chip Japan market analyst said. U.S. Trade negotiator week pact jeopardy continued dump non-American market little sign increase foreign sale Japan. But major Japanese firm appear agree production cut analyst said. Last week NEC Corp cut production line MITI's request. "NEC aggressive resist MITI's demands" David Keller analyst James Capel Co. "Once NEC cut production mean have." Still pressure remain keep production high. Japanese firm output cut unit price U.S. Sales Commerce Department assigns pact. "The low cost produce more" Salomon Brothers Asia Ltd analyst Carole Ryavec. Preparations upturn demand spur high production quarter Merrill Lynch analyst Matt Aizawa said. Grey marketeers able outfox restriction industry official said. "It's tax avoidance schemes" Steve Donovan MMI Japan K.K. "As soon close route opens." MITI's pressure annoyed maker earlier shrug MITI guidance. "It's get communism" one. But analyst output cut make easy increase price plan April 1 force firm stop extend market share sell loss. "They're start run business businesses" Bache's Wolffe said. MITI conduct highly campaign urge chip user buy foreign-made chip U.S. Industry official response mixed best. "There change it's across board" U.S. Spokesman. "The company vary degree urgency." The ultimate impact effort MITI troubled U.S. Industry remains doubt analyst added. Pressure cut production 256 kilobit DRAM (dynamic random access memory) chip merely speed transition megabit chip Japan lead analyst said. Whether U.S. Firms able stage comeback memory chip interested do remains unclear said. Analysts watch fate U.S. Consortium hope challenge Japan develop advanced technology microchip manufacturing. Even thorny access depends U.S. Commitment Japanese openness said. "The SIA (U.S. Semiconductor Industry Association) doesn't office here" source close industry said. "You question commit are." In addition industry analyst question effectiveness bilateral agreement leaf third country chipmakers South Korea. "(South) Korea's gain market share" analyst. "They're real winner agreement." REUTER 

The Finance Ministry auction yesterday 1000 billion yen tankoku six-month debt financing paper produce record low average yield 3.246 pct aggressive bidding security houses. The tankoku mature September 21 1987. The previous record low 3.383 pct auction February 12. One major Japanese security bought 39.5 pct total 1021.1 billion yen bid accepted ministry source said. Securities house bid aggressively retail account tokkin special money trust trust fund show strong tankoku increase demand short-term fund management security manager said. The yield tankoku issue discount basis below 4.26/12 pct rate six-month certificate deposit today. In previous auction 1000 billion yen major 92 pct issue increase tankoku inventory manager said. Bids total 1975.8 billion yen. The average price 98.36 yield 3.246 pct low 98.33 give 3.314 pct Ministry said. REUTER 

Bank Japan governor Satoshi Sumita little left central bank far ease credit policy rate level approach low limit. "The government instead seek way make fiscal policy" told press conference. His remark concerned comprehensive economic stimulative package government plan adopt come days. At recent talk six major industrialise nation Paris Japan promise comprehensive economic package boost domestic demand turn increase import reduce trade surplus. Sumita economy show gradual upturn half yen remains stable. He caution foreign exchange market far rise yen mark explains recent stability currency markets. Conflicting economic indicator U.S. Have dampen market activity added. REUTER 

An Iranian military commander Iraqi troop suffer 3000 casualty week-old offensive Iran's force mountain northeast Iraq. The Iranian news agency IRNA quote commander Kurdish border village Haj Omran say nine Iraqi counter-attacks repulse heavy casualties. He Iraq lose 3000 kill wound 289 capture IRNA monitor British Broadcasting Corp said. Iran's offensive Iraqi Kurdistan couple support anti-Iraqi Kurdish rebel operation region. REUTER 

Prime Minister Bob Hawke popular despite Australia's economic problem accord opinion poll result release today. His popularity rating 64 pct compare 19 pct opposition leader John Howard accord Morgan Gallup Poll result publish The Bulletin magazine. The poll 1000 voter throughout Australia show support Hawke's Labour Party run 47 pct 44 pct Liberal-National opposition. Labour support unchanged month opposition fell pct. REUTER 

Iranian Oil Minister Gholamreza Aqazadeh United Arab Emirates (UAE) discus oil price market situation Iranian official accompany said. He meet UAE President Sheikh Zaid bin Sultan al-Nahayan Oil Minister Mana Said al-Oteiba. Aqazadeh arrive brief stopover Riyadh met Saudi Arabia's Oil Minister Hisham Nazir. The official Saudi Press Agency quote say talk Riyadh Nazir constructive good. Aqazadeh Organisation Petroleum Exporting Countries (OPEC) agree hold production stable reiterate importance maintain oil prices. OPEC agree December limit production 15.8 mln barrel half benchmark price 18 dlrs barrel February 1. Aqazadeh visted OPEC Gabon Algeria Libya. The Iranian news agency IRNA quote say leave Tripoli OPEC everything oil price permanently stable. REUTER 

Japanese crusher likely buy 200000 tonne Brazilian soybean 100000 200000 quality shipping condition 128089 tonne 1986 trade source said. A Japanese trading recently bought 31000 tonne soybean April 10/May 10 shipment said. "Because Brazilian soybean price 10 cent bushel cheaper U.S. Origin due bumper harvest highly likely Japanese crusher increase buying volume" source said. Brazilian bean available Japan shipment May July. REUTER 

Metal Traders Australasia Ltd> newly-formed subsidiary Austmet Ltd> negotiate exclusive long-term contract Spain's Asturiana de Zinc> market zinc metal exports. Metal Traders statement contract underpin worldwide zinc copper lead trading activity Austmet wholly-owned London-based company U.S. Unit Stamford Connecticut. Austmet recruit base metal trader currently operating Britain U.S. Who handle Asturiana's past five said. Asturiana three-year option purchase 25 pct Austmet price independent valuation exercise Metal Traders said. Austmet initial equity base mln stg turnover 200 mln Australian dlrs rise 300 mln credit line 30 mln U.S. Dlrs. Austmet generate profit July 1 1.5-2.5 mln dlr net envisage said. Metal Traders Asturiana large zinc smelt capacity Europe -- nearly 200000 tonne 99.995 pct high-grade zinc Aviles northern Spain. Metal Traders list company formerly Pyrotech Resources N.L.> whose chief activity development marketing high-technology smelt process invent Australia notably Siromelt Zinc Fuming Process. But late 1986 control company change expand acquisition metal trading Australia Asia. It change name. It marketing contract mineral sand produce TiO2 Corp N.L.> hold 17.5 pct. In today's statement Metal Traders review acquisition mineral producer. REUTER 

King Fahd Saudi Arabia want oil price stability call non-OPEC producer avoid harmful competition 13 nation group. His plea interview Reuters television news agency Visnews ahead visit Britain month. King Fahd whether Saudi Arabia prepared reduce oil output below OPEC quota 4.133 mln barrel (bpd) defend 18 dlr benchmark price agree OPEC December. The King replied: "Saudi Arabia doesn't decide price certainly desire price stability." Non-OPEC country "must framework common type competition prove harmful everyone" said. Asked 18 dlr barrel benchmark step towards high oil price King Fahd Saudi Arabia OPEC country determine issues. Iran Algeria already call high benchmark. In recent week 18 dlr level pressure due partly quota violation OPEC members. King Fahd Saudi Arabia world's large oil exporter adhere decision OPEC's December conference 15.8 mln bpd output ceiling half 1987. A major non-OPEC producer Britain resist group's plea curb North Sea oil output. The King urge community Palestinians return homeland call peaceful Iran-Iraq war. The 6-1/2-year-old resolve battlefield said. REUTER 

Shr 16.3p v 12.2p Div 2.75p v 2.25p make 3.8p v 3.15p adjust Three-for-one capitalisation Pre-tax profit 54.9 mln stg v 33.4 mln Turnover 1.70 billion v 1.13 billion Tax 7.6 mln v 2.6 mlnProfit attributable 51.9 mln v 30.1 Mln Cost Sales 1.49 billion v 999.3 mln Gross profit 215.9 mln v 136.2 mln Distribution cost 90.3 mln v 57.2 mln Adminstrative expense 65.9 mln v 40.8 mln Other operating income 3.9 mln v nil Interest payable 8.7 mln v 4.8 mln Minority interest 1.0 mln v 0.7 mln Extraordinary credit (sale share S W Berisford Plc) 5.6 mln v nil Operating profit include - Poultry egg animal feed 21.7 mln v 17.2 mln Food processing distribution 15.4 mln v 6.9 mln Furniture timber distribution 8.4 mln v 3.4 mln Fresh meat bacon 8.0 mln v 4.5 mln REUTER 

Nissan Motor Manufacturing (UK) Ltd> reach agreement Lombard North Central Plc> U.K. To build plant boost local content Nissan's U.K. Produced car 60 pct 1988 40 50 pct Nissan Motor Co Ltd NSAN.T> said. The agreement allow car designate domestically manufacture import vehicle Nissan said. The agreement reach negotiation British government European Community (EC) threaten impose duty imports. According 230 mln stg contract Lombard North Central affiliate National Westminster Bank Plc NWBL.L> build lease plant engine assembly body panel press resin mould 1988. They near exist Nissan plant Sunderland north-east England Nissan said. The Sunderland plant currently produce 24000 Bluebird car annually British market. Nissan hope begin U.K. Exports Europe 1991 building engine machining plant boost output 100000 unit local content above 80 pct accordance EC request spokesman said. REUTER 

Japanese crusher start buy U.S. Soybeans April shipment recently purchase 48000 tonne trade source said. The source estimate total volume purchase April shipping Japan's crush April June unclear. They predict earlier crushers' April shipment U.S. Bean purchase drop 260000 270000 monthly average 300000 330000 tonne due low soybean meal prices. REUTER 

West German retail Kaufhof AG KFHG.F> consider take stake shipping transport Hapag-Lloyd AG HPLG.F> yet reach final decision spokesman response queries. Press report Kaufhof want stake 12.5 pct Hapag-Lloyd. The Kaufhof spokesman note decision purchasing share shipping approve supervisory board due hold meeting tomorrow. Late Gevaert Belgium West Germany's VEBA AG VEBG.F> acquire 12.5 pct stake Hapag-Lloyd Deutsche Bank AG DBKG.F> Dresdner Bank AG DRSD.F>. Industry source estimate Deutsche Dresdner Hapag-Lloyd's majority shareholder held 75 pct Hapag-Lloyd's share capital sell portion Gevaert VEBA. The bank eventually want reduce stake shipping 15 pct each. REUTER 

Japan's Agency Natural Resources Energy begin experiment Thailand March start commercial production rare metal 1989 joint project. An agency official 500 mln yen pilot plant Bangkok extract quality rare metal titanium niobium sand left tin production process Thailand. The plant wilq tonne sand unclear rare metal extract official said. REUTER 

Hungary devalue forint average eight pct Western currency official news agency MTI said. MTI devaluation effective expect rate announce today. Hungary devalue forint similar amount September 23. Western banker forint realistically value currency Hungary's COMECON allies. REUTER 

Domestic turnover 4.48 billion mark v 4.29 billion. Turnover comprise - Coal round 1.14 billion v 1.22 billion Metal 851.0 mln v 1.14 billion Transport 435.3 mln v 534.4 mln Oil chemical 479.7 mln v 831.7 mln Plant construction 625.7 mln v 568.8 mln Miscellaneous 3.3 mln v 2.2 mln Turnover majority stake C. Deilmann AG consolidated 951.8 mln mark v nil Domestic fix asset investment 392.6 mln mark v 291.2 mln. Investment total include 76.3 mln mark investment C. Deilmann AG. REUTER 

Hillsdown Holdings Plc HLDN.L> result 1987 encourage combination investment acquisition strategy enable look forward confidently excellent result year. The company comment 1986 result show pre-tax profit rise 54.9 mln stg 33.4 mln previously turnover lift 1.70 billion 1.13 billion. The figure initially boost share price 286p 281p ease 283p 0830 GMT. Hillsdown capital expenditure rise 1986 60 mln stg 31.5 mln continue level 1987. The place 82.5 mln share raise 160.7 mln stg enable shareholders' fund double 352 mln year-end. Net borrowing 20 pct shareholder's fund list investment 47.1 mln. The company bought total 40 company total price 180 mln stg. Although minor contribution profit real benefit 1988 beyond. REUTER 

Iraq force crush Iranian attack strategic mountain peak rugged snow-clad Iraqi Kurdistan. The official Iraqi news agency INA attack repel yesterday Fifth Army Corps' 96th Brigade "Karda Ku" peak overlook northern post Haj Omran 340 km north Baghdad. INA hundred Iranians kill quantity armour weapon left behind. It Iraqi casualties. The Iranian news agency IRNA yesterday Iraqi troop suffer 3000 casualty Iran's week-old offensive northeast Iraq. Iran attack across snow-capped peak northeastern Iraq week heavy fight mid-1983. The thrust follow fierce battle near Basra Iraq's city southern front 6-1/2-year-old conflict Iranian cross-border offensive launch January 9. The political department Iraq's Defence Ministry Abdul Jabbar Muhsen Monday fight continue north Iran exaggerated battle reports. He Tehran "to failure south encourage anti-Baghdad Kurdish rebel support troops." Tehran support anti-Baghdad Kurdish guerrilla operation government position installation northern Iraq. REUTER 

Nippon Oil Co Ltd NPOL.T> predict parent company net profit nine billion yen end March 31 10.4 pct earlier president Yasuoki Takeuchi told press conference. Current profit estimate 17 18 billion yen 20 24 pct earlier said. Takeuchi sale expect fall 40 pct 1700 billion yen fifth consecutive year-on-year drop. This year's fall due low sell price end-users offset yen's appreciation. The company retain six yen dividend 1986/87. REUTER 

The joint committee Taiwan's soybean importer tender March 12 27000 tonne cargo U.S. Soybeans March 20 April 5 delivery committee spokesman told Reuters. Taiwan's soybean import calendar 1987 provisionally 1.81 mln tonne compare revise 1.74 mln tonne import year. The 1.74 mln tonne figure revise 1.76 mln tonnes. Taiwan import soybean United States. REUTER 

Shr 5.95p v 4.41p Div 2.25p v 2.0p Pre-tax profit 11.6 mln v 9.1 mln Tax 4.2 mln v 3.6 mln Turnover 256.3 mln v 185.3 mln Note - company unlikely second-half profit show rate increase first. But confidence prospect future growth. REUTER 

Nippon Steel Corp NSTC.T> Inland Steel Co> U.S. Are negotiate joint steel venture Indiana Nippon Steel spokesman decline details. Several local newspaper report joint venture capitalise 150 mln dlrs own 60 pct Inland 40 pct Nippon Steel annual production capacity mln tonne steel supply car makers. REUTER 

A billion stg tranche 8-3/4 pct Treasury Loan stock due 1997 exhaust trading U.K. Government bond market minute become available trading dealer said. The Bank England issue announce Monday available official dealing morning longer operating tap. The strike price partly paid 41 stg pct price bid allot 53.8 pct. Dealers note strong demand detect bond yesterday afternoon far stimulate sterling's surge opening morning. The issue announce Monday widely see move authority brake market optimism far U.K. Interest rate reduction follow half-point cut clearing bank base lending rate 10.5 pct earlier day. Dealers Bank's strategy succeed stem pressure far rate reduction briefly market yesterday recover ground lose Monday immediately announcement. Demand issue lively U.K. And overseas source particular see Japan. The bond issue price 96-16/32 stg pct partly paid 40 stg pct application Government broker morning sell premium stg pct partly paid issue price. The issue designate "B" tranche bond 1.3 billion stg 8-3/4 pct Treasury Loan stock due 1997 already issue. Dealers note Bank England week issue billion stg nine pct Exchequer bond due 2002 effort dampen enthusiasm rate reduction cause sterling's uptrend foreign exchange markets. Last week's issue sell dealing resemble determine demand see morning tranche bond dealer said. After stifle pressure rate cut week authority finally sanction base rate reduction Monday follow announcement billion stg bond issue. Sterling briefly depressed rate cut morning open strongly start trade-weighted basis 72.6 yesterday's final 72.1 edge 72.7. U.K. Money market rate decline morning 1/8 strongly reinforce yesterday's speculation clearing bank base lending rate drop single figure budget Tuesday money market dealer said. U.K. Government bond dealer note influence strong sterling far fall money market rate price morning open 3/4 high longer market. REUTER 

Sumitomo Corporation launch 200 mln Swiss franc convertible note due September 30 1992 coupon indication 5/8 pct lead manager Swiss Bank Corp said. The issue carry option 103 pct. Terms fix March 19 payment date March 30. REUTER 

The yen's rise dollar expect boost Japan's unemployment rate average 3.3 pct 1987/88 fiscal begin April 1 January's record pct private Nomura Research Institute said. The official 1987/88 estimate 2.9 pct. The research arm Nomura Securities Co forecast unemployment exceed mln mid-fiscal 1987 estimate 1.75 mln current year. Nomura urge government pump-priming measure redress trade imbalance boost employment. Employment manufacturing fiscal 1987/88 predict fall 550000 current due high job loss steel shipbuilding heavy electrical machinery sector Nomura said. Employment non-manufacturing sector continue increase institute give figures. REUTER 

Cargo handle remains halt Bangladesh's Chittagong port nearly 7000 worker walk Monday follow pay dispute Port Workers Association today. Fourteen ship strand port. Port official meet Association leader try resolve dispute. REUTER 

Cons banking gp net profit 496.7 mln schilling v 354.5 mln Cons banking gp balance sheet total year-end 453.4 Billion schilling v 425.4 billion Parent bank net profit 370.6 mln v 253.0 mln Parent bank balance sheet total 372.5 billion v 348.2 Billion Parent bank dividend 12 pct v 10 pct Parent bank div payout 363.0 mln schilling v 247.5 mln REUTER 

Norsk Hydro A/S NHY.O> issue 50 mln stg bond due April 15 1993 carry 9-7/8 pct coupon price 101-5/8 Hambros Bank Ltd lead manager. Norsk Hydro 51 pct own Kingdom Norway. The bond available denomination 1000 10000 stg list London Stock Exchange. Payment date April 15. Fees consist 1-1/4 pct sell concession 5/8 pct combine management underwriting. REUITER 

Tesco Plc TSCO.L> County Ltd> yesterday bought behalf 2.06 mln share 4.2 pct Hillards Plc> 302p 310p share. Tesco yesterday launch 151.4 mln stg bid north England supermarket chain Hillards promptly rejected. Hillards share quote 324p compare night's close 313p. REUTER 

The Tokyo Metropolitan Government float 100 mln dlr 10-year bond 7.5 pct coupon New York Yankee bond issue 21 years. The bond price 99.515 yield 7.585 pct. The issue immediately swap Swiss franc put actual rate pct Tokyo government spokeswoman said. The lead manager First Boston Corp co-leaders Goldman Sachs Co Merrill Lynch Capital Markets said. The fund sewerage reclamation work. REUTER 

Daewoo Industrial Co Ltd> South Korea sign 45 mln U.S. Dlr loan tomorrow Hong Kong unit lead manager Banque Nationale de Paris said. The three-year loan carry 1/2 percentage London interbank offer rate borrow name Daewoo Industrial Co (H.K.) Ltd>. The loan mainly finance repayment company's borrowings. The lead manager Arab Banking Corp Bank Tokyo Ltd KEB (Asia) Finance Ltd. There 24 manager five participants. REUTER 

Shr 8.1p loss v 26.3p earnings Div 3.25p make 5.25p v 10.5p Net loss 62.1 mln stg v 71.6 mln profit Operating profit tax 73.6 mln v 273.8 mln Turnover 1.47 billion v 1.74 billion Cost sale 1.22 billion v 1.39 billion Gross profit 241.8 mln v 357.6 mln Distribution cost administrative expense 152.2 mln v 123.1 mln Share profit associate 17.1 mln v 68.2 mln Other operating income 15.8 mln v 16.9 mln Financing charge 48.9 mln v 45.8 mln Tax 63.9 mln v 169.7 mln Exceptional item 4.9 mln debit v 5.5 mln debit Net result discontinue operation 15.6 mln debit v 20.9 mln debit Loss ordinary activity minority 10.8 Mln v 77.7 mln profit Minority 11.3 mln v 6.1 mln Extraordinary debit 40.0 mln v nil REUTER 

The Bank England forecast liquidity shortage 300 mln stg market today. Among main factor Bank bill mature official hand treasury bill take-up drain 483 mln stg below target bankers' balance rise note circulation 50 mln 100 mln stg respectively. Partially offset exchequer transaction add 355 mln stg Bank added. REUTER 

The Belgian National Bank bought foreign currency franc market week end March 9 Bank spokesman said. In line central bank policy decline detail amount bought. The foreign currency purchase Treasury repay foreign debt affect Bank's foreign exchange reserves. They slip 394 mln franc 37.33 billion mostly due sale dollar Special Drawing Rights spokesman said. REUTER 

Japanese car maker curb export European Community (EC) follow unofficial directive Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) automobile industry source said. Some source export EC likely unchanged year's 1.10 mln unit fall due anticipate slacken EC economic growth increase trade friction. Last week MITI vice minister international affair Makoto Kuroda ministry car maker exercise prudence export Europe. Japanese car maker boost export EC January build deplete vehicle inventory industry source said. Japan's vehicle export Europe January rise 38 pct earlier 174133 units. In December export fell 70.4 pct year-on-year maker curbed shipment meet earlier directive MITI limit 1986 export said. REUTER 

Lending World Bank soft loan arm International Development Agency (IDA) China expect double billion dlrs 1989/90 level 1984 1986 foreign banker told Reuters. They approve lending 1986/87 (July-June) expect total 1.4 billion dlrs 550 mln IDA 850 mln World Bank. World Bank figure show approve lending China body amount 1.137 billion 1985/86 1.102 billion 1984/85 1.04 billion 1983/84. The banker 1.2 billion dlrs disburse 1986 China's disbursement record compare favourably countries. They Japan main source bilateral concessional assistance China follow West Germany Canada Italy Australia Britain. But China probably fund increase except Japan World Bank claim particularly sub-Saharan African country cannot raise commercial credit added. REUTER 

Shr 28.5p v 26.6p. Final div 8p make 13p v 12p. Pre-tax profit 132.4 mln stg v 132.7 mln. Net profit befire minority 81.0 mln v 74.4 mln. Sales 2.06 billion stg v 2.20 billion. Extraordinary debit 36.5 mln v 20.4 mln. Trading surplus depreciation 145.7 mln stg v 158.1 Mln Investment income 5.4 mln v 3.8 mln Interest payable 42.5 mln v 43.9 mln Profits related company loss 23.8 mln v 14.7 mln Tax 51.4 mln v 58.3 mln Profit attributable outside shareholders' interest 12.6 Mln v 11.2 mln Note - Extraordinary debit include charge restructuring auto part distribution France loss 10 mln stg sale steel stock business. Trading surplus comprise - Automotive component product 101 mln stg v 105 mln Industrial service supply 30 mln v 21 mln Wholesale industrial distribution 11 mln v 22 mln Steels forging mln v 10 mln By region Britain contribute 34 mln stg v 47 mln Continental Europe 77 mln v 56 mln U.S.A. 28 mln v 51 mln Rest seven mln v mln REUTER 

Genetech Inc GENE.O> issue 100 mln dlr convertible bond due March 30 2002 indicate coupon five 5-1/2 pct issue price par Credit Suisse First Boston (CSFB) lead manager. Genentech's stock close 58-5/8 New York Stock Exchange night. CSFB final term March 12 anticipate conversion premium 20 25 pct. The security available bearer register form denomination 5000 dlrs each. The deal callable immediately 106 decline pct thereafter. However stock price rise 130 pct conversion level issue callable immediately CSFB said. PaineWebber co-lead manager. Fees consist 1-1/2 pct sell concession pct combine management underwriting fee. REUTER 

China's foreign debt reach 27 billion dlrs 1986 despite over-exposure short-term credit yen borrowing China remains creditworthy improve 1987 export outlook foreign banker Chinese official told Reuters. Foreign banker China's total debt rise sharply estimate 20 billion dlrs end-1985 cover increase import commitment debt/equity ratio remains low eight 10 pct. China remains cautious popular borrower said. Zhang Haoruo vice minister Foreign Economic Relations Trade Friday China sign foreign loan agreement 6.94 billion dlrs 96.6 pct 1985 actual loan amount 4.83 billion 93 pct. Officials China borrow 25 30 billion dlrs 1986-90 five plan period foreign banker estimate foreign loan 30 40 billion. A Western banker China's portfolio contains short-term debt denominate yen result aggressive lending Japanese bank attractive low rate Japanese market. The strong yen appreciation cost China dearly likely reduce yen borrowing banker said. A Chinese trade official estimate yen component country's total debt 30 pct. The Peking representative Japanese security rapid yen rise caught China firm unawares. "Interest rate Japan historical low China remain active borrower likely elsewhere capital currency spread" said. The Western banker excess short-term loan result China's inexperience foreign capital market enter 1980s. "Officials China department firm. Some loan enter full backing People's Republic China" said. "The dilemma China foreign borrowing area balance central control give reasonable autonomy firms. It search mechanism exercise indirect controls" said. The banker official stress repeatedly past six week China's foreign borrowing affected drive "bourgeois liberalism" phrase meaning Western political idea follow dismissal Communist Party chief Hu Yaobang January 16. A U.S. Banker evidence China's foreign exchange reserve fall below officially state figure 10 billion dlrs. "The Bank China buyer seller market quickly buying heavily advance announcement reserve down" said. The banker buying on. "Things normal. Trade deficit China 1985 normal country stage development." Customs figure show China trade deficit 11.9 billion dlrs 1986 14 billion 1985. A Ministry Foreign Economic Relations Trade official year's outlook export account 75 pct foreign exchange earnings healthier ago. The renminbi match U.S. Dollar fall said. It quote 3.72 little change 3.7 ago. The official China take measure improve export performance include incentive offer exporter establishment export production bases. "We expect high price oil export year" added. Official estimate China's 1986 export loss drop oil price billion dlrs. A Western diplomat China's foreign debt need careful management debt service ratio remains low six eight pct. "We base assessment China's foreign exchange reserve export performance ass company performance bank account" said. He China perform export field remains creditworthy country difficulty increase borrowing. REUTER 

U.S. Commercial bank expect receive Finance Ministry approval late April operate security subsidiary Japan U.S. Bank official said. A senior official prospective bank ministry told bank approval parent firm hold 50 pct capital. "We expect ministry permission April" said. J.P. Morgan Co> Bankers Trust New York Corp BT.N> Manufacturers Hanover Corp MHC.N> Chemical New York Corp FNBF.N> security licenses. Ministry official decline formal approval work issue. Approval pave U.S. Commercial bank underwrite trade equity Japan names. Citicorp CCI.N> Chase Manhattan Corp CMB.N> already enter Japanese security market acquire U.K. Securities house already operating Japan. Citicorp Vickers de Costa Ltd> Chase bought Laurie Milbank Co>. Bankers bank license J.P. Morgan probably ask. REUTER 

Ultramar Plc UMAR.L> fourth 1986 quarter improve operational view special charge adversely affected results. Overall upstream operation dramatically hit fall crude oil price downstream operation affected half loss inventories. But margin improve half particular refining marketing Eastern Canada show recovery. The company comment result show net loss 62.1 mln stg 71.6 mln profit 1985. The fourth quarter charge include 20.8 mln stg provision retroactive price agreement recently initial Pertamina Japanese buyer company's liquid natural gas 4.7 mln month ownership Gulf Canada's marketing assets. Ultramar include estimate cost far reorganisation programme partly offset withdrawal surplus fund U.S. Pension scheme 13.5 mln stg provision estimate cost sell U.S. Flag shipping operation. The immediate outlook crude oil price uncertain unlikely sizeable increase near term. However Ultramar optimistic price strengthen longer term. Its substantial reserve crude oil natural gas position benefit price recovery. In meantime Ultramar's objective improve profitability sell restructuring weak operation strengthen core business develop sound operational financial base. Proven probable reserve end-1986 total 700 mln barrel net oil-equivalent basis. Ultramar share firm announcement 187p 181p night's close. REUTER 

The Queensland Press Ltd> (QPL) board unanimously recommend billion dlr takeover bid Cruden Investments Pty Ltd> company News Corp Ltd NCPA.S> chief executive Rupert Murdoch. The 23 dlrs share cash-only offer nearly double market price News announce now-completed bid The Herald Weekly Times Ltd HWTA.S> December offer likely statement. Independent adviser Wardley Australia Ltd> conclude offer fair reasonable added. QPL already own 48.3 pct HWT. REUTER 

The European Community (EC) Commission decline official reaction report european operator plan offer mln tonne sugar intervention protest Commission export policies. However spokesman Commission confirm offer intervention agency various member week agency concerned complete necessary documentation. The spokesman current regulation EC accept offer technical problems. The spokesman Commission reimburse member cost buying-in sugar product sell intervention store date. He virtually sugar held intervention stores. Last 45000 tonne sell intervention 1984-85 campaign 108000 tonnes. REUTER 

A tight money market push rate six month deposit 15 18 pct 13 15 pct month ago banker said. March usually tight month money market tax payment banks' attract fund year-end account March 31. This situation bad December's rush buy dollar company businessmen fear imposition exchange controls. Much outflow yet convert rupiah. "A lot money money hold April" U.S. Banker said. The tight money policy Bank Indonesia central bank help keep rate high. Short-term lending rate average 25 pct prospect lower soon banker said. Central Bank governor Arifin Siregar earlier week Indonesia look forward economic prospect 1987/88 add "speculators" lead run rupiah late pose problems. Indonesia hold election April 23 five businessmen expect government economic package incentive then. "Some nervous government election" banker said. "They normally try IGGI (Inter-Governmental Group Indonesia) meeting (in June) prove do economy show deserve couple billion dollars." The IGGI group 14 industrialise donor country agency give Indonesia 2.5 billion dlrs soft loan grant year. REUTER 

News International NWSL.L> Plc issue 100 mln dlrs senior unsubordinated note due April 10 1990 carry coupon 7-1/2 pct price par Credit Suisse First Boston lead manager. The note non-callable available denomnations 1000 5000 dlrs. Payment date April 10. They guaranteed News Corp Ltd. Fees consist 7/8 pct sell concession 1/2 pct combine management underwriting. REUTER 

The Bank Nova Scotia Nassau branch issue 50 mln New Zealand dlr eurobond due April 14 1989 carry 18-1/4 pct coupon price 101 pct lead manager Morgan Stanley International said. The issue form deposit note co-lead Dominion Securities Wood Gundy Inc. The bond available denomination 1000 10000 dlrs payment date April 14. Fees comprise 3/4 pct sell concession 1/2 pct management underwriting. REUTER 

Polly Peck International Plc> agree 10 mln ordinary share 203p institutional investors. Polly Peck proposes 20.3 mln stg raise share place far development expansion European marketing base hasten development agricultural source network Southern Hemisphere. The company add investment assist group's agricultural division realise aim catering increasingly diverse range worldwide market round basis. REUTER 

Highveld Steel Vanadium Corp Ltd expect 1987 earnings low year's previously report 85 ct share. But profit "will satisfactory level" company annual report give specific estimate. Highveld expect appreciation rand offset extent increase U.S. Dollar price export progresses. Highveld measure take European Economic Community United States prohibit South African steel product "presents challenge management steel areas." The company overall vanadium consumption 1987 expect similar China's role unknown factor total supply-demand situation. "World vanadium production capacity believe adequate cater foreseeable demand" added. REUTER 

The South Korean government float 150 billion won exchange equalisation bond month Ministry Finance official said. The Bank Korea issue bond launch annual rate 11 pct bank official said. The float response nation's increase current account surplus design limit growth M-2 money supply 18 pct said. South Korea's M-2 supply February total 33992 billion won 18.89 pct year-earlier figure. REUTER 

Saudi Arabia bought 5000 tonne refine bleach deodorise palm olein import tender yesterday April 16/25 shipment 353 dlrs tonne cost freight Jeddah trader said. REUTER 

Investors Industry International BV issue 500 mln franc bond warrant guaranteed Investors Industry Plc lead manager Credit Commercial de France said. Listing London. The issue coupon 9-1/8 pct matures April 7 1994 price 101 pct. Fees total 1-7/8 pct 1-1/4 sell 5/8 management underwriting. There call par third year. Each 10000-franc bond 275 franc warrant give exchange host bond similar non-callable 9-1/8 pct 1994 bond four-seven buy 9-1/8 pct 1994 non-callable bond. REUTER 

The Bank Thailand float 500 mln baht five-year loan bond sale. The bond yield 7.25 pct net tax compound semi-annually. The aggregate five-year yield amount 42.77 pct principal maturity. REUTER 

Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone step plan overhaul Japan's tax get parliamentary approval closest aide today. The aide decline identify private meeting "Nakasone's office necessarily terminate term October. It depends (the) seven tax reform bill parliamentary approval." Nakasone vowed yesterday press plan despite Sunday's unexpected Upper House by-election defeat ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) conservative stronghold. The socialist winner back opposition party campaign controversial five pct value add sale tax main plank reform plans. The aide dismiss possibility amendment sale tax ground opposition party demand retraction tax. They refuse discus draft budget 1987 fiscal start April 1 include tax plans. They resort on-off boycott parliament February 4. "If I Nakasone I close current regular parliamentary session May 27 schedule attend Venice summit industrial democracy June extraordinary session discus tax plans" aide said. Under law regular session extend extraordinary session extend twice.The option extend current session said. "The opposition party surely no-confidence motion Nakasone Cabinet stage another." One scenario reject motion opening tax reform. "Another scenario resignation Nakasone Cabinet en masse. A third scenario dissolution Lower House snap election" aide said. That 200 opposition resign 512-seat Lower House necessitate by-elections. The LDP 304 seat Lower House landslide victory election July. There five independent vacancies. "The LDP candidate certainly inflate seat expense fierce medium criticism" aide said. He expect propose sale tax little effect local election held April 12 26. About 2600 election held nation's 47 prefecture include 13 gubernatorial elections. "Candidates run prefectural assembly oppose sale tax irrespective party tickets. "Possible effect gubernatorial election Japan's northernmost island Hokkaido Fukuoka southern Japan" said. The post held opposition socialists. REUTER 

Credit Foncier de France issue 150 mln ECU eurobond due April 14 1994 7-5/8 pct price 101-5/8 pct lead manager Banque Paribas Capital Markets said. The issue guaranteed France 50 mln ecu tap exercisable six months. The bond available denomination 1000 10000 ECUs list Luxembourg. Fees comprise 1-1/4 pct sell concession 5/8 pct management underwtriting combined. Payment date April 14. REUTER 

A spokesman Preussag AG PRSG.F> yet whether company pay dividend 1986 result He comment Preussag statement result 1986 low 1985. Preussag frequently result far pressure 1986 follow difficult 1985. Managing board chairman Guenther Sassmannshausen December board prefer stick policy dip reserve pay dividends. The spokesman note final dividend decision rest supervisory board. The Preussag statement result fell 1986 compare 1985 decline earnings metal oil shipping entirely compensate positive trend group's divisions. The spokesman clear whether domestic show net profit 1986 add depend partly level provisions. Preussag cut 1985 dividend eight mark nine mark 1984 result parent company net profit drop 65.0 mln mark 103.0 mln before. The Preussag net loss 13.1 mln mark 1985 net profit 154.5 mln before. Domestic net profit fell 77.9 mln 122.2 mln. The statement result 1986 affected unsatisfactory sell price metal oil poor capacity supply ship sector. The reduction natural gas price fourth quarter 1986 reflect earlier fall oil price additional factor behind drop results. Preussag rationalization measure already introduce begin full effect year. Preussag's domestic turnover rise 4.48 billion mark 1986 4.29 billion 1985 help consolidation 951.8 mln mark turnover majority-owned oil gas subsidiary C. Deilmann AG. Domestic turnover 1986 fourth quarter alone 1.1 billion mark give comparison figures. Preussag domestic crude oil production fell 4.0 pct 94400 tonne 1986 foreign oil production rise 182900 tonne 174500 tonnes. Preussag Amalgamated Metal Corporation Plc (AMC) subsidiary whose result include account unspecified profit fourth quarter year. AMC's loss 1985 cause principally international tin crisis reason behind loss year. REUTER 

Dutch car import rise 27.5 pct 1986 610500 unit 1986 reflect 41.8 pct growth Japanese import association Dutch vehicle industry reported. Dutch import Japanese car rise 41.8 pct 143880 unit compare 37.4 pct rise import EC country 437500 unit association quote unpublished Central Bureau Statistics figures. The figure excludes Dutch import vehicle final destination outside Netherlands. REUTER 

Foreign oil company spend exploration Indonesia budgeting 2.7 billion dlrs calendar 1987 1986 spending 2.8 billion dlrs oil company Pertamina said. Actual spending fell short budget figure 3.2 billion dlrs oil company slash expenditure crash oil prices. Jumardi Jukardi Pertamina's coordinate board foreign contractor foreign company drill 110 exploration well 431 development well 108 330 year. REUTER 

Imperial Chemical Industries Plc ICI.L> issue 100 mln stg eurobond due April 15 2005 pay 9-3/4 pct price 101-1/4 pct lead manager Warburg Securities said. Morgan Grenfell Co Ltd co-lead. The bond partly paid form 30 pct due April 15 remainder due payment July 15. It available denomination 1000 10000 stg list London. Fees comprise 1-1/2 pct sell concession 1/2 pct management underwriting. REUTER 

Negotiations Indonesia's oil company Pertamina foreign oil contractor extension standard 30-year production share contract conclude month Pertamina official said. Jumardi Jukardi Pertamina's foreign contractor coordinate board give detail outcome talks. But Pertamina President Abdul Rachman Ramly priority extend contract company whose exploration production contract expire seven 10 years. Jukardi speak Indonesian reporter negotiation determine whether 85-15 production share split favour Pertamina adhere alter case oil company ask for. Hardjoko Seputro spokesman Mines Energy Ministry President Suharto agree principle extension standard 30-year production share contract reflect current depressed condition international oil market. REUTER 

Salomon Brothers International's CMO Eurotrust subsidiary issue 228 mln dlr collateralised mortgage obligation price par yield 40 basis point three-month London interbank offer rate (Libor) Salomon lead manager. However paid quarterly cannot rise above 11.50 pct. The state maturity date issue May 1 2017 deal expect 3.6 vary rate homebuyers prepay mortgage The pool consists Federal National Mortgage Association (Fannie Mae) security pay 10.50 pct. The issue settle April 27 accrue interest. Salomon note issue carry low spread Libor CMO issue euromarkets date. In explain pricing Salomon official note heavy demand high-coupon U.S.Agency mortgage issue Fannie Maes rise price collateral pass investors. REUTER 

Traders Paris result today's EC sugar tender hard forecast plan French West German Dutch Belgian operator sell mln tonne sugar intervention. London trader bid licence report 43.00 44.00 Ecus 100 kilo licence grant likely towards low range possibly 43.30/43.50 Ecus. Traders Paris expect maximum rebate 43 43.50 Ecus. Other Commission release sugar export likely tonnage expect London trader French source decline estimate volume view psychological impact plan sale intervention protest EC export policies. Last week licence 60500 tonne award maximum rebate 43.147 Ecus. REUTER 

South Korea far market cut trade surplus U.S. And fight pressure revalue won dollar government spokesman said. The spokesman Korean trade minister Rha Woong-Bae's stand Washington yesterday pressure industrial nation revalue won underlined government's determination stand firm. Rha told U.S. Chamber Commerce "Demands Korea carry drastic sudden currency revaluation five 10 pct I believe extremely ill-advised." Deputy prime minister Kim Mahn-Je told meeting local businessmen "The government's policy question revalue won maintain steadfast position." Kim South Korea ready move slowly raise won's value heavy foreign debt stood 44.5 billion dlrs 1986. Six industrialise nation agree Paris month newly industrialise country South Korea Taiwan allow currency appreciate. But local businessmen won/dollar parity already reach "a crisis level." An official Korea Traders' Association (KTA) won strengthen five pct mean loss profitability nearly half South Korean exporters. "We determine Latin American debtor nation suspend payment debts" spokesman said. "The keep record maintain exports.+ The trade minister yesterday Seoul revalue won suddenly Korea run "a tremendous trade deficit degenerate country develop country renege international obligations." The spokesman South Korea gradually appreciate currency ruling major revaluation. So won go 0.8 pct dollar 3.34 pct revaluation 1986. He South Korea select "many" 122 item Washington recently Seoul low tariff narrow trade surplus U.S. No far detail given. Seoul announce January lift ban 158 item include sensitive agricultural product car effective July. South Korea post current account surplus due largely trade surplus U.S. Of 7.1 billion dlrs 4.3 billion deficit 1985. It earlier forecast current account surplus reach eight billion dlrs year. But government official surplus held five billion dlrs avoid far pressure industrialise nation push value currency. REUTER 

Security Services Plc unit Securicor Group Plc seek 50 mln stg multi-option facility County NatWest Capital Markets arranger. The facility seven allow borrower issue multi-currency advance sterling acceptance tender panel. There underwriting margin 3/16 pct London interbank offer rate. Underwriters receive fee 15 basis point available portion facility fee 10 basis point unavailable portion half facility. There utilization fee 1/16 pct half facility use. Securicor Group subsidiary guarantee facility. REUTER 

Call money ease 3.75/80 pct 3.80/85 yesterday follow net injection 6.7 billion mark rate 3.80 pct fresh fund week's security repurchase agreement dealer said. But rate expect rise week. A major tax payment period bank behalf customer payment federal railway loan stock repayment mark liability incur foreign central bank Bundesbank framework European Monetary System (EMS) likely significantly burden system. Banks built minimum reserve ahead expect outflow. The Bundesbank credit bank gross 15.2 billion mark 8.5 billion left earlier security repurchase pact matured. Dealers estimate EMS related outflow six billion marks. The Bundesbank decline comment spokesman yesterday fund due allow roll possibility central bank choose redeem meant net infusion needed. Dealers forecast tax payment 25 30 billion mark expect burden week. Banks' minimum reserve holding Bundesbank total 53.6 billion mark Monday average 54.0 billion nine day March. Dealers figure above expect requirement 51 billion mark expect outflow fund bank difficult meet requirement March. No security repurchase agreement expire week dealer Bundesbank offer fresh liquidity condition significantly tighten. "The Bundesbank want keep rate 3.80 pct" dealer said. REUTER 

Krupp Stahl AG KRPB.F> cut 2000 total 18000 job 1987 consider reduce force far 3000 subsequent years. The company 70.4 pct own Fried Krupp GmbH job loss immediate longer-term restructuring plans. The statement deny publish report total job loss amount 9000 employees. Krupp previously force cut necessary weaker condition steel market. REUTER 

Borrowing international capital market rise moderately February 25.9 billion dlrs medium term fund raise 1.5 billion January 3.2 billion February Organisation Economic Cooperation Development OECD said. Borrowing external bond market total 20.8 billion dlrs 2.8 billion January OECD late monthly report. But market float rate note (FRNs) far serious difficulty volume offering 1.4 billion dlrs 1986 monthly average 4.2 billion. However OECD issue straight bond especially equity-related issue continued brisk pace. As January exchange rate uncertainty major impact currency composition bond issue issue dlrs total 6.5 billion monthly average 10 billion dlrs 1986. "The share U.S. Dollar total external bond offering fall below 32 pct - low figure decade" report add market absorbed record volume yen offerings. In syndicate credit market volume loan decline 3.9 billion dlrs February 4.7 billion January. Activity market note issuance back-up facility continued particularly subdue total 1.2 billion dlrs complete February 500 mln dlrs already depressed figure January. In February OECD borrower account 85 pct total borrowing major borrower include U.S. With 4.5 billion dlrs Japan 3.1 billion France billion addition billion dlr refinance electricity board EDF. REUTER 

Shr 21.2p v 16.0p Div 4.75p make 8.25p v 5.83p Pretax profit 505 mln stg v 362 mln Turnover 4.02 billion v 3.88 billion Tax 128 mln v 85 mln Operating profit 527 mln v 421 mln Operating profit include - Other income 30 mln v 41 mln Financial cost 52 mln v 100 mln Minorities 25 mln v 16 mln Earnings 352 mln v 261 mln Extraordinary credit 78 mln v 34 mln debit. REUTER 

A Turkish-West German joint venture Turk Henkel A.S. Issued commercial paper Turkey private Yapi ve Kredi Bankasi A.S. Bank official said. "A total 500 mln lira commercial paper Turk Henkel A.S. Is sale today" Osman Erk deputy general-manager Yapi ve Kredi Bankasi told Reuters. He 90-day paper chemical company annualised yield 46.64 pct. Turkey pass legislation allow commercial paper. Erk capital requirement issue commercial paper Turkish company meet. "The Capital Markets Board limited yield 46.64 pct slightly high 90-day government paper" Erk said. REUTER 

The Tokyo Metropolitan Government float 100 mln dlr 10-year bond 7.5 pct coupon New York Yankee bond issue 21 years. The bond price 99.515 yield 7.585 pct. The issue immediately swap Swiss franc put actual rate pct Tokyo government spokeswoman said. The lead manager First Boston Corp co-leaders Goldman Sachs Co Merrill Lynch Capital Markets said. The fund sewerage reclamation work. REUTER 

The yen's rise dollar expect boost Japan's unemployment rate average 3.3 pct 1987/88 fiscal begin April 1 January's record pct private Nomura Research Institute said. The official 1987/88 estimate 2.9 pct. The research arm Nomura Securities Co forecast unemployment exceed mln mid-fiscal 1987 estimate 1.75 mln current year. Nomura urge government pump-priming measure redress trade imbalance boost employment. Employment manufacturing fiscal 1987/88 predict fall 550000 current due high job loss steel shipbuilding heavy electrical machinery sector Nomura said. Employment non-manufacturing sector continue increase institute give figures. REUTER 

The Bank China card-issuing member Visa International> Visa's chief manager Asia Carl Pascarella statement. Visa design card China international credit card accepted yet issued. He Visa develop training program bank card issuance processing procedures. A Chinese visit Visa's San Francisco headquarters month discus future cooperation said. REUTER 

A billion stg tranche 8-3/4 pct Treasury Loan stock due 1997 exhaust trading U.K. Government bond market minute become available trading dealer said. The Bank England issue announce Monday available official dealing morning longer operating tap. The strike price partly paid 41 stg pct price bid allot 53.8 pct. Dealers note strong demand detect bond yesterday afternoon far stimulate sterling's surge opening morning. Reuter 

Indonesia sign agreement borrow 150 billion yen untied yen loan Japan's governmental Export-Import Bank bank spokesman said. The accord loan Indonesia's 21 development project sign visit Indonesian Finance Minister Radius Prawiro Ex-Im President Takashi Tanaka spokesman said. The loan bank's untied loan Asian country co-financing World Bank tie purchase Japanese good service said. REUTER 

The Bank Spain extend reserve requirement bank convertible peseta fund attempt curb speculation short-term capital currently fuel money supply growth. In statement issue late central bank convertible peseta account fund subject exchange control subject 19 pct reserve requirement effect Friday. Convertible peseta fund previously exempt reserve requirements. The measure come week central bank raise reserve requirement domestic deposit percentage 19 pct effect Friday. Banking source real rate offer -- eight pct overnight fund -- attract influx speculative foreign capital threaten government's monetary targets. They influx largely responsible Spain's principal measure money supply broad-based liquid asset hand (ALP) grown estimate 17 pct annualised rate February compare January's 8.3 pct rise 11.4 pct rise 1986. The target 1987 eight pct. The Bank Spain provide assistance fund bank move drain excess liquidity money market. Liquidity far tighten fortnightly Treasury Bill auction tomorrow Friday's hike reserve requirement expect absorb 200 billion peseta system. The immediate reaction hike interbank rate 13.75/14.00 pct yesterday's 13.46 pct average deposits. Bank Spain official understandable response "given market short funds." But banking source note continued rise rate neutralize central bank's attempt curtail short-term speculation foreign fund make Spanish money market attractive. REUTER 

Iraq force crush Iranian attack strategic mountain peak rugged snow-clad Iraqi Kurdistan. The official Iraqi news agency INA attack repel yesterday Fifth Army Corps' 96th Brigade "Karda Ku" peak overlook northern post Haj Omran 340 km north Baghdad. INA hundred Iranians kill quantity armour weapon left behind. It Iraqi casualties. The Iranian news agency IRNA yesterday Iraqi troop suffer 3000 casualty Iran's week-old offensive northeast Iraq. Iran attack across snow-capped peak northeastern Iraq week heavy fight mid-1983. The thrust follow fierce battle near Basra Iraq's city southern front 6-1/2-year-old conflict Iranian cross-border offensive launch January 9. The political department Iraq's Defence Ministry Abdul Jabbar Muhsen Monday fight continue north Iran exaggerated battle reports. He Tehran "to failure south encourage anti-Baghdad Kurdish rebel support troops." Tehran support anti-Baghdad Kurdish guerrilla operation government position installation northern Iraq. REUTER 

Hungary devalue forint average eight pct Western currency official news agency MTI said. MTI devaluation effective expect rate announce today. Hungary devalue forint similar amount September 23. Western banker forint realistically value currency Hungary's COMECON allies. REUTER 

Prices rise Danish bond market Prime Minister Poul Schlueter government prepared impose far austerity measure limit domestic consumption economy improve summer. A typical 20-year mortgage bond risen 81 noon 79-1/4 close night. "It optimism government intervene necessary" dealer told Reuters. Schlueter routine cabinet meeting yesterday "If economic tighten necessary it." The government already impose austerity package December 1985 attempt bring external current account deficit rise preliminary 34.5 billion crown 1986 29.1 billion previous year. Schlueter clear autumn election government postpone austerity measures. The government call election January 1988. He express surprise concern financial quarter level private wage settlement month worth minimum pct year. These lead high productivity Schlueter said. REUTER 

Bank Japan governor Satoshi Sumita little left central bank far ease credit policy rate level approach low limit. "The government instead seek way make fiscal policy" told press conference. His remark concerned comprehensive economic stimulative package government plan adopt come days. At recent talk six major industrialise nation Paris Japan promise comprehensive economic package boost domestic demand turn increase import reduce trade surplus. Sumita economy show gradual upturn half yen remains stable. He caution foreign exchange market far rise yen mark explains recent stability currency markets. Conflicting economic indicator U.S. Have dampen market activity added. REUTER 

Gunze Sangyo Inc Tokyo issue 25 mln Swiss franc five convertible note 1-1/2 pct coupon lead manager Swiss Volksbank said. The conversion price 463 yen share compare today's 450 yen close. Payment due March 30. REUTER 

The Finance Ministry auction yesterday 1000 billion yen tankoku six-month debt financing paper produce record low average yield 3.246 pct aggressive bidding security houses. The tankoku mature September 21 1987. The previous record low 3.383 pct auction February 12. One major Japanese security bought 39.5 pct total 1021.1 billion yen bid accepted ministry source said. Securities house bid aggressively retail account tokkin special money trust trust fund show strong tankoku increase demand short-term fund management security manager said. The yield tankoku issue discount basis below 4.26/12 pct rate six-month certificate deposit today. In previous auction 1000 billion yen major 92 pct issue increase tankoku inventory manager said. Bids total 1975.8 billion yen. The average price 98.36 yield 3.246 pct low 98.33 give 3.314 pct Ministry said. REUTER 

Westpac Banking Corp Melbourne University Institute Applied Economic Social Research lead index Australian economic activity rise ninth successive month December. The index rise 134.1 (base 1980) 129.8 November 122.8 earlier Westpac-Institute report said. Annualised rise 13 pct December seven pct November pct earlier base ratio late index average previous 12 months. The report index 12 point 9.8 pct above trough March 1986. Westpac's chief economist Bob Graham consistent upward trend lead index emphasise tough mini-budget May. "An untoward increase consumption spending balance payment improves disastrous consequences" said. The coincident index rise annualised pct December zero movement November seven pct rise earlier Westpac Institute said. They index continued show current recession shallow likely involve slow real growth absolute fall economic activity. REUTER 

Japan cannot bear far rise yen Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari said. "A far strong yen misfortune Japan Japanese able bear burden" told reporters. The minister want tell U.S. Political leader sacrifice Japan make cut trade surplus. Kuranari widely expect fly Washington tomorrow talk focus trade. But departure remains uncertain continue parliamentary boycott opposition party protest plan sale tax. If boycott lift tomorrow Kuranari probably remain Japan attend parliamentary discussion government's 1987/88 budget Japanese official said. Kuranari U.S. And Japan approach trade imbalance calm unemotional manner. But add "If issue rice raised...I mention feeling Japanese people." Japanese politician repeatedly country cannot bow U.S. Pressure liberalize rice import issue sensitive. REUTER 

The Bank England operate money market morning. Initially bank forecast liqudity shortage 300 mln stg market today. Overnight interbank sterling trade 11-1/4 1/8 pct level morning period rate ease strength sterling dealer said. At 1200 gmt sterling's trade-weighted index 0.6 72.7. REUTER 

The U.S. urge reluctant commercial bank seriously consider accept novel Philippine proposal pay bill believe innovation fully consistent Third World debt strategy Reagan administration official said. The official's comment suggest debtors' plea rate concession treat seriously commercial bank case develop nation carry genuine economic reforms. In addition signal bank reconsider idea "megabank" Third World debt pool suggest administration support plan formally propose it. At official express reservation scheme ground. The Philippine proposal together Argentine suggestion "exit bonds" issue troublesome role bank debt strategy underpin flag role private bank plan official interview Reuters. "All fit definition initiative novel unique approach considered" official named. In October 1985 Washington outline debt crisis strategy commercial bank multilateral institution World Bank International Monetary Fund (IMF) urge step lending major debtor nations. In return America call debtor country enact economic reform promote inflation-free economic growth. "The multilaterals perform debtor perform well" official. But admit large Third World debtor Brazil clearly exception. The official played key role develop U.S. Debt strategy administration economic policymaker idea commercial bank improve role resolve Third World debt crisis. "We call begin bank syndication procedure process whereby operate effectively" official said. Among idea official suggestion commercial bank create "megabank" swap Third World debt paper so-called "exit bonds" bank regional American European institutions. Such bond theory rid bank lend money former debtor money package assemble suggest Argentina current negotiation loan 2.15 billion dlrs. He emphasise "megabank" administration plan "something suggested." Other U.S. Officials Japanese commercial bank examine creation consortium bank assume Third World debt. This plan actively consideration differ slightly official described. But official express deep misgiving plan United States. "If bank suitable fine. I don't will." He point bank swap Third World loan capital megabank reluctant provide money debtor institution. Meanwhile official praise Philippine plan payment debt cash 5/8 pct above Libor. "The Philippine proposal interest it's quite unique I don't it's categorically reject hand" official said. Banks found level unacceptably low offer alternative Libor payment cash margin above pct form Philippine Investment Notes. These tradeable dollar-denominated note six-year bank swap cash maturity country guarantee payment 7/8 Libor. Until banker criticise spread low. The talk week aim stretch repayment 3.6 billion dlrs debt grant easy term 5.8 billion already reschedule debt. The country enjoy strong political support Washington Corazon Aquino owes overall 27.8 billion dlrs debt. But official deny plan amount rate capitalisation development unacceptable banks. "It's rate capitalisation write spread Libor exist before" official comment suggest ought grant rate concession seek. "Some argue (cutting spread) debt forgiveness... What really narrow spread money" added. He U.S. Debt strategy sufficiently broad initiative include plan Philippines'. Reuter 

Interest currency future market shift soar British pound potentially explosive Canadian dollar dull Continental Japanese currency analyst said. The June pound add 6.3 cent past week-and-a-half reach contract 1.5930 dollar Monday spawn new-found speculative boom. "Brokers push client somewhere...and technically pound shape" PaineWebber analyst Jason Gillard said. "We've try bullish approach pound we're stay there's reason change" Smith Barney analyst Craig Sloane said. Many trader pound/short West German mark future position cross-trades liquidate yesterday Sloane said. The fundamental key pound's rise relatively U.K. rate vague optimism surround British economy analyst said. "Money seem chase yields" William Byers Bear Stearns 10-1/2 pct U.K. base lending rate. Many analyst skeptical far gain pound inference Bank England seek relieve upward pressure currency push rate nation's budget release March 17. The budget impact depend receive analyst relative rate oil income remain main influence currency. However market able absorb low U.K. rate country cut discount rate extend pound's rally Sloane said. The Canadian dollar rise pound Sloane analyst cautiously predict move soon. The sideways price pattern June contract small small price range form "bull flag" price chart technically-oriented analyst said. "It make explosive type situation lead breakout" upside Sloane said. Byers agree potential June Canadian dollar rally above 77.00 cent level recent close 74.80 cent U.S. dollar. "At stage game I'd call market long-term positive technical burden proof close above (the previous contract of) 75.25" Byers said. As traditionally active currency stability catchword reluctance watchword analysts. Sloane June Swiss franc June German mark held above support 0.6400 0.5400 respectively closing 0.6438 0.5430. Yesterday's rebound show market respectful Paris accord threat central bank intervention G-5 nation plus Canada. "We probe parameter are" Byers "but reluctant don't central bank (to intervene)." Gillard mark drop previous price consolidation 0.5250 base profoundly sluggish West German economy buyer level. Reuter 

The stg convertible bond issue launch Monday Storehouse PLC STHL.L> raise 69 mln stg original 60 mln co-lead Swiss Bank Corp International said. County NatWest Capital Markets co-lead manager. The coupon fix 4-1/4 pct. The conversion price Storehouse ordinary share fix 346 penny represent premium 9.84 pct night's 315 penny closing share price. The price five 126.8 yield 8-3/4 pct. Selling period bond -- dealer see demand -- accelerate noon Friday. The bond trading 104-3/8 104-7/8 par issue price trader add equity link ensure popularity oversupplied eurosterling primary market. The proceeds issue fund outstanding short-term borrowing Storehouse Plc corporate treasurer Lance Moir told Reuters. The issue design increase international profile British street retail conglomerate consequently aim primarily continental investor show degree issue added. Demand mainly West Germany Switzerland. REUTER 

European Community Commission President Jacques Delors met strong objection EC government head radical plan change Community financing. In speech European Parliament Delors EC leader told recent tour easily allow additional resource bloc themselves prune spending. Others call major spending cut EC's controversial farm policy free money regional development. The Parliament register support Delors plan voting approve continuation office two-year term. Delors propose payment member EC base gross product instead amount value add tax receive. He increase EC resource provide fairer share financial burden. He told Parliament reply complaint increase payment told head government Community need money. Delors agree leader argue reform EC farm policy currently account third 41 billion dlr annual budget."We ask sacrifice create future farmers." He add "I force head government - Do destroy common market agriculture ask common market good services?" EC leader 1992 target create genuine internal market industrial product services. Delors convince increase resource necessarily mean raise taxes. REUTER 

Jamaica agree principle bank advisory committee reschedule 181 mln dlrs foreign commercial bank debt fall due 1987 1989 Jamaican Information Service said. Repayments debt stretch 12 8-1/2 years' grace 1-1/4 percentage point London Interbank Offered Rate Libor. The margin previously restructure debt cut 1-1/4 2-1/2. The package save Jamaica 3.3 mln dlrs year. Prime Minister Edward Seaga lead Jamaican delegation call term favourable country. The agreement principle bank advisory committee lead Bank Nova Scotia BNO.TO> come five day Jamaica successfully conclude 125.5 mln dlr reschedule accord Paris Club creditor nations. That pact turn follow International Monetary Fund (IMF)'s approval March 5 85 mln special draw right standby arrangement 40.9 mln sdr draw compensatory financing facility. Of Jamaica's foreign debt 3.3 billion dlrs 12 pct owe commercial bank Seaga yesterday reaffirm government's policy seek bank loans. REUTER...^M 

Lower production coconut palm oil lead decline vegetable oil stock despite grow supply oilseed senior oilseed analyst Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Mario Balletto said. Balletto told conference Canadian farmer Alberta Agriculture's annual farm outlook conference vegetable oil situation potentially tight supplies. "Prices edible oil appear upside potential reflect strong demand unprecedented decline production tree oils" Balletto said. Balletto estimate production palm coconut palm kernel oil 8.5 mln tonne 9.1 mln tonne offset high oilseed output. He estimate total vegetable oil production 33.4 mln tonne 33.0 mln disappearance 34.0 mln tonne 32.6 mln. Unless oilseed crush increase sharply disappearance vegetable oil exceed production 600000 tonne large deficit 1976. "If protein meal demand stagnates limit crush soybean ... serious supply ration edible oil sector develop" said. "This relatively favorable price oil yield seeds" Balletto said. Oilseeds remain depressed price burdensome supply said. World end stock oilseed estimate increase fourth straight record 28.4 mln tonne compare 25.4 mln year. The increase result low disappearance production expect fall 184.0 mln tonne 185.7 mln said. World soybean production 1987 total record 98.9 mln tonne 90.6 mln previous Balletto production oilseed lower. Higher soybean production South America Europe low production United States said. Soybeans account bulk surplus U.S. stock Balletto said. The Commodity Credit Corporation own 12.7 mln tonne half soybean surplus said. Since 1983-84 oilseed stock increase 13.1 mln tonnes. "During period U.S. soybean stock increase 12.1 mln tonne become dump ground entire surplus courtesy CCC highlight artificially price cause U.S. loan program." "Soybean price extent oilseed price likely dominate loan U.S. soybean surplus continues. For 1987 crop price likely hover range tie U.S. loan program. "Upside potential price limited huge supply overhang strong underlie support provide U.S. loan rate." The likely bad artificially price encourage producer South America Canada Australia shift grain oilseed Balletto said. Reuter 

Portugal's trade deficit narrow 1986 336.5 billion escudo 354.8 billion 1985 accord provisional National Statistics Institute figures. Imports total 1412.6 billion escudo export 1076.1 billion compare 1326.5 billion 971.7 billion 1985. Expressed term dollar import rise 21.2 pct export 26.1 pct trade deficit increase 7.8 pct. In member European Community Portugal record deficit 98.1 billion escudo trade Community compare deficit 2.4 billion escudo 1985. Imports EC 1986 total 830.2 billion escudo export Community 732.1 billion compare 609.5 billion 607.1 billion previous year. Portugal's deficit Spain 83.2 billion escudo 57.7 billion 1985 Italy 70.4 billion 30.3 billion West Germany 40.5 billion 19.1 billion. REUTER 

Brazil's central bank governor Francisco Gros meet senior commercial banker attempt defuse anger generate country's unilateral suspension payment 68 billion dlrs foreign commercial bank debt banker said. Gros meet representative Citibank Brazil's bank advisory committee co-heads Morgan Guaranty Trust Co Lloyds Bank Plc. High agenda banks' complaint Brazil's accompany freeze 15 billion dlrs short-term trade interbank line banker said. Brazil's hundred creditor bank worldwide agree March extend credit line March 31 1987 31 billion dlr financing package. Bankers loom expiry commitment couple Brazil's freeze raise spate technical legal question bank discus Gros. They problem freeze requirement payment due Brazilian bank trade facility deposit instead central bank. This mean foreign banker cannot easily switch credit line borrower another. The requirement deposit central bank meant Brazilian bank able negotiate low interest-rate spread foreign bank accept reduce margin money deposit central bank. "It's cause lot ill-will banking community" banker said. Gros expect brief bank result 10-day tour Europe Japan finance minister Dilson Funaro complete seek official support Brazil's debt stance. REUTER 

Oper shr profit five ct v loss 1.71 dlrs Oper net profit 196000 v loss 2388000 Sales 40.5 mln v 43.2 mln Avg shrs 2212000 v 1482000 Year Oper shr profit 71 ct v loss 6.24 dlrs Oper net profit 1799000 v loss 8991000 Sales 154.5 mln v 145.0 mln NOTE: Net excludes loss discontinue operation 712000 dlrs v 2843000 dlrs quarter 1972000 dlrs v 10.6 mln dlrs year. 1986 net excludes extraordinary loss 1167000 dlrs quarter gain 628000 dlrs year. 1986 net include gain mln dlrs sale building gain 3200000 dlrs termination pension plan. Reuter 

Axlon Inc Austin C. Marshall name president co-chief executive officer share latter post founder chairman Nolan K. Bushnell. The company Marshall executive vice president New York toy company Playtime responsibility distribution toy Bushnell concentrate research development licensing. Reuter 

Oper shr 22 ct v 22 ct Oper net 2058000 v 2129000 Revs 44.5 mln v 35.7 mln Avg shrs 9589000 v 9348000 Year Oper shr 94 ct v 94 ct Oper net 8889000 v 8570000 Revs 155.0 mln v 123.4 mln Avg shrs 9450000 v 9174000 NOTE: Net excludes discontinue operation gain 1637000 dlrs v loss 720000 dlrs quarter gain 4679000 dlrs v loss 720000 dlrs year. 1986 net period include charge 865000 dlrs repal investment tax credits. Reuter 

China welcome U.S. Supreme Court decision dismiss claim holder 41 mln dlrs pre-1949 Chinese bond U.S. Officials Peking issue bond U.S. A Foreign Ministry spokesman told news briefing China welcome Monday court ruling reject petition holder railway bond issue 1911 ruling Qing dynasty Communist government acknowledge. The spokesman ruling "indicates ... Railway bearer bond finally closed." But U.S. Embassy official bond case litigation know court involve accept Supreme Court ruling. China issue recent overseas debt Japan badly hit yen's sharp rise. A Western banker U.S. Market attractive China likely issue bond denominate currency yen protect future currency fluctuations. But Western diplomat warn potential U.S. Buyers China warm reception receive Japan. "U.S. Investors interested China se Japanese are. China track record U.S. Bond market. Investors demand disclosure information Chinese institution unwilling give" said. He potential buyer scrutinise China's human right record. Some institution reportedly concerned recent event China include drive Chinese medium "bourgeois liberalism." An official state-owned China International Trust Investment Corp raise fund Hong Kong Tokyo Frankfurt decline comment court decision. REUTER 

New World Pictures Ltd sell 456900 share five pct Taft Broadcasting Co common stock gain 17.8 mln dlrs. The company brief statement acquire stock late 1986. It give far detail company official immediately available comment. On Friday Taft vice chairman Dudley S. Taft Narragansett Capital Inc NARR> offer acquire Taft 145 dlrs share. Dudley Taft own 12 pct company. An investment led Robert M. Bass Bass brother Fort Worth Texas report own 25 pct Taft stock American Financial Corp> chairman Carl Lindner report 16 pct. Both Bass Linder acquire Taft share recent months. Reuter 

Los Angeles Securities Group National Association Securities Dealers intend delist security effective tomorrow NASD believe market-making sale company's security Los Angeles Securities brokerage subsidiary effective registration statement. The company demonstrate compliance Securities Act 1933 requiresd registration statement avoid delisting. It believe NASD action merit effective registation stateement place. Los Angeles Securities ask NASD stay delist pending review matter consultation Securities Exchange Commission potential hearing merits. It pending resolution matter cease make market securities. The NASD institute similar action hold company broker/dealers quote NASDAQ system. Reuter 

Canadian Prime Minister Brian Mulroney announce major shakeup rank key adviser week continue criticism government. Mulroney announce departure senior policy advisor resignation press secretary reassignment communication director. Mulroney's Progressive Conservative government shaken series cabinet resignation allegation corruption trail opposition party month opinion polls. The prime minister lead Conservatives landslide victory 1984 election urge party loyalist major change office. A cabinet shuffle expect month advance personnel change Mulroney's office prime minister seek regain confidence. The election expect sometime 1988 delayed mid-1989. Reuter 

The borrowing limit Hong Kong Exchange Fund regulate value Hong Kong dollar raise 50 billion H.K. Dlrs 30 billion legislature official statement said. The limit governs total borrowing fund government's revenue account various fund borrowing fund arise money market operations. The bulk government's fiscal surplus invest Treasury exchange fund issue fund interest-bearing debt certificate Financial Secretary Piers Jacobs said. "At close total amount debt certificate issue Exchange Fund return money transfer revenue account various fund word total borrowing Exchange Fund source 26.9 billion dlrs" Jacobs said. He borrowing arise money market operation amount additional 2.9 billion dlrs make total 29.8 billion dlrs short borrowing limit 30 billion dlrs. Jacobs government's fiscal reserve expect total 32 billion dlrs current fiscal end March 31. "The current borrowing limit 30 billion dlrs therefore constrain ability Exchange Fund continue fiscal reserve issue interest-bearing debt certificates" said. "It constrain ability exchange fund money market operations" added. REUTER 

The Reagan administration totally oppose recent Democratic suggestion security transaction taxed curb budget deficit administration official interview. "We're totally oppose security transfer tax. It impair efficiency efficient market world" said. He decline named. In recent day House Speaker Jim Wright Texas Democrat call tax raise 20 billion dlrs estimate need meet legal deficit reduction targets. "It fall primarily view wealthy individual middle income occasionally invest trade. So I it's bad idea" official administration economic policy-maker. The official reject suggestion Wright administration delay year's cut top tax rate call recently-passed overhaul U.S. Tax system. "It break faith American ... It real breach faith" said. The Gramm-Rudman Hollings law call balance budget 1991 reduce Supreme Court. Wright Democrats pas President Reagan's budget proposal fiscal start October miss 20 billion dlrs 108 billion dlr target budget deficit Gramm-Rudman law. The administration put deficit 173.2 billion dlrs current fiscal claim spending cut revenue increase achieve Gramm-Rudman goal. The official knowlegeable budget strategy President Reagan oppose so-called 'budget summit' Congress resolve deficit issue. The suggestion 'budget summit' emerge recently Democrats Republicans alike Reagan need deficit reduction package arm control accord Moscow rebuild presidency Iran arm scandal. But official dismiss budget summit idea attempt Democrats secure tax increase. He accuse overly critical write budget proposal due April 1. "It's easy write book review write book. We've write book Democrats write book review day. Let's book" said. REUTER 

The London Commodity Exchange (LCE) date move premise Commodity Quay end-May intend April launch LCE spokeswoman said. The move delayed installation telecommunication facility run behind schedule due recent British Telecom strike said. Trading LCE's market expect May 22 start premise Spring Bank Holiday May 26. The introduction local trader trade option schedule June spokeswoman added. REUTER 

There little chance Soviet export United States rise 1987 Moscow's current trade reform result trade manufacture good future Soviet economist said. Sergey Frolov chief economist Amtorg Trading Corp agent Soviet trade organisation industry told U.S.-USSR meeting Soviet Union produce item western nation want. But reform include upgrade quality good allow joint venture foreign firm encourage modest export gain future. Frolov Soviet Union export 500 mln dlrs worth good United States 1986 import 1.5 billion dlrs worth. He give trade forecast 1987. But obstacle remove total trade country remain billion dlrs year. "The post-detente embargo taught USSR limit trading U.S." said. REUTER 

Sight deposit commercial bank Swiss National Bank fell 2.88 billion Swiss franc 10 day March 7.65 billion National Bank said. Foreign exchange reserve rise 3.30 billion franc 33.94 billion. Sight deposit major indicator money market liquidity Switzerland. The National Bank bank paid 5.5 billion franc central bank credit take February end-month liquidity requirement. This drain offset currency swap effect increase National Bank's foreign exchange holdings. Bank note circulation fell 309.1 mln franc 24.49 billion deposit call -- basically government fund -- rise 1.06 billion 2.10 billion. REUTER 

U.S. Commercial bank expect receive Finance Ministry approval late April operate security subsidiary Japan U.S. Bank official said. A senior official prospective bank ministry told bank approval parent firm hold 50 pct capital. "We expect ministry permission April" said. J.P. Morgan Co> Bankers Trust New York Corp BT.N> Manufacturers Hanover Corp MHC.N> Chemical New York Corp FNBF.N> security licenses. Ministry official decline formal approval work issue. Approval pave U.S. Commercial bank underwrite trade equity Japan names. Citicorp CCI.N> Chase Manhattan Corp CMB.N> already enter Japanese security market acquire U.K. Securities house already operating Japan. Citicorp Vickers de Costa Ltd> Chase bought Laurie Milbank Co>. Bankers bank license J.P. Morgan probably ask. REUTER 

Ecuador need 120 mln dlrs repair damage oil export pipeline cause week"s earthquake stop crude export five month energy mine minister Javier Espinosa Teran said. Espinosa yesterday pipeline carry crude jungle field Pacific Ocean coast Balao repair Texaco Inc TX.N> Mexican Argentine firm. President Leon Febres Cordero day ago Ecuador OPEC member suspend crude export month due quake. Oil traditionally account two-thirds Ecuador's total export 60 pct government revenues. Deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite Ecuador import six seven mln barrel crude oil meet need line repaired. The Ecuadorean minister Presidency Patricio Quevedo told reporter Venezuela lend Ecuador five mln barrel crude repaid 180-day period. He add Caracas-based Andean Development Corp grant loan 11.7 mln dlrs towards repair pipeline 50 km damage quake. In Quito Foreign Minister Rafael Garcia Velasco yesterday summon ambassador 40 country whom issue appeal emergency aid country. Only country U.S. Colombia Venezuela offer assistance. REUTER 

Oper shr seven ct v 20 ct Oper net 347855 v 787117 Revs 6748868 v 6849499 Avg shrs 5391666 v 4277157 Year Oper shr 56 ct v 46 ct Oper net 2617528 v 2003661 Revs 27.1 mln v 27.3 mln Avg shrs 4763793 v 3377157 NOTE: Net excludes realize gain investment 925576 dlrs v 577389 dlrs quarter 1776341 dlrs v 797932 dlrs year. Reuter 

The International Monetary Fund warn Israel report continued rapid rise wage undo achievement economic stabilization control hyperinflation. An IMF delegation visit Israel week issue interim report praise Israel's success slash inflation 440 pct 1985 19.7 pct trigger mass unemployment. But held Argentina Brazil example peril await country follow stabilization programs. "Continued rapid rise wage threaten progress reduce inflation level employment" IMF said. The report echoed warning week Bank Israel Governor Michael Bruno private Bank Hapoalim high wage government overspend consumer boom rekindle inflation. "Though wage development reacceleration inflation worrisome stabilization track" said. The warn come ahead Israel's key sector wage negotiation month. Bank Hapoalim chief economist Petahia Bar-Shavit real growth wage 1986 10 pct follow fall 15 20 pct half 1985 government's economic stabilisation programme introduced. Hapoalim forecast week inflation rise 30 pct devaluation necessary follow 9.75 pct devaluation dollar January. Bar-Shavit government implement policy cut tax clear strategy balance budget. The IMF report monetary policy relaxed fast support Bank Israel's raise rate month. REUTER 

The Algerian authority regulate addition chickpea barley import coffee far official APS news agency reported. Taking advantage scarcity private roaster sell ground coffee mixture 75 pct non-coffee said. Since begin March coffee market strictly regulate food marketing monopoly Enapal. Now third import coffee sell pure bean third ground mixture choice 30 pct chickpea 30 pct barley. In March private dealer handle 2050 tonne pure coffee Enapal 6050 tonne mixtures. Reuter 

Foreign Secretary Joe Clark urge United States firm action reduce "acid rain" stick strict interpretation Anti-Ballistic Missile Treaty won promises. After meeting Vice President George Bush Secretary State George Shultz Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige Clark told press conference persuade Reagan adminstration begin deal seriously Canada concerns. But admit won assurance Washington government's position key controversial issues. "There's lot attention Canadian files. What remains see progress achieved" told reporters. The meeting talk Capitol Hill routine U.S.-Canadian consultation expect lay groundwork summit Ottawa month President Reagan Prime Minister Brian Mulroney. Clark discourage speculation lack firm American committment thorny issue acid rain render summit failure. Canada seek evidence Reagan prepared live commitment implement United States five-year five billion dlr U.S. test cleaner way burning coal. "We expect U.S. government honor commitment" discuss Shultz Clark said. "There's question matter serious detailed consideration high level U.S. government" add Shultz "left meeting attend (White House) cabinet meeting discuss questions." "We wait result examination" said. Clark reiterate Canada's position United States adhere strict interpretation 1972 ABM treaty remain operative arm control agreement. Reuter 

The National Weather Service heavy afternoon even rainfall cause threat flood portion Texas. There report inch rain fall across Terrall Val Verde county afternoon cause street highway flooding. A coastal flood watch post outer bank North Carolina warning gale force wind post central Atlantic Coast. Cold temperature rain mixed snow cause advisory livestock post northwest Texas morning. Rain continued central Texas morning hours. Rain extend Oregon coast near San Francisco Bay California northwest Montana. Snow scatter northwest Texas northeast Montana across North Dakota western Minnesota. There report measurable snowfall six hour end be est. Reuter 

U.S. bank saving loan institution change result emergency legislation adopt overwhelmingly Senate Banking Committee. The bill approve 12-6 yesterday rescue underfunded federal deposit insurance fund thrift temporarily halt development provision financial services. The bill go full Senate infuse badly need 7.5 billion dlrs Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp. insures account depositors. It limit banks' ability sell security restricts breed competitor so-called nonbank banks. Committee Chairman William Proxmire bill's sponsor promise committee long-term plan development financial service industry confront grow competition firm commercial center London Tokyo. "This bill take step effort" Wisconsin Democrat said. But Sen. Jake Garn committee's top Republican chastise senator impose temporary restriction financial providers. "It forget special interests" Utah senator said. Garn fail win approval amendment eliminate virtually bill's provision except rescue FSLIC. A major controversy focus nonbank bank offer limited financial service bank avoid banking regulations. Proxmire succeed closing loophole permit nonbank bank thrift Congress pass comprehensive bank reform move welcome bank industry. But bill moratorium activity bank undertake include sell insurance security real estate bill becomes law. The 7.5 billion dlr rescue FSLIC represent compromise large amount sought Reagan administration small figure propose thrift industry. The U.S. League Savings Institutions industry fear approval large amount FSLIC lead surge closing thrift federal superviors. "We hope Congress finally settle low number" William O'Connell president league committee voted. Reuter 

The oil service industry verge recovery rise crude price oil industry analyst said. The analyst issue buy recommendation stock recovery oil service begin half 1987 drilling activity bottom half continue decade. "People cannot afford wait drilling start buying" Sandi Haber Sweeney senior research analyst Sanford C. Bernstein Co Inc. Among recommend buy Schlumberger Ltd SLB> Halliburton Co HAL> Dresser Industries DI> Baker International BKO> McDermott International Inc MDR> target takeover Harold Simmons Dallas-based investor. Analysts major oil company increase exploration development overseas expect pickup oil service begin U.S. "Activity U.S. depressed move faster" Vishnu Sharp Goldman Sachs. The active oil drilling rig U.S. 766 week compare 1212 rig ago Huges Tool Co HT> figure show. The average work rig U.S. 1987 project 978 versus 964 1986 accord Ike Kerridge vice president stockholder relation Hughes Tool. "The significant pickup drilling activity occur half 1988" Kerridge said. Overseas drilling activity expect follow similar pattern Kerridge said. "Halliburton value" Jeffrey Freedman vice president Smith Barney Harris Upham Inc add company control great amount liquidity common stock market value diversifed non-oil field businesess low multiple stock price operating cash flow include debt. Schlumberger Freedman's favorite oil service stock. "Schlumberger expect continue dominant technical leader industry" Freedman said. "Schlumberger's management shift asset restructuring include pending merger Fairchild Semiconductor considerable cash horde set stage company maximize significant industry advantage capitalize project upturn exploration development activity" accord report George Gaspar vice president Robert W. Baird Co Inc. Gaspar estimate earnings share Schlumberger 25 ct 1987 1.75 dlrs 1988 compare 20 ct 1986 exclude fourth quarter special charge 1.87 billion dlrs. Bernstein's Sandi Sweeney recommend oil service company choose difficult. Her favorite Baker International involve merger Hughes Tool Co. Dresser Industries benefit recovery possibly company pure service company Sweeney said. Dresser expect improve profitability owe cost reduction streamline operation include sale leaseback headquarters Swarup. Reuter 

Creditanstalt-Bankverein CABV.VI> likely raise 1987 dividend 1986 payment 12 pct share capital deputy general-director Guido Schmidt-Chiari said. The 1985 dividend 10 pct unchanged previous Schmidt-Chiari note parent bank's share capital risen 3.1 billion schilling 1986 2.7 billion earlier. Schmidt-Chiari forecast news conference bank announce 1986 consolidated banking net profit 496.7 mln schilling 1986 354.5 mln 1985. Schmidt-Chiari elaborate dividend forecast. The banking group's consolidated balance sheet total rise 453.4 billion schilling year-end 425.4 billion. General director Hannes Androsch high investment lead continue growth profit future. Last year's profit result improvement service provide bank profit schilling lending. Schilling lending grown rate margin improve remain unsatisfactory compare country said. Increased provision bad debt abroad particularly Latin America lower profit Androsch decline exact figure. Schmidt-Chiari foreign lending fall significantly due exchange rate fluctuation remove 22 billion schilling balance sheet total. In attempt generate foreign representative office open Tokyo Hong Kong Moscow Prague. Androsch welcome government plan abolish legal control foreigner buying voting share draw dividends. Preference share state-controlled Creditanstalt rise eight schilling Vienna Bourse 2008. Brokers improve result widely expect investors. Androsch industrial holding perform 1986 previous give return investment 2.6 pct compare 1.3 pct 1985. Creditanstalt Austria's large bank hold majority interest 10 medium-sized Austrian companies. But forecast big industrial subsidiary Steyr -Daimler-Puch AG SDPV.VI> return 1987 result similar expect 1986 operating loss 700 mln schillings. REUTER 

CPC International Inc agree principle sell Peterson/Puritain Inc subsidiary Hi-Port Industries Inc. CPC sale expect significant impact earnings subject approval board companies. Terms disclosed. Peterson/Purittan contract packager personal care household products. Reuter 

Gynex Inc distributor Monsanto Co MTC> recall Gynex's request generic oral contraceptive developed 50 pct-owned Gynex Laboratories Inc package contain miss tablets. The company privately-held Watson Laboratories Inc> owner 50 pct Gynex Laboratories temporarily suspend production product inspection packaging operation currently underway. It corrective measure implement prevent recurrence. Gynex recent introduction product believe limited package dispense consumers. The product Gynex 1-35E Gynex 0.5-35E. Reuter 

Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari cancel trip tomorrow U.S. Because continued confusion Japanese Parliament Foreign Ministry official said. The cancellation come U.S. Congress consider legislation aim cut America's mammoth trade deficit Japan. Kuranari attend budget debate ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) force resume opposition accuse try railroad bill parliament. REUTER 

Shanghai plan rely soft loan finance large-scale project city include underground railway Mayor Jiang Zemin said. Jiang told Reuters manager Michael Nelson hop railway ease Shanghai's transport problem start years. Other project city 12 mln include bridge extra tunnel Huangpu river airport passenger ship terminal China's big railway station due year. The mayor foreign company invite participate project international tendering. But add firm hop package deal involve soft loan financing. "This complex issue. The condition relate tender associate condition receive soft loans" said. He city willing commercial loan finance technological improvement factory show quick return increase export foreign exchange earnings. "But infrastructure project longer involve big investment ideal soft loans" said. The mayor add British French Japanese firm already contact Shanghai authority proposal underground railway project. Western source Shanghai project involve construction 14 km tunnel track discuss 20 add expect cost 750 mln dlrs. REUTER 

Shr 47 ct v 40 ct Net 4258000 v 5942000 Revs 92.6 mln v 77.1 mln Avg shrs 8977000 v 15.0 mln Year Shr 1.22 dlrs v 1.34 dlrs Net 16.4 mln v 20.0 mln Revs 329.1 mln v 272.1 mln Avg shrs 13.5 mln v 15.0 mln NOTE: Interest expense 4384000 dlrs v 545000 dlrs quarter 6979000 dlrs v 2425000 dlrs year. 1986 net reflect undisclosed amount expense defense takeover effort. Reuter 

OPEC reaffirm commitment fix crude oil price 18 dlrs barrel overall output ceiling 15.8 mln barrel (bpd) defend price president Rilwanu Lukman said. He told news conference "After due consultation colleague OPEC I hereby wish emphasize Nigeria member country OPEC remain determine uphold December agreement adhere strictly various quota official sell prices." Lukman add extraordinary OPEC conference planned. "We position re-confirm despite mislead news foreign medium contrary ... OPEC member country produce below agree quota month February" Lukman Nigerian oil minister said. Lukman overall OPEC output shortfall February 900000 bpd result firm determination defend official sell price 18 dlrs agree December Geneva. The December agreement overall output ceiling OPEC 15.8 mln bpd half 1987 restore fix price February 1 reference 18 dlrs. Oil price rally immediately Geneva accord fell month report OPEC produce agree level. "The idea suggest OPEC's agreement hold cause customer hold purchase OPEC oil resort destocking meet needs" Lukman said. He 900000 bpd shortfall February base verify figure 10 OPEC's 13 add Nigeria alone shortfall production 100000 bpd. Iraq disassociate December agreement production figure Ecuador United Arab Emirates need verify Lukman said. "If price pay agreement succeed ready ... OPEC change price level 18 dlrs" group's president said. He OPEC price differential committee meeting formerly postpone April indefinitely. "Furthermore extraordinary meeting conference moment contemplate agreement reach December adhere to" said. Asked committee meet soon narrow gap price various OPEC crude -- fix relation 18 dlr benchmark -- Lukman reply "We consider defence price crucial differentials." Lukman OPEC aware consumer heavily drawn stock crude oil refine product level below soon return market search crude. "We don't difficulty maintain 18 dlr price throughout rest year" Lukman said. The OPEC president praise non-OPEC oil producer contribute group's effort stabilise price criticise Britain maintain long-held view anything market. "We quite confident long-term two-thirds world's reserve OPEC hand future ours. We advantage responsibly" said. Lukman described disruption Ecuador's output follow earthquake tragic refuse South American country allow high output quota recover disaster. REUTER 

Dutch port transport union FNV present 800 plan redundancy Rotterdam's cargo sector parliament's stand committee affair union spokesman said. With 285 4000-strong workforce strike union tell committee government duty solve dispute disrupt cargo sector seven week spokesman added. The union redundancy 350 plan court Amsterdam tomorrow added. Reuter 

Qintex America Ltd> extend offer 13 dlrs share 3.3 mln Princeville Development Corp share yesterday. At midnight yesterday 7242117 Princeville share tender 5887165 share 24 hour earlier. Qintex extend offer allow Princeville comply federal law restrict ownership U.S. airline non-U.S. citizen finalize term condition letter credit bank guarantee require previously announce acquisition agreement. Reuter 

St. Joe Gold Corp plan proceed development Golden Patricia gold property northwestern Ontario. It five mln dlrs spent continue underground development obtain operating permit 10.2 mln dlrs expect require complete underground development construct mill provide infrastructure need mine commercial production. St. Joe Gold necessary operating permit grant start gold production half end October 31 1988 annual rate 40000 troy ounces. The company property estimate contain 500000 troy ounce gold initial mining project cover seven 192 claim drill-indicated reserve 293000 short ton grade 0.88 troy ounce gold ton. It initial mine output expect 150 ton ore daily. St. Joe Gold Golden Patricia vein test depth strike east west exploration continue Golden Patricia property adjacent wholly-owned Muskeg Lake property. The company Richmond Hill gold silver deposit Carbonate district western South Dakota show drilling contain 3900000 ton grade 0.055 troy ounce gold 0.23 troy ounce silver ton. It preliminary result encourage feasibility study near completion. Reuter 

Novell Inc board declare two-for-one stock split payable holder record close MArch 31. It shareholder annual meeting approve double authorize common share 30 mln 15 mln limitation directors' liability. Reuter 

Thousands evacuate town flood-hit southern New Zealand return home late water recede. A emergency declare Southland province apart city Invercargill port Bluff river rise meter above normal torrential rain. Local official farm province stock loss "miraculously low" expect major crop destruction. Roads rail link cut Invercargill airport closed. Part neighbour Otago province emergency river above normal. Reuter 

Johnson Johnson U.S. Food Drug Administration notify company food additive petition high-intensity sweetener formally accepted review agency. The company product generic name sucralose sugar taste sugar 600 time sweeter. It yield calorie promote tooth decay. Reuter 

Heart Federal Savings Loan Association board declare two-for-one stock split payable April 30 holder record April 15. The company split subject shareholder approval April 15 annual meeting increase authorize common share 10 mln five mln. Reuter 

Pre-tax income 788 mln Danish crown v 872 mln Sales 4.21 billion crown v 4.11 billion Income tax 521 mln crown v 604 mln Earnings 20-crown share 20.45 crown v 23.79 Dividend 20 pct (unchanged). Reuter 

Qtly div 10 ct v 10 ct prior qtr Payable March 31 Record March 23 Reuter 

The European Court Luxembourg rule so-called "Christmas butter" scheme surplus stock sell cheaply infringe European Community (EC) rule Commission spokesman said. The spokesman Court reject brought European margarine manufacturer argue EC Executive Commission launch scheme October 1984 approval EC ministers. The plan aim offload 200000 tonne butter mln tonne stockpile specially reduce price 1.6 European currency unit kilogram. Reuter 

Shr 18 ct v 14 ct Net 556036 v 403945 Sales 15.6 mln v 13.6 mln Avg shrs 3132555 v 2934285 Year Shr 60 ct v 48 ct Net 1805229 v 1400247 Sales 60.1 mln v 52.3 mln Avg shrs 3012917 v 2940219 NOTE: 1985 share data adjust reflect stock split effective June 30 1986 Reuter 

Japanese car maker curb export European Community (EC) follow unofficial directive Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) automobile industry source said. Some source export EC likely unchanged year's 1.10 mln unit fall due anticipate slacken EC economic growth increase trade friction. Last week MITI vice minister international affair Makoto Kuroda ministry car maker exercise prudence export Europe. Reuter 

The Bank England give money market assistance worth 106 mln stg afternoon buying bank bill rate establish Monday. The Bank bought 11 mln stg band bill 10-3/8 pct 95 mln stg band paper 10-5/16 pct. This intervene today. The Bank revise estimate liquidity shortage market 250 mln stg 300 mln initially. REUTER 

Shr 45 ct v 50 ct Net 18.0 mln v 19.9 mln Sales 116.1 mln v 108.8 mln Year Shr 1.01 dlrs v 1.04 dlrs Net 39.8 mln v 41.1 mln Sales 304.5 mln v 278.1 mln NOTE: Share adjust three-for-two split June 1986. Reuter 

Hughes Tool Co board vote special meeting approve agreement regulator allow company complete propose merger Baker International Corp BKO>. The agreement approve U.S. Department Justice yesterday merge company Baker Hughes six month instead sell assets. The pact allows three-month extension warrant limit obligation company financial support business divest pending sale. The company board recommend shareholder approve merger oilfield service companies. A previously adjourn meeting Hughes Tool stockholder resume afternoon said. "Hughes Baker Justice Department towards negotiate final form consent decree filing soon possible" company statement. Closing merger occur immediately filing said. The asset sell consent decree consist Baker's domestic oilfield drilling bit domestic submersible electric pump business. Baker agreement sell pump Trico Industries Inc TRO>. The financial term merger unchanged Hughes spokesman said. Under term Baker common share Hughes common share convert share 8/10 share respectively Baker Hughes Inc form hold company. Reuter 

Lorimar Telepictures Corp accepted resignation executive Karl-Lorimar Home Video wholly own subsidiary. The company Stuart Karl president chief executive officer; Court Shannon executive vice president Gary Hunt vice president sale resign effective immediately. Lorimar review conflict involve depart executive unnamed outside service organization. Lorimar decline explain nature conflict amount involved. The company settlement reach party Karl Lorimar include settlement employment contract Lorimar Stuart Karl. No employment contract exists executive company said. The company Jerry Gottlieb senior vice president Lorimar-Telepictures serve act chief executive officer Karl Lorimar video. Gottlieb join Lorimar senior vice president 1985. Reuter 

Johnson Johnson U.S. Food Drug Administration notify company food additive petition high-intensity sweetener formally accepted review agency. The company product generic name sucralose sugar taste sugar 600 time sweeter. It yield calorie promote tooth decay. Johnson Johnson sweetner jointly developed Tate Lyle PLC TATL>. Tate Lyle seek approval Canada United Kingdom European country Johnson Johnson said. The company note petition cover product safety evaluation submit FDA month. While await FDA approval company proceed plan commercialization McNeil Specialty Products Co subsidiary. Johnson Johnson operating licensing agreement Tate Lyle whose collaborative research scientist Queen Elizabeth College London lead discovery Sucralose 1976. Patents licensing agreement control sucralose 2001 Johnson Johnson said. Sucralose chlorinate derivative ordinary sugar. The carbon-chloride bond sucralose stable broken digestion metabolism. Sucralose essentially metabollized body. The chlorine content enhances sweetness provide calories. Reuter 

Senators special prosecutor dispute legal maneuver force quick answer key figure Iran arm scandal diversion profit Nicaraguan rebels. Senators special Senate committee investigate scandal grant limited immunity prosecution force testimony Lt. Col. Oliver North John Poindexter. North National Security Council (NSC) aide President Reagan fire November 25 possibly illegal diversion Iran arm payment so-called contra rebels. Poindexter NSC director North's bos resign day. The Washington Post weekend Poindexter ready testify told Reagan twice fund diversion contrary Reagan's denial it. Special prosecutor Lawrence Walsh special House committee yesterday delay limited immunity North Poindexter 90 day request Senate committee today. Walsh urge committee delay grant immunity third key figure retire Air Force Maj. Gen. Richard Secord close North associate. Walsh whose job determine whether anyone prosecute criminal misconduct premature immunity beyond law grand jury decide whether prosecuted. Reuter 

Triton Energy Corp 70 pct own Canadian Worldwide Energy Ltd> affiliate's Lasmo et al Tableland 4-36-2-10W2 Saskatchewan flow 567 barrel 37 degree gravity oil 17/64 inch choke depth 8531 8548 foot 636 barrel oil 20/64 inch choke depth 8500 8507 feet. Triton well's status deep exploratory production qualifies five-year royalty holiday Saskatchewan drilling incentive products. It well's initial production expect restrict allowable level 300 barrel capable sustain high rates. The company London Scottish Marine Oil PLC own 50 pct space unit Canadian Worldwide 25 pct Saskatchewan Oil Gas Corp> 10 pct Interprovincial Pipeline Ltd's> Home Oil Co Ltd 7.5 pct Scurry-Rainbow Oil Ltd SRB> 7.5 pct. Triton Royal Dutch/Shell Group's RD> SC> Shell Canada Ltd SHC> affiliate retains convertible override well. Reuter 

National Bank Hungary vice-president Janos Fekete hop plan eight pct devaluation forint spur export redress year's severe trade deficit West. Fekete told Reuters interview Hungary achieve equilibrium hard currency trade. "It useful devaluation" said. "There real push export bit curb imports." The official news agency MTI Hungary devalue eight pct expect rate announce today. Fekete rate effect tomorrow. He reason devaluation Hungary high rate inflation past main partner (around eight pct 1985 five 5.5 pct 1986). This partly after-effect action Hungary prevent inflation soar oil price shock 1970s added. Hungary devalue similar amount September pct year. But country's hard currency trade balance nevertheless fell deficit 539.4 mln dlrs surplus 295.3 mln 1986 1.2 billion 1985. Fekete Hungary hop hard currency trade surplus 200 300 mln dlrs likely outcome closer equilibrium total hard currency trade 10 billion dlrs. One Western commercial attache said: "Devaluation change anything. It useful effort restructure industry improve quality export goods." Fekete hop raise credit term invest restructuring industry. It role persuade international bank cooperate process. He note Hungary AA rating enable raise money Japanese Samurai bond market. Hungary's net hard currency debt soar 7.79 billion dlrs 5.01 billion 1985 partly current account deficit 1.42 billion dlrs partly fall dollar increase dollar value debt denominate mark yen. He fear net debt rise slightly favour borrowing purpose modernisation. "I be credit invest purpose" said. "I be credit consumption." He forecast gross domestic product growth pct pct 1986. Fekete Hungary continue restructure debt profile prepay shorter medium term loan cheaper term money look fix rate bond market consider rate low. Hard currency foreign exchange reserve stay 3.5 billion dlrs said. On budget deficit triple provisional 47 billion forint quadruple 1985 Fekete finance ministry work measure reduce approve target deficit 43.8 billion forint 30 35 billion forints. REUTER 

Ecuador's deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite arrive talk far Venezuelan assistance country's oil industry follow week's earthquake official said. Ecuador oblige suspend crude oil export expect five month result damage 25 mile pipeline link jungle oil field Pacific port Balao. Oil normally account 60 pct exports. Fellow OPEC member Venezuela already agree lend Ecuador five mln barrel crude repaid 180 day meet domestic consumption needs. The official neither confirm nor deny report Venezuela temporarily produce Ecuador's entire OPEC quota 210000 barrel half 1987. "All option moment context cooperation oil production" Venezuelan energy mine ministry source said. Discussions arrive formula compensate Ecuador loss oil export revenue pipeline repair official said. Santos Alvite met Venezuelan energy mine minister Arturo Hernandez Grisanti hold talk technical level official said. Industry source option Venezuela produce Ecuador's entire quota Venezuela non-OPEC Mexico share latter supply Ecuador's Far Eastern clients. But ministry source decision yet reach matter announcement due course. Santos Alvite earlier Quito Ecuador import six seven mln barrel crude oil meet need line repaired. Ecuador energy mine minister Javier Espinosa Teran country need 120 mln dlrs repair damage export pipeline cause earthquake. REUTER 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 295000 308000 versus 305000 week ago 308000 ago. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 128000 132000 versus 130000 week ago 126000 ago. Reuter 

Goodyear Tire Rubber Co receive 588 mln dlrs cash Loral Corp LOR> Goodyear Aerospace Corp. Goodyear previously announce acquisition Loral expect complete March 13. When Loral announce transaction January 12 company pay 640 mln dlrs Goodyear Aerospace. Goodyear price receive adjustment item pension benefit provision allocation liability asset valuations. Last Goodyear Aerospace revenue 695 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Raab Karcher AG trading subsidiary VEBA AG VEBG.F> increase operating profit 1986 despite sharp decline turnover add chance profit level held 1987. Operating profit rise 120 mln mark 1986 100 mln 1985. However group's third party sale fell sharply 7.2 billion mark 9.4 billion largely due low price energy product particularly oil coal manage board chairman Klaus Giesel told news conference. Reuter 

Hovnanian Enterprises Inc board director declare two-for-one split outstanding common stock. The company shareholder receive additional share share held close March 23 1987 additional share distribute April 13 1987. Reuter 

British Aerospace Plc BAEL.L> increase stake Systems Designers Plc> 22.1 pct 25.46 mln ordinary share follow purchase 10.45 mln ordinary shares. The British Aerospace Pension Fund hold 2.15 mln ordinary share Systems represent stake 1.9 pct. A spokesman British Aerospace future intention make full bid Systems Designers. System Designers share nine penny high 100 prior share stake announcement show little movement since. Reuter 

CIGNA Corp fix April 24 date previously-announced redemption 99.8 mln dlrs outstanding eight pct subordinate exchangeable debenture due December 1 2007 105.867 pct par plus accrue interest. The debenture exchangeable redemption date 29.205 common share PaineWebber Group Inc PWJ> 1000 dlrs principal amount. Reuter 

Qtly div 18 ct v 14 ct prior Pay March 31 Record March 25 Reuter 

Oper shr profit 32 ct v loss 66 ct Oper net profit 2454000 v loss 3558000 Sales 96.1 mln v 91.4 mln Year Oper shr profit 72 ct v loss 63 ct Oper net profit 6495000 v loss 1833000 Sales 368.1 mln v 322.1 mln NOTE: Earnings exclude loss discontinue consolidated operation 460000 dlrs eight ct share v 5364000 dlrs 86 ct share quarter 11334000 dlrs 1.82 dlrs share v 11637000 dlrs 1.88 dlrs share Earnings exclude loss sale discontinue consolidated operation 200000 dlrs ct share 1986 quarter loss 4960000 dlrs 80 ct share v gain 4404000 dlrs 71 ct share NOTE: 1985 earnings exclude loss discontinue unconsolidated operation 5488000 dlrs 89 ct share period 1985 earnings exclude gain termination define benefit pension plan 490000 dlrs eight ct share quarter 1438000 dlrs 23 ct share Reuter 

PMI Fund Inc board declare monthly dividend six ct April ct May five ct June seven ct July six ct August. The fund customarily omits dividend March September paid six ct February. Dividends declare payable April Three May Six June Four July Three August Six holder record March 23 April 17 May 15 June 12 July 17. Reuter 

Jan 31 Shr 51 ct v 38 ct Net 3254000 v 2423000 Sales 65.9 mln v 51.1 mln Year Shr 1.18 dlrs v 1.15 dlrs Net 7485000 v 7285000 Sales 207.5 mln v 164.1 mln Reuter 

TENERA LP initial quarterly distribution 17 ct unit April 15 holder record March 31. The partnership dividend great expectd pay warrant fourth quarter result anticipate result year's quarter. TENERA expect comparable distribution quarter. It 13 ct share quarter amount taxable income. Reuter 

Banca Nazionale del Lavoro (London branch) issue 120 mln dlr five-year straight bond equity warrant lead manager Credit Suisse First Boston Ltd said. The issue matures April 3 1992 indicate coupon 5-1/2 six pct par pricing. Fees total 2-1/4 pct listing Luxembourg. Payment date April 2. The bond sell denomination 1000 dlrs warrant attach exercisable April 15 1987 April 3 1992. Each warrant entitle holder purchase 45 saving share EFI Banca premium 10 pct above closing price Milan Stock Exchange March 17. EFI medium-term credit institution 36-1/2 pct own Banca Nazionale del Lavoro. REUTER 

Hanson Industries U.S. arm Hanson Trust PLC HAN> propose sell separate transaction Kaiser Cement's Northwest Terminals Montana City plant Lone Star Industries Inc LCE> Ash Grove Cement West Inc> respectively total 50.2 mln dlrs. Hanson deal subject normal condition closing. Hanson Industries complete purchase Kaiser Cement March 3 250 mln dlrs. Hanson Kaiser Cement indirect wholly own unit Hanson Trust form building product group. "These sale continuation asset redeployment Kaiser Cement allow Kaiser concentrate effort California marketplace large cement producer hold premiere market position" Hanson Industries chairman Gordon White said. Reuter 

The federal government Calmos Systems Inc 3075000 Canadian dlrs join European consortium Eureka research project involve integrate circuit boards. The Kanata Ontario base microchip manufacturer company qualify Ottawa's 20 mln dlr fund call Technology Opportunitie Europe Program. Other grant announce shortly government said. In statement Calmos European partner European Silicon Structures expect research improve design silicon chips. Reuter 

Ecuador's deputy energy minister Fernando Santos Alvite arrive talk far Venezuelan assistance country's oil industry follow week's earthquake official said. Ecuador oblige suspend crude oil export expect five month result damage 25 mile pipeline link jungle oil field Pacific port Balao. Oil normally account 60 pct exports. Fellow OPEC member Venezuela already agree lend Ecuador five mln barrel crude repaid 180 day meet domestic consumption needs. Reuter 

The Bank England provide money market unspecified late assistance 240 mln stg. This brings total assistance 346 mln stg compare liquidity shortfall estimate revise 250 mln stg. Overnight interbank sterling offer eight pct shortly Bank's announcement. REUTER 

Finland's mining metal Outokumpu Oy OUTO.HE> week report 1986 loss 83 mln markka successive profit restructure key copper processing division attempt rationalize production improve profitability. Outokumpu's Managing Director Pertti Voutilainen told news conference reorganization involve split division independent division six profit centres. Outokumpu 1986 loss appropriation tax 83 mln markka profit 355 mln 1985. It profit 1984 1983 loss 171.2 mln 1982. Outokumpu acquire Swedish copper manufacturer January 1986 Metallverken Ab> Wirsbo Bruks Ab> merge copper processing division. The division turnover 3.2 billion markka 42 pct Outokumpu's turnover 7.58 billion. The Outokumpu division call Copper Products Industry incorporate Outokumpu's copper production plant include U.S. Subsidiaries Nippert Co> Valleycast Inc> Metallverken Wirsbo. Outokumpu planning Wirsbo independent division Outokumpu transfer Wirsbo's copper tube production division's profit centres. A definite decision Wirsbo take year. The division production plant Finland Sweden Norway Netherlands U.S. REUTER 

Chile talk month international lending agency renegotiation 150 mln dlrs official debt due repayment 1987 1988 influential Mercurio newspaper reported. The newspaper quote official source term sought similar agree country's commercial bank month. Chile reach agreement bank creditor reschedule 10.6 billion dlrs debt mature 1988 1991 15-1/2 six years' grace. Interest pct Libor. REUTER 

The U.S. merchandise trade deficit balance payment basis record 38.37 billion dlrs October December fourth quarter Commerce Department said. The record trade shortfall revise 37.15 billion dlr third quarter deficit. The department previously report third quarter deficit 37.67 billion dlrs. For full 1986 merchandise trade deficit record 147.7 billion dlrs 124.4 billion dlrs 1985 department said. During final quarter import rise 2.78 billion dlrs pct 95.7 billion dlrs export rise 1.56 billion dlrs pct 57.33 billion dlrs. The trade report balance payment basis excludes factor military sale cost shipping insurance. The Commerce Department non-petroleum import quarter 2.7 billion dlrs pct 87.7 billion dlrs large increase consumer good rise 1.2 billion dlrs non-monetary gold passenger car Canada 900 mln dlrs each. Lumber import Canada fell 300 mln dlrs 33 pct 15 pct duty import Canada department said. Passenger car import fell 600 mln dlrs 18 pct decrease South Korean-made import car nine pct decrease Japan. On export agricultural export rise 600 mln dlrs nine pct 7.1 billion dlrs primarily 104 pct 600 mln dlr increase soybean exports. Soybean shipment Western Europe rise sharply supply Brazil traditional major exporter limited drought. Commerce U.S. trade deficit Latin America rise 900 mln dlrs 2.6 billion dlrs Japan increase 700 mln dlrs 14.8 billion dlrs Western Europe rise 200 mln 7.2 billion dlrs quarter. The deficit newly industrialize Far East country include Hong Kong South Korea Singapore Taiwan fell 500 mln dlrs eight billion dlrs Canada deficit decrease 200 mln dlrs 3.3 billion dlrs quarter. In full 1986 import rise 30.6 billion dlrs nine pct 369.5 billion dlrs. Exports increase 7.3 billion dlrs pct 221.8 billion dlrs. Commerce petroleum import 1986 fell 16.6 billion dlrs 33 pct 33.9 billion dlrs low prices. The average price barrel decrease 14.72 dlrs 26.41 dlrs. Agricultural export fell 2.6 billion dlrs nine pct 26.9 billion year. The average price rice fell 27 pct cotton 22 pct corn 18 pct wheat 16 pct soybean nine pct. The trade deficit Japan 1986 rise 11.1 billion dlrs 54.6 billion dlrs Western Europe increase 7.2 billion dlrs 28.6 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Symbol Technologies Inc call 610000 outstanding five-year stock warrant issue 1985 1986 Reliance Insurance Co subsidiary Reliance Group Holdings REL>. The company cash proceeds warrant 6065000 dlrs. Symbol issue 550000 warrant Reliance 1985 exercisable 9.50 dlrs share 60000 mid-1986 14 dlrs share. Reuter 

American Communications Television Inc common stock continue include National Association Securities Dealers' NASDAQ due exception filing requirement fail meet February 14. The company believe meet condition impose NASD exception assurance so. Reuter 

Bayer USA Inc sale affiliate operating cmpanies base U.S. increase 1986 4.4 pct previous year. Combined sale 4.2 billion dlrs 4.0 billion dlrs 1985 company said. However company net income 106.9 mln dlrs pct below 1985. Bayer operating company include Mobay Corp Miles Laboratories Inc Agfa-Gevaert Inc Compugraphic Corp Haarmann Reimer Corp Deerfield Urethane Inc Helena Chemical Co. Bayer Mobay primary chemical company report net income 83.4 mln dlrs eight pct 1985. It Miles pharmaceutical healthcare company record net income 29 mln dlrs 44 pct increase 1985. Reuter 

Deb Shops Inc board declare 100 pct stock dividend increase quarterly dividend ct 3-1/4 ct adjustment split. The company split payable April 17 holder record March 25. The dividend increase effective April 30 payment said. Reuter 

Continental Health Affiliates Inc acquire Marketech Inc> 80 pct partner Diatronics Nutrition Services>. Continental Diantronics Nutrition Services joint venture physician provide patient-ready infusion therapy product service outpatient five northern New Jersery hospital represent 1900 inpatient beds. Continental term deal disclosed. Reuter 

Visual Graphics Corp VGCA> VGCB> board declare quarterly dividend 7-1/2 ct share class "B" common stock 8-1/4 ct share class "A" common stock payable April Three shareholder record March 23. The company class common stock February. Previously company paid 7-1/2 cent share quarterly dividend class common stock. Reuter 

Shr 71 ct v 57 ct Net 5457000 v 4299000 Sales 62.9 mln v 50.1 mln Year Shr 1.65 dlrs v 1.37 dlrs Net 12.6 mln v 10.4 mln Sales 181.4 mln v 147.1 mln Reuter 

Sigma Mines (Quebec) Ltd> 65 pct own Dome Mines Ltd DM> Sigma Mine proven probable reserve 1986 4902940 ton average grade 0.139 ounce gold ton. Sigma reserve equivalent 10 future production current milling rates. The reserve comprise 1640779 ton proven reserve grade average 0.163 ounce gold ton 3262161 ton probable reserve grade average 0.127 ounce gold ton. Sigma change 1986 reserve reporting method follow Dome Mines previously report move adopt industry practice reporting proven probable ore reserves. Prior 1986 Sigma conservatively report proven reserve mine future development costs. Proven reserve December 31 1985 978000 ton grade average 0.194 ounce gold ton equivalent future production. Reuter 

Shr profit nine ct v loss ct Net profit 1419000 v loss 314000 Revs 8097000 v 4794000 Avg shrs 15.8 mln v 15.5 mln Year Shr profit 37 ct v loss 10 ct Net profit 5695000 v loss 1268000 Revs 40.9 mln v 4794000 Avg shrs 15.6 mln v 12.5 mln NOTE: Company operation Nov 17 1985. Reuter 

Chile talk month international lending agency renegotiation 150 mln dlrs official debt due repayment 1987 1988 influential Mercurio newspaper reported. The newspaper quote official source term sought similar agree country's commercial bank month. Chile reach agreement bank creditor reschedule 10.6 billion dlrs debt mature 1988 1991 15-1/2 six years' grace. Interest pct Libor. REUTER 

The Metropolis Tokyo offering Yankee bond market 100 mln dlrs guaranteed bond due 1997 yield 7.57 pct lead manager First Boston Corp. The bond bear 7-1/2 pct coupon price 99.515 yield 35 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Non-callable issue rat top-flight AAA Moody's Standard Poor's. Goldman Sachs Merrill Lynch co-managed deal metropolis's foray Yankee bond market 20 underwriter said. Reuter 

Shr 64 ct v 51 ct Net 4373000 v 3346000 Sales 59.8 mln v 45.5 mln Avg shrs 6808000 v 6600000 Nine mths Shr 1.57 dlrs v 1.18 dlrs Net 10.7 mln v 7745000 Sales 167.0 mln v 123.1 mln Reuter 

Danish-based insulin enzyme producer Novo Industri A/S (NVO.CO) pre-tax earnings fell 10 pct 1986 sale rise pct. The pre-tax figure fell 788 mln crown 872 mln 1985 sale increase 4.1 billion 4.2 billion give net earnings 521 mln crown 604 mln 1985. Earnings 20-crown share 23.79 crown 20.45 crown company propose unchanged 20 pct dividend. "Foreign exchange fluctuation 1986 significant factor behind development result tax" Novo statement. "Not U.S. Dollar currency essential Novo fell 1986 relation Danish crown" statement added. In November 1986 Novo purchase 75 pct share A/S Ferrosan head specialise research development CNS (central nervous treatment) treatment sale pharmaceutical vitamin Scandinavia. The 357 mln crown paid goodwill "had limited effect 1986 result" Novo statement said. Reuter 

Shr loss 30 ct v loss 43 ct Net loss 891000 v loss 969000 Revs 1930000 v 1815000 Avg shrs 2.9 mln v 2.2 mln Nine Mths Shr loss dlr v loss 1.36 dlrs Net loss 2622000 v loss 3037000 Revs 4638000 v 4105000 Avg shrs 2.6 mln v 2.2 mln Reuter 

Alpine Associates Cresskill N.J. security dealer told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 565100 share Leaseway Transport Corp 5.9 pct total outstanding common stock. Alpine limited partnership bought stock 28.1 mln dlrs investment ordinary course security dealer. It left possibility buy Leaseway stock sell current stake plan seek control company. Reuter 

Shr 1.26 dlrs v 67 ct Net 7299000 v 3607000 Revs 52.4 mln v 40.7 mln Avg shrs 6028755 v 2408766 NOTE: 1985 result restate include Deltona Corp DLT> investment equity method. Reuter 

Oper shr profit 18 ct v loss ct Oper net profit 387832 v loss 29312 Revs 6872630 v NA Year Oper shr profit 39 ct v loss 23 ct Oper net profit 835010 v loss 441836 Revs 20.8 mln v NA Avg shrs 2135909 v 1885909 NOTE: Excludes gain 378000 dlrs 18 ct 715000 dlrs 33 ct current qtr respectively benefit tax loss carryforwards. Year-ago excludes loss 75809 dlrs ct qtr 146061 dlrs eight ct discontinue operations. 1985 restated. Reuter 

Turkish bank government office reopen snow blanketing city melt cause flood traffic jams. Turkish radio 16 village southern province Hatay evacuate Karasu river burst bank flood 5000 hectare crops. The radio cold weather snow cover central eastern Anatolia Asian country frozen death near town Corum. The weather office Istanbul cold front move east condition normal weekend. Reuter 

Alliant Computer Systems Corp ALNT> sign agreement MacNeal-Schwendler Corp MNS> MacNeal develop version MSC/NASTRAN software Alliant's FX/Series Computers. Alliant MSC/NASTRAN finite element analysis particularly automotive aerospace industries. Reuter 

Oper shr 91 ct v seven ct Oper net 4356774 v 289764 Revs 69.2 mln v 50.2 mln Avg shrs 4736692 v 4151672 NOTE: 1985 net excludes 3027714 dlr loss discontinue operations. Reuter 

Micropolis Corp raise 75 mln dlrs via offering convertible subordinate debenture due 2012 six pct coupon par pricing lead manager Kidder Peabody Co Inc. The debenture convertible company's common stock 48.50 dlrs share represent premium 23.6 pct stock price term debt set. Non-callable issue rat B-minus Standard Poor's. Robertson Colman Stephens co-managed deal. Reuter 

Thai sugar production total 960788 tonne January increase 12.7 pct January 1986 accord figure receive International Sugar Organization. November December production figure exceed year's total result output month season show 23.1 pct increase 1985/86. Production November 1986 January 1987 period total 1.29 mln tonnes. Thai export December January however. January export fell 73164 35910 tonnes. Domestic consumption increase 7.3 pct 192069 tonne month period sufficient prevent significant rise stock climbed 1.62 mln tonne January compare 1.52 mln earlier. Thai Agricultural Ministry official previously forecast decline 1986/87 raw output 2.3 mln tonne 2.48 mln 1985/86. Reuter 

Canada's lead composite indicator advanced 0.4 pct December gain 0.4 pct previous month Statistics Canada said. The unfiltered index rise 0.8 pct month turnaround 0.3 pct decline November federal agency said. The manufacturing group continued post advance good production rise 1.6 pct third increase months. The advance offset deceleration household demand. Reuter 

Nordic Investment Bank issue 300 mln Danish crown bond due April 15 1994 price par 11-1/4 pct coupon lead manager Enskilda Securities said. The bond callable April 15 1992 par tax reasons. They sell denomination 20000 crown list Luxembourg. Fees involve 1-1/4 pct sell 5/8 pct management underwriting combine minus 1/8 pct co-leads. Payment date April 15. The co-leads Privatbanken A/S Generale Bank Brussels. REUTER 

Lead underwriter Josephthal Co Inc Emmett A. Larkin Co Inc Hays Securities Corp initial offering 865000 common share Mesa Airlines Inc underway 7.50 dlrs share. Underwriters grant overallotment option purchase 129750 shares. Reuter 

ANova Ventures Corp> board declare dividend payable form register share stock Duvel Corp> blind pool. ANova describes publishing financial service firm specialize arrange revers acquisition merger blind pools/shells private companies. ANova create Duvel act blind pool seek operating private company merger Duvel. Duvel sell 300000 common share private investor finance expense registration 640000 share paid ANova stockholder dividend added. Reuter 

DNC International Finance A.S. Is issue 10 billion yen eurobond due April 7 1994 five pct coupon price 102-3/8 pct Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd joint book-runner Tokai International Ltd. The non-callable bond guaranteed Den norske Creditbank issue denomination mln yen list Luxembourg. Total fee 1-7/8 pct comprise 5/8 pct management underwriting 1-1/4 pct selling. Pay date April 7. REUTER 

Chrysler Corp's 1.5 billion dlr bid takeover American Motors Corp AMO> bolster automaker's sale leaf future 19000 employee doubt industry analyst say. It "business usual" yesterday American Motors headquarters propose merger unveiled Chrysler AMC's French parent Renault accord company spokesman Edd Snyder. But AMC's future discuss board meeting radically Chrysler subsidiary continued state-run French car control shareholder. Industry analyst future AMC's car assembly plant Kenosha Wis. Toledo Ohio Jeep plant doubt overcapacity predict North American auto industry 1990s come pass. Both plant "state art" car manufacturing site AMC history poor labor relation each. "Chrysler doesn't plants" Michael Luckey automotive analyst Wall Street firm Shearson Lehman Brothers. "They probably close Toledo plant move Jeep production Canada." Ronald Glantz Montgomery Securities owner Toledo plant able wring concession United Automobile Workers union local represent Jeep workers. "The UAW won't able hold ransom AMC Chrysler underutilized facility transfer production" said. Analysts foresaw major complication abort combination historian auto industry's big merger American Motors form 1954. AMC financial savior loss 800 mln dlrs 1980 pressure France Renault cut backing. The company forecast consistent profitability 1988 earliest. In announce takeover agreement Chrysler chairman Lee Iacocca cite AMC's Jeep division 675 mln dlr assembly plant Bramalea Ontario network 1200 dealer major attractions. Analysts reason Chrysler feel move eventually sell close old plant cut overhead cost view debt liability incur AMC buyout. Reuter 

St. Joe Gold Corp plan proceed development Golden Patricia gold property northwestern Ontario. It five mln dlrs spent continue underground development obtain operating permit 10.2 mln dlrs expect require complete underground development construct mill provide infrastructure need mine commercial production. St. Joe Gold necessary operating permit grant start gold production half end October 31 1988 annual rate 40000 troy ounces. The company property estimate contain 500000 troy ounce gold initial mining project cover seven 192 claim drill-indicated reserve 293000 short ton grade 0.88 troy ounce gold ton. It initial mine output expect 150 ton ore daily. St. Joe Gold Golden Patricia vein test depth strike east west exploration continue Golden Patricia property adjacent wholly-owned Muskeg Lake property. The company Richmond Hill gold silver deposit Carbonate district western South Dakota show drilling contain 3900000 ton grade 0.055 troy ounce gold 0.23 troy ounce silver ton. It preliminary result encourage feasibility study near completion. Reuter 

Qtly div nine ct v eight ct prior Pay May 12 Record March 31 Reuter 

DNC International Finance A.S. Is issue 10 billion yen eurobond due April 7 1994 five pct coupon price 102-3/8 pct Yamaichi International (Europe) Ltd joint book-runner Tokai International Ltd. The non-callable bond guaranteed Den norske Creditbank issue denomination mln yen list Luxembourg. Total fee 1-7/8 pct comprise 5/8 pct management underwriting 1-1/4 pct selling. Pay date April 7. REUTER 

Shr 1.60 dlrs v 3.12 dlrs Net 10.6 mln v 20.6 mln Revs 162.5 mln v 214.6 mln Note: 1985 shr restate reflect January 31 1986 stock split. 73 pct-owned Kelsey-Hayes Co. Reuter 

Nigeria's military government clamped dusk-to-dawn curfew northern Kaduna order school college close 11 die clash Moslems Christians. A statement situation Kaduna control day disturbance cause "undesirable element hiding cover religion." The statement sign Rear-Admiral Augustus Aikhomu regime's urge medium exercise restraint reporting clash weekend Kafanchan Christian enclave mainly-Moslem north. Reuter 

Qtly div 27-1/2 ct v 27-1/2 ct prior Pay April 15 Record March 31 Reuter 

Pacer Systems agree principle acquire asset Sea Data Corp maker low-powered electronic system include undersea intelligent record sensor high-density digital data recorder mln dlrs. Reuter 

Concord Computing Corp Thomas E. Swithenbank resiged president director John L. burn resign vice president manufacturing. No reason given. It chairman chief executive officer Victor M. Tyler assume additional post president. Reuter 

General Motors Corp 125000 Chevrolet's new car - four-door Corsica sedan two-door Beretta Sport Coupe - order dealer advance official introduction Thursday. It dealer inventory immediate delivery 35000 models. Another 8000 transit assembly plants. Reuter 

SHL Systemhouse Inc file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission relate common share own Kinburn Technology Corp>. SHL filing satisfy exchange right propose offering U.S 100 mln dlrs principal amount exchangeable secure debenture due 2007 Kinburn. Kinburn own 31.6 pct issue outstanding common share SHL company said. It debenture exchange prior maturity unless previously redeem SHL Systemhouse common share exchange rate determine sale debentures. SHL advise Kinburn intend exercise option maintain ownership effective control Systemhouse. Reuter 

Bilfinger und Berger-Bau AG GBFG.F> expect construction output 1987 fall 2.5 billion mark 1987 2.73 billion see foreign stabilize 1986 level. In letter shareholder Bilfinger und Berger foreign construction fell 1.37 billion mark 1986 2.10 billion before. It drop due fall order dollar's decline mark. The firm expect 1986 result appropriate dividend. In 1985 net profit fell 14.1 mln mark 22.6 mln 1984 dividend lose mark nine marks. Bilfinger und Berger's U.S. Units 600 mln mark total foreign construction output. The company domestic earnings 1986 improve slightly despite strong competition due effort avoid take order break even. Foreign earnings hit low dollar temporary payment difficulty clients. Incoming order 1986 rise 3.05 billion mark 2.58 billion comprise domestic 1.30 billion mark versus 1.41 billion foreign 1.75 billion mark versus 1.18 billion. Foreign incoming order rise despite economic difficulty develop country OPEC nation hit low oil price Bilfinger und Berger said. In 1986 won order U.S. Pakistan Nigeria Egypt. Orders end-1986 total 3.64 billion mark 3.32 billion end-1985. REUTER 

Versar Inc technical environmental service company release announcement afternoon concern company. A Versar spokesman unable divulge far information. The American Stock Exchange halt trading Versar's stock morning. Reuter 

Mizuno Corp Osaka issue 30 mln Swiss franc five note 4-5/8 pct coupon 100-1/8 issue price lead manager Swiss Bank Corp said. The note guaranteed Sumitomo Bank Ltd call 101-1/2 September 27 1989. Payment due March 27. REUTER 

A Bank Spain spokesman qualify bank statement announce extension reserve requirement convertible peseta fund held bank say move apply future rise above current balances. "The 19 pct reserve requirement apply far increase bank's convertible peseta funds" spokesman said. Convertible peseta fund previously exempt reserve requirements. The spokesman measure intend curb influx short-term foreign speculative capital threaten government's money supply growth target. REUTER 

Spain's broad base M-4 money supply rise annualised rate 16.7 pct February 8.1 pct January 22.4 pct February Bank Spain figure show. The broad-based money supply measure liquid asset hand plus quasi-monetary assets. Money supply growth 11.4 pct year. The government want reduce rate eight pct year. REUTER 

Robert Halmi Inc receive commitment five mln dlr revolve credit line Wells Fargo Co WFC>. It fund development production television programming. Reuter 

Duff Phelps raise rating DP-1 (AAA) DP-2 (high AA) 2.6 billion dlrs debenture 150 mln dlrs note South Central Bell Telephone Co unit BellSouth Corp. The rating agency cite company's strong financial performance achieve keep expense control rely raise local phone rate customers. Reuter 

Pennsylvania Power Light Co offer 500000 share 6-7/8 pct series prefer stock 100 dlrs share 500000 share 7-3/8 pct series prefer stock price plus accumulate dividend date original issuance. The First Boston Corp Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Prudential-Bache Capital Funding underwriter offering stock Pennsylvania Power. The 6-7/8 pct series prefer stock redeemable option company 106.88 pct share March 31 1992 decline 100 pct April 1 1994 company said. The company add optional redemption prior April 1 1994 anticipation borrow fund senior parity stock have effective cost 6.88 pct annum. The 6-7/8 pct series prefer stock mandatory sinking fund amount 100000 share commence April 1 1993 calculate retire issue April 1 1997. The company non-cumulative option retire additional 100000 share sinking fund payment date said. Pennsylvania Power 7-3/8 pct series prefer stock redeemable option company 107.38 dlrs share March 31 1992 decline 100 pct April 1 2002. The company optional redemption prior April 1 1992 anticipation borrow fund senior parity stock have effective cost 7.38 pct annum. Pennsylvania Power 7-3/8 pct series prefer stock mandatory sinking fund 25000 share commence April 1 1993 calculate retire issue April 1 2012. It non-cumulative option retire additional 25000 share sinking fund payment date. Reuter 

Leucadia National Corp U.S. Financial service hold company receive 50 mln dlr five-year revolve underwriting facility (RUF) Merrill Lynch Capital Markets arranger. Under term facility Leucadia issue euro-notes maturity six month subject maximum 183 days. The method issuance issuer-set margin Leucadia determine spread London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR). Leucadia already establish euro-commercial paper Merrill act dealer. The RUF serve medium term back-up commerical paper simultaneously Merrill said. In addition issue euro-notes Leucdia draw RUF so-called "swing line" provide availability fund 25 mln dlrs. Also swing line provide "spot issuance procedure allows company borrow full amount 50 mln dlrs day notice. REUTER 

Foreign exchange market rumour Bank England sell sterling halt rise prompt wary response dealer obvious confirmation market source said. Bank England official immediately available comment. Earlier week Bank sanction cut bank rate surprise move aim limit sterling's rise ahead March 17 budget. But pound strengthen 72.7 trade-weighted index 72.1 U.K. Currency below day's dollar. REUTER 

Nov 30 Shr ct v 11 ct Net 62986 v 174158 Sales 720906 v 907542 Year Shr 18 ct v six ct Net 277852 v 94263 Sales 2247374 v 2030390 Reuter 

Shr ct v five ct Net 50745 v 161019 Revs 478700 v 1048543 Avg shrs 4350000 v 3217500 Nine mths Shr ct v 12 ct Net 169275 v 390179 Revs 1478066 v 2658692 Avg shrs 4350000 v 3217500 Reuter 

Oper shr profit ct v profit ct Oper net profit 63000 v profit 84000 Sales 5009000 v 4042000 1st half Oper shr profit ct v loss 17 ct Oper net profit 87000 v loss 794000 Sales 9838000 v 7368000 Backlog 17.8 mln v 11.4 mln NOTE: Current net excludes tax credit 32000 dlrs quarter 45000 dlrs half. Reuter 

Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone step plan overhaul Japan's tax get parliamentary approval closest aide today. The aide decline identify private meeting "Nakasone's office necessarily terminate term October. It depends (the) seven tax reform bill parliamentary approval." Nakasone vowed yesterday press plan despite Sunday's unexpected Upper House by-election defeat ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) conservative stronghold. The socialist winner back opposition party campaign controversial five pct value add sale tax main plank reform plans. The aide dismiss possibility amendment sale tax ground opposition party demand retraction tax. They refuse discus draft budget 1987 fiscal start April 1 include tax plans. They resort on-off boycott parliament February 4. "If I Nakasone I close current regular parliamentary session May 27 schedule attend Venice summit industrial democracy June extraordinary session discus tax plans" aide said. Under law regular session extend extraordinary session extend twice.The option extend current session said. "The opposition party surely no-confidence motion Nakasone Cabinet stage another." One scenario reject motion opening tax reform. "Another scenario resignation Nakasone Cabinet en masse. A third scenario dissolution Lower House snap election" aide said. That 200 opposition resign 512-seat Lower House necessitate by-elections. The LDP 304 seat Lower House landslide victory election July. There five independent vacancies. "The LDP candidate certainly inflate seat expense fierce medium criticism" aide said. He expect propose sale tax little effect local election held April 12 26. About 2600 election held nation's 47 prefecture include 13 gubernatorial elections. "Candidates run prefectural assembly oppose sale tax irrespective party tickets. "Possible effect gubernatorial election Japan's northernmost island Hokkaido Fukuoka southern Japan" said. The post held opposition socialists. REUTER 

The French electricity utility Electricite de France issue five billion French franc bond tranche co-lead manager Banque Paribas here. The issue lead-managed Credit Lyonnais. The billion franc tranche carry fix rate 8.30 pct 11 316 day redeemable en bloc par life. The issue price 96.44 pct payment date March 30. The tranche 1.5 billion franc denominate 5000 franc unit carry 8.50 pct coupon payable December 14 year. The issue price 98.18 pct 12 259 days. Redemption en bloc par payment date March 30. Each bond carry warrant permit subscription December 14 1987 fixed-rate bond integrate previous issue issue price 98.18 pct nominal coupon 8.50 pct. The issue 12 years. A third tranche 1.5 billion franc issue variable rate issue quote Paris Bourse. Paribas Credit Lyonnais market maker tranche communique added. REUTER 

Oper shr 21 ct v 34 ct Oper net 480000 v 765000 Revs 6386000 v 5862000 Year Oper shr 1.20 dlrs v 78 ct Oper net 2692000 v 1732000 Revs 25.2 mln v 20.3 mln NOTEL Net excludes tax credit 35000 dlrs v reversal credit 40000 dlrs quarter credit 79000 dlrs v 72000 dlrs year. Reuter 

Sahlen Associates Inc complete purchase Gleason Securities Service Inc New York Gleason Plant Security Inc Connecticut. Sahlen deal's term disclose add acquire company combine annual revenue 18 mln dlrs. Sahlen private invetigation company Gleason company provide security guard service corporation tri-state area. Reuter 

Qtly div 15 ct v 15 ct prior Pay May 11 Record March 31. Reuter 

NYNEX Corp urge U.S. District Court approve Justice Department recommendation ease restriction offering service regional telephone firm chairman Delbert Staley said. "While NYNEX prefer unqualified lift Modified Final Judgement restriction intend urge Judge (Harold) Greene act quickly approve recommendations" Staley told news conference. NYNEX file comment U.S. District Court Friday said. Staley refer Justice Department recommendation Greene month restriction manufacturing information service out-of-region long-distance service eliminated. Referring information service Staley "That certainly quickly move into." Electronic mail voice mail videotext service NYNEX offer added. NYNEX disagreed department's recommendation retain restriction long-distance service local service region Staley said. The company option provide long-distance service outside region said. "Our entry long-distance far stimulate competition" Staley said. "We believe downward pressure consumer costs." Reuter 

Shr nine ct v ct Net 658159 v 299930 Revs 3770341 v 2614224 Avg shrs 7382802 v 6747442 Year Oper shr 33 ct v 18 ct Oper net 2287179 v 1045799 Revs 13.1 mln v 8577853 Avg shrs 6874505 v 5951612 NOTE: 1985 net include 13000 dlr tax credit. Reuter 

Southwest Airlines Co's TranStar Airlines add flight increase service city include Los Angeles. TranStar add third daily nonstop April One New Orleans Los Angeles bring 10 total non stop connect flight city. It start nonstop service San Antonio Las Vegas increase service Orlando Fla. said. The schedule feature daily flight San Antonio Las Vegas include nonstop direct connect flight via Los Angeles. TranStar increase daily connect flighs Orlando via Houston. TranStar April One schedule offer 21 daily departure New Orleans 11 city Florida Texas Nevada California. Reuter 

Computer Network Technology Corp introduce CHANNELink Model 5100/R speed networking product line. It product line design remote IBM mainframe-to-mainframe data communications. Reuter 

Shr loss 19 ct v profit 11 ct Net loss 1140270 v profit 590463 Revs 1259164 v 3225512 Year Shr loss 67 ct v profit 10 ct Net loss 4004840 v profit 580488 Revs 3184480 v 9123041 Reuter 

Shr 14 ct Net 510917 Sales 12.3 mln NOTE: Share adjust five stock split January 1987. Backlog 13.0 mln dlrs v 3733000 dlrs. Company operating January 27 1986. Reuter 

The Securities Exchange Commission charge manage director Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner Smith Ltd> London mastermind "a massive insider trading scheme." Nahum Vaskevitch manage director Mergers Aquisitions Department broker's London office charge civil complaint SEC file Manhattan Federal Court. The complaint Vaskevitch leak information 12 company involve merger aquisition result mln dlrs profit involve scheme. Besides Vaskevitch British Israeli citizen life London name defendant suit David Sofer Israeli citizen living Jerusalem corporation Plenmeer Ltd> British company Meda Establishment> Lichtenstein corporation. The scheme cover period allegedly involve Vaskevitch leak information Sofar loom takeover merger work accord complaint. The SEC secure temporary restrain freeze asset defendant United States. A hearing March 20. Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner Smith subsidiary Merrill Lynch Co Inc MER>. According court document Sofer principal Plenmeer Meda Establishment Vaskevitch Plenmeer. The suit file New York trading allegedly here. One deal insider profit allege 1984 merger K-Mart Corp KM> Pay Less Drug Stores>. Another deal sale W.R. Grace Co GRA> holding Hermann's Sporting Goods Co>. An SEC official Washington Vaskevitch unrelated agency's widen investigation Wall Street's insider trading scandal involve Ivan Boesky Dennis Levine. Neither Vaskevitch nor Sofar currently living United States cannot extradite basis SEC's civil charge file official said. Vaskevitch living England Sofar's whereabouts unknown said. "We can't force back" official said. The agency move seize U.S. asset forfeit contest SEC official said. Although SEC recently sign accord Britain aim improve cooperation country investigate security law violation SEC official rely U.K. authority case. "We able here" said. Reuter 

The New York Stock Exchange Tenneco Inc decline comment whether corporate development explain unusual activity stock. The exchange request statement company activity. Tenneco 1-7/8 dlrs 48-5/8. Reuter 

Henry Ansbacher Holdings Plc> acquire 51 pct U.S. Retail corporate insurance broker Adams Porter Inc>. The move step building international insurance broking follow appointment management team Seascope Insurance Holdings unit. Ansbacher A P excite growth potential particularly east coast U.S. And annual revenue mln dlrs. Ansbacher share 4-1/2p 90-1/2 help announcement earlier 1986 pretax profit rise 5.56 mln stg 2.74 mln 1985. REUTER 

The Central Issuing Office Swiss cantonal bank launch 150 mln Swiss franc 4-1/2 pct 12-year bond issue 99.75 pct. Subscriptions close March 23. The fund partly conversion repayment 80 mln franc 4-3/4 pct 1972/87 bond mature April 15. REUTER 

Deutsche Bank Finance NV issue 150 mln Australia dlr bond due April 15 1992 coupon 14-1/2 pct price 101-1/2 Deutsche Bank Capital Markets lead manager. Payment date April 15. The security list Luxembourg Stock exchange available denomination 1000 10000 dlrs. There 1-3/8 pct sell concession 5/8 pct combine management underwriting fee. REUTER 

The engineer union IG Metall 35700 worker 152 West German engineering company held brief warn strike support union's demand high wage shorter work hour loss pay. It stoppage northern Germany employer union representative met talk collective wage agreement 300000 engineering worker Hamburg Schleswig-Holstein Lower Saxony areas. IG Metall series nationwide warn strike week union's bid raise wage five pct cut work week 35 hour 38.5 hours. Warning strike held week generally last hour each. Employers northern German offer IG Metall 2.7 pct rise wage April 1 far 1.5 pct July year. It offer cut work week half hour July 1988. IG Metall reject offer far talk northern Germany schedule March 23. On Monday employer North Rhine-Westphalia offer worker similar package wage rise shorter work hours. REUTER 

Dutch bank F. Van Lanschot Bankiers N.V. Co-owned National Westminster PLC NWBL.L> RABOBANK B.A. RABN.A>  1986 net profit rise 8.8 pct 24.1 mln guilder 4.8-pct high balance sheet total 6.2 billion. Van Lanschot Bankiers subsidiary Van Lanschot Beleggingscompagnie B.V. In Britain's National Westminster Bank PLC Dutch cooperative bank RABOBANK Nederland B.A. Each 40-pct stake. Commercial Union's Dutch insurance unit Delta Lloyd Verzekeringsgroep N.V.> 5.4-pct stake Van Lanschot lower risk provision 22.5 mln guilders. 

Missouri-based Interco Inc establish 50 mln dlr five revolve credit facility Swiss Bank Corp International Ltd arranger. The facility allows eurodollar swingline advance 50 mln dlrs uncommitted option short-term multi-currency advances. The margin eurodollar advance 20 basis point London Interbank Offered Rates (LIBOR) utilisation fee five basis point annum utilisation exceeds 50 pct. Swiss Bank Corp facility pay commitment fee 10 basis point annum undrawn amounts. It syndicate club basis signing plan March. Interco manufacturer retailer consumer product services. REUTER 

West German sugar statistician F.O. Licht estimate European beet planting 7.22 mln hectare compare revise 1986 figure 7.21 mln trader said. In estimate 1987 put EC planting 1.85 mln hectare compare 1.89 mln 1986 estimate sowings Western Europe (including EC) 2.49 mln hectare compare 2.50 mln 1986. Traders Licht forecast Eastern Europe planting 4.73 mln hectare 4.72 mln 1986. Reuter 

Frank B. Hall Co insurance brokerage firm join Risk Science International> offer bank service ass environmental risk level. Hall recently enact legislation bank financial institution held liable environmental risk project finance. Therefore Hall RSI evaluate property assign environmental risk level advise bank option reduce environmental risks. Reuter 

LTV Corp Pakistan order 180 military truck spare part worth 18.5 mln dlrs AM General unit LTV's Missles Electronics Group. The company include 140 M809 Series five-ton truck 40 M44A2 Series 2-1/2 ton trucks. They schedule deliver year. Reuter 

Rodman Renshaw Capital Group Inc director approve repurchase 200000 share company's common stock market time. The share acquisition stock option plan said. Rodman Renshaw complete initial offering 1.5 mln common share June 1986. There currently 4.2 mln share issue outstanding noted. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve expect intervene government security market add temporary reserve via customer repurchase agreement economist said. Most economist Fed inject reserve indirectly via customer repurchase add Fed opt direct injection reserve via overnight repurchases. Federal fund open 6-3/8 pct ease 6-5/16 pct trading. Funds average 6.29 pct yesterday. Reuter 

Shr 10 ct v ct Net 163832 v 31063 Sales 5434430 v 3167735 Avg shrs 1712231 v 1533277 Year Shr 59 ct v 41 ct Net 1016375 v 550625 Sales 19.7 mln v 9755018 Avg shrs 1710256 v 1327172 Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp raise A-1-plus A-1 commercial paper Citizens Fidelity Corp unit Citizens Fidelity Bank Trust. S P cite completion firm's merger PNC Financial Corp PNCF> say PNC show solid earnings excellent liquidity conservative capital position. The rating agency upgraded long-term debt support letter credit lead bank Citizens Fidelity Bank AA-plus A. The bank's certificate deposit upped AA-plus A-1-plus A A-1 respectively. Reuter 

Shr 52 ct v 41 ct Net 4921601 v 3157070 Revs 35.8 mln v 31.7 mln Avg shrs 8939955 v 7600000 Nine mths Shr 52 ct v 34 ct Net 4604406 v 2585621 Revs 36.0 mln v 32.1 mln Avg shrs 8939955 v 7600000 Reuter 

Ford Motor Credit Co F> raise 200 mln mark five-year eurobond currency warrant attach carry coupon 5-3/4 pct price 116-3/4 lead manager Deutsche Bank AG said. The issue sell denomination 1000 10000 mark list Frankfurt. Each 1000 mark bond carry warrant convert 500 dlrs exchange rate 1.86 marks. The exercise period run April 8 1987 March 6 1989. Fees total pct 1-1/4 pct sell 3/8 pct management underwriting. Each 10000 mark bond carry warrant convert 5000 dlrs term warrant 1000 mark bond Deutsche said. The bond pay annually March 25 matures date 1992. Payment date March 25. A management currently formed. REUTER 

J.C. Penney Co's stock rise sharply analyst William Smith Smith Barney recommend stock base company's strong earnings momentum possibility stock buyback dividend hike stock split trader said. "I be impressed strong basic earnings story" analyst Smith note company "fine tune buying inventory admirably control cost need to." The stock jumped 2-1/2 98-3/4. Smith company end 1986 strong cash position 639 mln dlrs compare 158 mln dlrs before. "This implies possibility share buyback significant dividend increase stock split" said. In addition company gradually adjust merchandise mix gross margin improving. Smith expect company earn 8.25-to-8.50 dlrs share 1987 compare 7.06 dlrs share earn year. Last year's result include 69 cent charge buyback debt. Reuter 

Schering Corp unit Schering-Plough Corp Nature's Blend Products Inc> agree injunction Fiber Slim product. Schering U.S. distributor Fibre Trim Farma Food A/S> Denmark Farma sue Nature's Blend claim Nature's product infringe trademark Fibre Trim. Schering Nature's Blend agree stop make sell food supplement product Fiber Slim trademark admit liability. Reuter 

The West German intervention board 100000 tonne sugar offer intervention far. A spokesman speak Frankfurt told Reuters offer increase recently contract yet concluded. A European Commission spokesman Brussels earlier confirm mln tonne sugar offer intervention board various member states. The intervention board spokesman Frankfurt "One million tonne awful lot Community's coffer empty. This turn serious political problem." West German trade source believe mln tonne offer EC sugar industry intervention neutral market impact overall. Reuter 

Bankers Trust Co raise broker loan rate 7-1/4 pct seven pct effective immediately. U.S. Trust Co quote broker loan rate publicly post 7-1/2 pct rate. Reuter 

National Gypsum Co's Austin Co sign joint agreement Kawasaki Heavy Industries Inc> join force win contract connection construction Kansai Airport. Austin Japanese firm develop concept investigate system compete contract international airport built coast near Osaka Japan. The company airport expect large construction project country rest century. It built 2964 acre estimate cost 10 billion dlrs. Cost estimate facilites Austin-Kawasaki team propose design implement range 200 mln dlrs 250 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Sigma Mines (Quebec) Ltd> 65 pct own Dome Mines Ltd Sigma Mine proven probable reserve 1986 4902940 ton average grade 0.139 ounce gold ton. Sigma reserve equivalent 10 future production current milling rates. The reserve comprise 1640779 ton proven reserve grade average 0.163 ounce gold ton 3262161 ton probable reserve grade average 0.127 ounce gold ton. Sigma change 1986 reserve reporting method follow Dome Mines' previously report move adopt industry practice reporting proven probable ore reserves. Prior 1986 Sigma conservatively report proven reserve mine future development costs. Proven reserve December 31 1985 978000 ton grade average 0.194 ounce gold ton equivalent future production. Reuter 

Witco Corp raise 140 mln dlrs via offering convertible subordinate debenture due 2012 5-1/2 pct coupon par pricing lead manager Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc. The debenture convertible company's common stock 54.55 dlrs share represent premium 25.76 pct stock price term debt set. Non-callable issue rat A-3 Moody's A-minus Standard Poor's. Goldman Sachs co-managed deal increase initial offering 100 mln dlrs investor demand. Reuter 

Genzyme Corp U.S. Patent Office approve patent company's method test serum alpha amylase indicator pancreatic disease. "The patent strengthens Genzyme's proprietary position lead independent supplier diagnostic enzyme substrates" Henri Temeer Genzyme president said. The company technology combine unique substrate indicator enzyme diagnostic assay measure serum amylase levels. Genzyme 1985 enter licensing agreement technology amylase test kit makers. Reuter 

Moore McCormack Resources Inc agree principle sell Globe Metallurgical Inc unit Cyprus Minerals Co CYPM> undisclosed terms. The sale expect close mid-April subject condition include board approval companies. Globe produce silicon metal magnesium ferrosilicon. The product chemical aluminum iron rubber semiconductor industries. Reuter 

U.S. Completions home fell 0.2 pct January seasonally adjust rate 1.884 mln unit 1.888 mln December Commerce Department said. The January fall strong 6.4 pct rise November's rate 1.774 mln unit brought completion 6.7 pct above January 1986 level 1.765 mln units. In January completion single-family unit rise 0.4 pct seasonally adjust 1.183 mln unit 1.178 mln unit December multi-family unit fell 1.3 pct 701000 unit January department said. Reuter 

Lead underwriter McDonald Co Investments Inc MDD> offering 900000 share Action Auto Rental Inc underway price 12 dlrs share. Undewriters grant option purchase 135000 share cover overallotments. The company sell 697500 share shareholder rest. Reuter 

Talks management union Cargill U.K. Ltd's Seaforth oilseed processing plant resume Monday company spokesman said. He progress made. Three consecutive day negotiation end afternoon fail break deadlock. Reuter 

The U.S. Department Justice (DOJ) review whether Trans World Airlines Inc TWA> Chairman Carl Icahn violate federal antitrust law fail seek advance clearance DOJ Federal Trade Commission extensive open-market purchase USAir Group Inc U> stock DOJ official told Senate panel. "This matter look into" Charles Rule act assistant attorney general-antitrust told Senate Judiciary Committee's Antitrust Subcommittee. Rule decline far comment review continuing. Rule respond panel Chairman Howard Metzenbaum (D-Ohio) department act "what appear clear violation law." Metzenbaum Icahn fail file pre-merger notification form FTC prior purchasing 15 mln dlrs' worth USAir stock. But Rule airline company purchaser exempt requirement instead file merger application U.S. Department Transportation. Icahn file application DOT filing thrown DOT Friday. The DOT threw application late Friday ground lack necessary data government review propose USAir takeover bid. Icahn refiled complete application form Monday. Rule pledge act Icahn TWA violation found. Reuter 

Anitec Image Technology Corp raise 75 mln dlrs via issue convertible subordinate debenture due 2012 5-7/8 pct coupon par pricing lead manager Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc. The debenture convertible company's common stock 32 dlrs share represent 26.73 pct premium stock price term debt set. Non-callable debenture rat B-2 Moody's B Standard Poor's. Donaldson Lufkin Salomon Brothers Mabon Nugent co-managed issue increase initial offering 60 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Shr loss ct v loss 16 ct Net loss 117989 v loss 528394 Revs 820484 v 35186 Avg shrs 8226577 v 3150000 Nine mths Shr loss seven ct v loss 37 ct Net loss 527864 v loss 1177434 Revs 1975487 v 90875 Avg shrs 7277418 v 3150000 Reuter 

Wisconsin Public Service Corp annual report company's five-year construction 1987 1991 project 330 mln dlrs. It amount include 4.0 mln dlrs sulfur dioxide control company plant 42 mln dlrs previous five-year period. Wisconsin Public Service natural gas sale drop 22 pct mainly grow trend industrial customer purchase gas directly producers. Reuter 

Merrill Lynch Co MER> merger acquisition department London accuse U.S. authority insider trading violation suspend firm. If charge true "we disappointed angry" Merrill Lynch statement. Merrill Lynch cooperate Securities Exchange Commission investigation matter months. The SEC charge Nahum Vaskevitch manage director Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner Smith Ltd profit inside information 12 company involve mergers. "Merrill Lynch's position violation law tolerated" firm prepared statement. "The apparently illegal trading activity Merrill Lynch broker-dealer involve employee's information properly available improperly used" statement said. "Merrill Lynch benefit trades." Merrill Lynch Vaskevitch suspend "when inform specific allegation evidence." The company precisely suspension place. Reuter 

Dutch seasonally-adjusted unemployment total 690600 February unchanged January 732700 February 1986 Social Affairs Ministry spokesman said. The unadjusted figure stood 708700 month decline 3800 January total 712500 compare 750000 February year. REUTER 

Bremer Landesbank Kreditanstalt Finance Curacao NV issue 40 mln Australian dlr eurobond due April 24 1990 pay 15 pct price 101-3/8 pct lead manager ANZ Merchant Bank Ltd said. The issue guaranteed Bremer Landesbank Kreditanstalt available denomination 1000 dlrs list Luxembourg. Fees comprise pct sell concession 1/2 pct management underwriting. Pay date April 24. REUTER 

Completions home fell 0.2 pct January seasonally adjust rate 1.884 mln unit 1.888 mln December Commerce Department said. The January fall strong 6.4 pct rise November's rate 1.774 mln unit brought completion 6.7 pct above January 1986 level 1.765 mln units. In January completion single-family unit rise 0.4 pct seasonally adjust 1.183 mln unit 1.178 mln unit December multi-family unit fell 1.3 pct 701000 unit January department said. Reuter 

4th qtr Jan 31 Shr five ct v 28 ct Net 2448000 v 13.3 mln Revs 156.1 mln v 225.5 mln Avg shrs 47.3 mln v 47.8 mln Year Shr 18 ct v 1.01 dlrs Net 8430000 v 48.2 mln Revs 587.9 mln v 843.9 mln Avg shrs 47.4 mln v 47.9 mln Reuter 

Businessland Inc sell 50 mln dlrs 5-1/2 pct convertible subordinate debenture due 2007 register offering. The company debenture convertible share Businessland common stock conversion price 20.50 dlrs. Net proceeds repay amount outstanding company's bank credit line work capital company said. Reuter 

U.S. Completions home fell 0.2 pct January seasonally adjust rate 1.884 mln unit 1.888 mln December Commerce Department said. The January fall strong 6.4 pct rise November's rate 1.774 mln unit brought completion 6.7 pct above January 1986 level 1.765 mln units. In January completion single-family unit rise 0.4 pct seasonally adjust 1.183 mln unit 1.178 mln unit December multi-family unit fell 1.3 pct 701000 unit January department said. Reuter 

Pentair Inc file offering mln share cumulative convertible prefer stock expect price 25 dlrs share underwriter lead Kidder Peabody Co Inc > Piper Jaffray Hopwood Inc>. It proceeds repay bank debt incur acquisition McNeil Corp August. Reuter 

Grand Metropolitan PLC>'s Heublein Inc subsidiary phase operation Almaden's San Jose winery transfer production wine company's Madera Calif. winery. Heublein move increase Madera winery's efficiency bring close full capacity result addition 150 employee there. Heublein phase-out recently acquire Almaden operation San Jose expect complete late summer. The San Jose winery expect sell added. Heublein Almaden wine continue market sell separate marketing sale force. Almaden's administrative function move Heublein's headquarters Farmington Conn. company said. Reuter 

The Canadian Bond Rating Service downgrade rating long-term senior debt subordinate debenture Royal Bank Canada> Bank Montreal> due partly loan loss problems. Royal's long-term senior debt downgrade A plus (high) A plus plus 1.60 billion dlrs subordinate debenture A plus A plus plus (low). Bank Montreal's senior long-term debt rating fell A plus (high) A plus plus (low) 1.46 billion dlrs subordinate debenture A plus (low) A plus. The rating service cite continued difficulty Royal Bank customer particularly energy industry continued level loan loss expect relatively sovereign debt exposure relation common equity. It cite Bank Montreal's below average profitability internal capital generation relatively international debt exposure relation common equity note loan loss expect moderate 1987. Reuter 

Witco Corp offering 140 mln dlrs 5-1/2 pct convertible subordinate debenture due 2012 co-managing underwriter Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Goldman Sachs Co. Each debenture convertible company's common stock rate 54.55 dlrs share represent conversion premium 25.8 pct sale price 43-3/8 share yesterday said. Proceeds finance acquisition purposes. The company agreement talk regard acquisitions. Reuter 

The American Stock Exchange> start call option trading Chemical Waste Management Inc stock replacement option Chesebrough-Ponds's Inc recently acquired. Initial expiration month June September initial exercise price 30 35 said. Position exercise limit 5500 contract market. Reuter 

Shr 19 ct v 12 ct Net 850000 v 432000 Sales 9850000 v 4783000 Avg shrs 4504000 v 3527000 Nine mths Shr 57 ct v 37 ct Net 2400000 v 1281000 Sales 25.2 mln v 12.8 mln Avg shrs 4233000 v 3485000 Reuter 

BellSouth Advanced Systems unit BellSouth Corp introduce private telephone call BellSouth System 30 offering small company wide range advanced telecommunication services. BellSouth service aim company require 20 telephone include speed dial 500 frequently call number redial conference call speakerphone others. The company System 30 capacity 10 outside lines. Reuter 

Ford Motor Credit Co F> raise 200 mln mark five-year eurobond currency warrant attach carry coupon 5-3/4 pct price 116-3/4 lead manager Deutsche Bank AG said. The issue sell denomination 1000 10000 mark list Frankfurt. Each 1000 mark bond carry warrant convert 500 dlrs exchange rate 1.86 marks. The exercise period run April 8 1987 March 6 1989. Fees total pct 1-1/4 pct sell 3/8 pct management underwriting. Each 10000 mark bond carry warrant convert 5000 dlrs term warrant 1000 mark bond Deutsche said. The bond pay annually March 25 matures date 1992. Payment date March 25. A management currently formed. Reuter 

Pragma Bio-Tech Inc clinical test company start perform comparative study differnet variety nitroglycerin treatment angina pectoris episodes. The company disclose detail testing. Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay April 15 Record March 23 Reuter 

The Federal Reserve enter U.S. Government security market arrange billion dlrs customer repurchase agreement Fed spokesman said. Dealers Federal fund trading 6-5/16 pct Fed temporary indirect supply reserve banking system. Reuter 

Engineering Measurements Co form partnership external investment group company 58.5 pct manage partner. Called Measurement Auditors Co partnership provide flowmeter certification test service oil gas industry Engineering Measurements said. The company marketing vice president Jerome J. Rusnak apointed president succeed Charles Miller continue chairman. Reuter 

Private exporter China bought total 550000 tonne U.S. wheat export enhancement final confirmation U.S. Department Agriculture subsidy awaited. The purchase consist total 340000 tonne hard red winter wheat various May/Aug shipment 210000 tonne soft red winter Aug/Sept exporter said. Reuter 

Ope shr 63 ct v 80 ct Oper net 3169000 v 3757000 Revs 9585000 v 10.2 mln Avg shrs 5070000 v 4721000 NOTE: Net excludes gain sale investment 887000 dlrs v 304000 dlrs. Reuter 

Synergen Inc agree provide human elastase inhibitor design treat emphysema Ciba-Geigy AG CIGZ> human clinical trials. Ciba-Geigy currently test substance animal company supply drug suitable human tests. The company Ciba-Geigy initially license product 1985. The agreement call Synergen commercial manufacturing process produce drug deliver quantity Ciba-Geigy half 1987. Reuter 

Shr loss 38 ct v profit eight ct Net loss 10.4 mln v profit 2144317 Revs 72.9 mln v 67.4 mln Nine mths Shr loss 21 ct v profit 38 ct Net loss 5747393 v profit 10.1 mln Revs 224.6 mln v 200.6 mln NOTE: Current net period include 20.0 mln dlr pretax charge disposition 21 underperform company-owned restaurants. Current net include tax credit 3205000 dlrs quarter 7305000 dlrs year. Reuter 

Chi-Chi's Inc take 20 mln dlr pretax charge earnings third quarter end January 31 cover cost dispose 21 "underperforming" company-owned restaurants. The company agree repurchase mln common share market. The company 27.1 mln share outstanding. Chi-Chi's report loss third quarter end January 31 pretax charge 7305000 dlr tax credit 10.4 mln dlrs compare year-earlier profit 2144317 dlrs. Chi-Chi's believe disposition restaurant potential increase pretax earnings mln dlrs fiscal year. The company exist cash resource share repurchases. Reuter 

Shares Du Pont Co rise accumulate recommendation Shearson Lehman Brothers First Boston trader said. Du Pont open gain stood 109-1/8 1-1/8. First Boston's analyst available comment. Analyst Theodore Semegran Shearson raise earnings estimate company 7.25 dlrs share 1987 eight dlrs share 1988. The company earn 6.35 dlrs share 1986. "Good domestic demand high operating earnings strng export probably benefitting low dollar effect reduce import chemical continue aid Du Pont." He note energy earnings quarter expect rise crude prices. Semegran expect quarter earnings 1.85 dlrs share 1.67 dlrs year. He expect company raise annual dividend 20 30 ct share current dividend 3.20 dlrs share "and stock split low probablility." Reuter 

ChemLawn Corp start talk sale company "various parties" identify. The company talk considred reject Waste Management Inc's WMX> 27 dlr share tender offer sharesd. ChemLawn give detail talks. Reuter 

Uluslararasi Endustri ve Ticaret Bankasi AS (INTERBANK) privately-owned trade financing bank Turkey seek 20 mln dlr commit export advance facility Morgan Guaranty Ltd lead manager. The financing 14 month borrower option 10 month request extension six months. Those bank wish extend receive 25 basis fee. The financing dollar mark mark borrowing cannot exceed 50 pct facility. The facility available 70 day 1-1/4 pct London Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR). There commitment fee 50 basis points. Banks invite join facility mln dlrs 55 basis point mln dlrs 40 basis points. Responses due April 3 financing syndicate broad-based international bank diversify borrower's traditional lending base. REUTER 

Cato Corp file initial offering mln common shares. Cato offering late April May expect raise 35 45 mln dlrs. Cato publicly held ago private operates chain women's specialty store medium-sized towns. Reuter 

SHV Holdings NV withdraw take-over bid Imperial Continental Gas Association ICGS.L> fail gain minimum pledge sought IC Gas shareholders. SHV statement sought gain 750000 IC Gas share 700p offer IC Gas ordinary stock inform level reach deadline expired. "The tender offer therefore void" said. SHV offer 252 penny stg nominal IC Gas loan stock bid SHV (United Kingdom) Holding Co Ltd>. Reuter 

Negotiators United Nations conference natural rubber make slow progress towards reach agreement delegate said. The conference Monday widely see final effort adopt International Natural Rubber Agreement (INRA) current expires October. Some 40 produce consume country take two-week meeting. This fourth conference nearly years. Delegates side appear divide key issue price adjustment mechanism. Consumers frequent price review 12 month interval instead 18 month proposal currently reject producers. And consumer press price adjustment automatic producer resist reduce role International Rubber Organization Council price adjustment procedure. Conference chairman Manaspas Xuto Thailand "imperative" settle outstanding issue week technical draft week. Reuter 

Schering-Plough Corp obtain injunction Nature's Blend Products Inc due trademark infringement Fibre Trim label. Under term injunction Nature's Blend agree refrain make sell food supplement product trademark Fiber Slim use trademark simulates trade dress Fibre Trim. Reuter 

LORD ABBETT VALUE APPRECIATION FUND Annual div 33 ct v 23 ct prior Long term capital gain 2.06 v 75 ct prior Short term capital gain 18 ct v 11 ct prior Pay April 6 Record March 12 LORD ABBETT U.S. GOVERNMENT SECURITIES FUND Daily div .029 ct v .029 ct prior Pay April 15 Record April 15 LORD ABBETT TAX FREE INCOME NATIONAL SERIES Daily .068 ct v .068 prior Pay April 15 Record April 15 LORD ABBETT TAX FREE INCOME FUND NY SERIES Daily .067 ct v .067 ct prior Pay April 15 Record April 15 LORD ABBETT TAX FREE INCOME FUND TEXAS SERIES Daily .059 ct v .059 ct prior Pay April 15 Record April 15 LORD ABBETT CALIFORNIA TAX FREE INCOME FUND Daily .062 v .063 ct prior Pay April 15 Record April 15 Reuter 

Qtr end Jan 31 Net 55.3 mln dlrs v 51.7 mln dlrs Revs 419.1 mln v 391.7 mln Note: Revs include investment income 18.4 mln dlrs v 18.5 mln dlrs. Company wholly own Gulf Western Corp GW>. Reuter 

Consumers Power Co Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approve company's Midland cogeneration venture "qualifying" facility Public Utility Regulatory Policies Act. It approval overcomes potential federal hurdle convert Midland combined-cycle natural gas-fired cogeneration plant. In October 1986 venture receive permission U.S. Department Energy fuel plant permanently natural gas. Reuter 

Vipont Laboratories Inc Canadian Bureau Non-Prescription Drugs approve Viadent toothpaste oral rinse marketing. The company finalize agreement Canadian marketing company introduce product country. It Viadent help prevent plaque build-up inflame gums. The product available Canada month company added. Reuter 

Metromedia Long Distance> introduce OnePlus Wats telecommunication service volume callers. Metromedia OnePlus us local switch network dedicate connection link customer near Metromedia Long Distance switch center save customer 35 pct competitors' rate distance service. Reuter 

Period end January 31. Shr loss six ct v profit ct Net loss 536000 v profit 166000 Revs 2099000 v 3149000 Avg shrs 10429000 v 9943000 Nine Mths Shre loss nine ct v loss five ct Net loss 790000 v loss 377000 Revs 7089000 v 7646000 Avg shrs 10406000 v 9351000 Note: Full name Newport Pharmaceuticals International Inc. Reuter 

Integrated Genetics Inc Food Drug Administration approve field trial hormone essential regulation cows' reproduction. Integrated field trial begin immediately direction Granada Corp's Granada R D Ventures Integrated's partner area. Reuter 

Qtly div 11-3/4 ct v 11-3/4 ct prior Pay March 27 Record March 13 Reuter 

Mitchell Energy Development Corp plan hold capital spending fiscal 1988 end January 31 96 mln dlrs 123 mln dlrs spent 1987 213 mln dlrs 1986. The company natural gas revenue reduce low contract customer purchase due mild weather soft economic conditions. "But contract call low 'takes' course year" Mitchell Energy said. Meanwhile sell additional quantity gas spot market. Mitchell Energy additional spot sale tend low average price realize gas fiscal 1988. However average full expect significantly low 2.99 dlrs thousand cubic foot average fiscal 1987. Reuter 

River Oaks Industries Inc agree principle control company Benson Seizer New York investor return 2.6 mln dlrs capital. The company maker mobile home terminate merger discussion Nursing Centers America>. River Oaks 2.6 mln dlr convertible note Seizer turn name six additional company's five-member board. One director chairman chief executive officer River Oaks said. River Oaks note convertible mln share common stock dlr share. The company currently 14 mln share outstanding. The company grant Seizer option buy additional 2.6 mln share 1.25 dlrs share 1.50 dlrs share thereafter. The company money raise Seizer far strengthen balance sheet enhance ability seek selective expansion opportunities. Seizer experienced turnaround situation expect direct involvement River Oaks management Charles F. DeGroot remain director company give post chairman Seizer's board nominees. Don Manning cede post chief executive remain president company said. Reuter 

Consolidated net profit 1.88 billion franc v 1.29 billion. Net financial operating profit 1.11 billion v 825.1 mln. Extraordinary earnings 774.7 mln v 462.8 mln. Net dividend 165 franc v 150. Reuter 

(Credithrift Financial Corp) board authorize redemption company's 8.20 pct Senior Notes due Dec 15 1987. It note redeem April 20 price equal 100 pct principal amount note plus accrue interest. Reuter 

U.K. Interest rate look move low Monday's half-point cut bank base rate 10-1/2 pct analyst cite evidence suspension British National Savings issue yesterday. The Department National Savings effectively Treasury Department unit yesterday suspend 32nd issue launch October pay tax-free 8-3/4 pct five-year private investment 25 5000 stg. A spokesman suspension reaction yield saving bond line rest market. The move follow surprise sell-out minute Bank England one-billion stg tap issue issue week analyst noted. They near-instant sale entire gilt issue Bank England require 40 pct downpayment clear evidence market rate drop sooner later. The sale tranche 8-3/4 pct treasury bond due 1997 occur active bullish gilt market downward pressure money market rate remain intact bellwether three-month interbank rate 1/8 10-9-7/8 pct. It coincide strong sterling rally push pound four-year high dollar. "That government stock disappear quickly indeed" Stephen Lewis economic research stockbroker Phillips Drew; "It indication market believe rate fall far ... At half-point immediately budget (on March 17) hope more." Stockbrokers James Capel comment move National Savings Department "of considerable significance." It "the real message ... Is deck quickly clear facilitate speedy decision building society cut rate inevitable cut bank base rate 10 pct materialises." Building society drop bank base rate normally exceed half rise reduction mortgage lending rates. Lewis Phillips Drew believe National Savings issue suspension reflect U.K. Treasury policy building society towards mortgage rate cut. "National Savings compete effectively building society late. Building society income depressed recent months" said. He analyst Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson keen mortgage rate fall keep lid U.K. Inflation. Underlying upward pressure price strong Britain Western economy inflation see rise above pct above five pct 1988 year's 3.7 pct. Emphasising impact mortgage rate consumer price Lewis one-point cut building society rate reduce inflation Britain 0.4 pct. But Lewis note building society complain government intense competition National Savings argue reduce scope mortgage rate cuts. "The Chancellor worried lose PSBR funding National Savings take building societies' criticism heart. It look National Savings move reflect this" senior dealer said. A Savings Department spokesman refuse comment interpretation say suspension issue merely reaction recent fall U.K. Interest rate push yield saving bond line rest market. "We politically motivate ... Funding become expensive don't money" told Reuters add department suspend issue twice past offer rate above below market rates. He demand issue risen sharply late U.K. Money market rate continued steady decline income threaten overshoot unofficial billion stg target fiscal 1986 end March 31. In 10 month fiscal 1986 National Saving's contribution government funding total 2.72 billion stg compare 2.01 billion stg period previous official figure show. Figures February Monday expect show far increase 300 400 mln stg push total 11 month above target government official said. REUTER 

Qtly div 45 ct v 45 ct previously Pay May 1 Record March 31 Reuter 

Qtly div 14 ct v 14 ct prior Pay April 10 Record March 27 Reuter 

Qtly div 20 ct v 20 ct prior Pay June 16 Record May 22 Reuter 

The Farmers Home Administration U.S. Agriculture Department's farm lending arm lose seven billion dlrs outstanding principal severely delinquent borrower one-fourth farm loan portfolio General Accounting Office GAO said. In remark prepared delivery Senate Agriculture Committee Brian Crowley senior associate director GAO preliminary analysis propose change FmHA's financial eligibility standard indicate half FmHA borrower receive loan agency 1986 ineligible propose system. The agency propose evaluate applicants' credit use variety financial ratio instead rely solely cashflow ability. Senate Agriculture Committee Chairman Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.) slam propose eligibility change tell FmHA Administrator Vance Clark hearing mark "dramatic shift" agency's purpose farmers' lender resort become "big city bank." But Clark defend regulation say agency responsibility administer 70-billion dlr loan portfolio "compassionate yet judicious manner." Crowley GAO Congress' investigative arm propose credit score attempt ensure FmHA loan borrower reasonable change repay debt. Reuter 

Oper shr loss 11 ct v loss 14 ct Oper net loss 1963000 v loss 2199000 Revs 17.5 mln v 40.9 mln Year Oper shr profit nine ct v profit ct Oper net profit 1555000 v 456000 Revs 86.3 mln v 143.7 mln NOTE: Net excludes extraordinary tax charge 115000 dlrs v 995000 dlrs quarter credit 8096000 dlrs v 1173000 dlrs year. 1985 net include pretax gain 7400000 dlrs termination pension plan. 1985 net include pretax charge 1200000 dlrs quarter gain 1400000 dlrs restructuring consolidation. 1985 quarter net include 1480000 dlr tax credit. 1986 net include pretax gain 17.2 mln dlrs sale foreign subsidiary. Reuter 

The New York Stock Exchange General Refractories Co comment activity stock. The company's share trading 1-1/2 15-1/4. The exchange contact company corporate development explain unusual activity. The company decline issue statement NYSE said. Reuter 

The European Community (EC) express disquiet protectionist move United States limit import textile retaliate immediately EC export hit. A spokeswoman EC Commission EC External Trade Commissioner Willy De Clercq write U.S. Counterpart special U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter outline concern 12-nation Community. The draft legislation consideration Congress impose permanent quota product enter U.S. seek limit increase growth overall trade. Reuter 

Shr loss seven ct v profit 17 ct Net loss 102000 v profit 258000 Revs 1695000 v 1371000 Year Shr loss 33 ct v profit 26 ct Net loss 488000 v profit 384000 Revs 6700000 v 4774000 NOTE: 1986 result include operation radio station WJYE-FM full WNNR-AM six months. Speed-O-Print Business Machines Corp full name company. Reuter 

Asbestec Industries Inc board declare three-for-two stock split payable April 17 record April Three. Reuter 

Dataproducts Corp receive multi-year contract value 30 mln dlrs supply band printer Siemens AG> West Germany. Siemens printer office application medium mainframe Dataproducts said. Reuter 

Qtly div 20 ct v 20 ct previously Pay April 15 Record March 23 Reuter 

Jones Vining Inc Vulcan Corp main competitor production shoe last offer acquire Jones Vining five dlrs share. Jones Vining management effort company private ahead 4.50 dlrs share. The form buyout yet determine buyout subject nunber condition said. Jones Vining board believe transaction Vulcan difficult complete Vulcan far information explore bid. On January 23 Jones Vining board recommend shareholder aprove management buyout 4.50 dlrs share. On February Six Vulcan initially offer acquire Jones Vining five dlrs share Jones Vining dismiss offer "frivolous" "without substance" bid fail comply provision Securities Act 1934. Reuter 

Viragen Inc sponsor clinical study Human Leukocyte Interferon Alpha treatment renal cell carcinoma bladder cell carcinoma. The Food Drug Administration approve human trial conduct 30 patient male female cancer type. Reuter 

PPG Industries Inc continue show earnings growth 1987 despite difficult economic climate company annual report mail shareholder today. For 1986 company's earnings rise five pct 316 mln dlrs revenue increase eight pct 4.7 billion dlrs. Earnings share 2.66 dlrs compare 2.27 dlrs. The company add 1986 return equity reach 17.3 pct 15.5 pct 1985 close goal 18 pct. Reuter 

Waste Management Inc file motion U.S. District Court southern district Ohio dismiss counterclaim brought Chemlawn Corp CHEM>. The litigation relates Waste Management's cash tender 27 dlrs share share Chemlawn. A hearing counterclaim schedule March 19 20. Waste Management Chemlawn offer supply Waste Management material forward Chemlawn potential purchaser Chemlawn Waste Management agrees condition result termination current offer 120-day standstill unnegotiated transaction. Waste Management refuse agree request preconditions. The company state believe Chemlawn obligate permit compete acquire Chemlawn fully-informed basis. Waste Management's offer schedule expire March 25. Reuter 

Belgian Budget Minister Guy Verhofstadt propose plan sell share state-owned enterprise include airline Sabena postal telecommunication authority government source said. They plan raise 25 billion franc revenue five accord Verhofstadt's projection help government reduce huge budget deficit targetted 418 billion francs. But scheme receive guard reception Social Christian party Belgium's centre-right coalition Verhofstadt unveiled cabinet meeting yesterday. Discussion plan likely difficult source said. Verhofstadt proposes begin selloff quarter 1987 sale 30 40 pct investment company SNI. He expect sale raise billion franc added. A 25 pct share Sabena sell mid-1989 1.5 billion franc 50 pct postal telecommunication authority sell stage mid-1990 1992 raise seven billion francs. Also Verhofstadt's list Maritime Transport Authority lead gas distributor Distrigaz CGER saving bank CGER credit institutions. Le Soir daily quote CGER vice-president Paul Henrion express strong opposition privatisation bank. "Public company company wish stay" Henrion told paper. REUTER 

Reichhold Chemicals Inc raise price Emulsion Polymers Division's styrene-based latex nowovens textile adhesive specialty us effective April nine. The increase range nine ct dry pound. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp product design Telecredit Inc's Light Signatures Inc unit prevent counterfeit automotive parts. Light Signatures provide cod warranty label Chrysler's replacement parts. The glass expand products. Parts replace independent repair shop contain cod warranty label test Chrysler dealer ensure authenticity. The company track piece warranty glass distribute Chrysler. Reuter 

Shr 24 ct v 13 ct Net 704803 v 385081 Revs 5669682 v 4142095 Reuter 

Avery Inc offering mln shars 50.25 dlrs shares. PUrchasers share entitle additional share share purchase effect two-for-one stock split approve board February 26. There 19.9 mln share outstanding presplit basis said. Proceeds reduce borrowing purposes. Reuter 

Shr 42 ct v 35 ct Net 570000 v 476000 Sales 122.4 mln v 123.1 mln NOTEL Prior net include pretax charge 453000 dlrs reopen eight stores. Reuter 

Qtr end Jan 31 Shr ct v 12 ct Net 102508 v 264910 Revs 2278083 v 2536312 Nine mths Shr 18 ct v 15 ct Net 489253 v 404877 Revs 6679745 v 6613551 NOTE: Excludes discontinue operation gain 40519 dlrs third quarter fiscal 1986 loss 9666 dlrs nine month fiscal 1986. Reuter 

Shr ct v 24 ct Net 43000 v 1032000 Revs 10 mln v 4.9 mln Avg shrs 3.7 mln v 4.3 mln 12 mths Shr 1.02 dlrs v 1.62 dlrs Net 3950000 v 7308000 Revs 30.8 mln v 33.3 mln Avg shrs 3.9 mln v 4.5 mln NOTE: 1985 restate reflect tax loss carryforwards. Reuter 

Qtly div 37-1/2 ct v 37-1/2 ct prior Pay May 15 Record April 15 Reuter 

Qtly div six ct v six ct prior Pay March 31 Record March 20 Reuter 

IC Industries Inc call redemption 113.6 mln dlrs worth securities. IC redeem 69 mln dlrs 14 pct guaranteed note seven pct Swiss Franc note Abex International worth 40 mln Swiss franc (26.2 mln dlrs) 18.4 mln dlrs 11-5/8 pct Pneumo subordinate sinking fund debentures. The guaranteed note redeem May 15 redemption price 100.5 pct. The Swiss Franc note redeem July 12 100.5 pct. The debenture redeem June 5.75 mln dlrs redeem 100 pct balance redeem 102.33 pct. Reuter 

Rexnord nc sign definitive agreement sell Railway Maintenance Equipment Co subsidiary Banner Industries Inc. Terms withheld. It Railway Maintenance 1986 sale 16 mln dlrs employ 100 people. Rexnord sale major divest business represent 200 mln dlrs net assets. Still divest Process Machinery Division sale 137 mln dlrs Mathews Conveyer Co sale 83 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Lone Star Industries Inc sign agreement buy lease five import cement terminal Hanson Industries' HAN> Kaiser Cement Corp. Terms agreement disclosed. Lone Star terminal locate Alaska Seattle Portland Ore. Reuter 

The overall devote sugar beet Europe forecast remain stagnant 7.22 mln hectare compare 7.21 mln ha 1986 West German statistician F.O. Licht said. It fear recent steep rise sugar price marked effect plant intention Licht judging estimate effect probably minimal. The total beet European Community forecast fall pct 1.85 mln ha 1.89 mln 1986. The total Western Europe 2.49 mln ha 2.50 mln 1986. Eastern Europe forecast 4.73 mln ha 4.72 mln. Individual West Europe country estimate 1000 hectare (with 1986 figure brackets) Belgium/Luxembourg 114 (118) Denmark 69 (69) France 419 (421) Greece 35 (44) Ireland 36 (38) Italy 270 (275) Netherlands 129 (138) Portugal 1 (1) Spain 192 (190) U.K. 200 (201) West Germany 385 (399) Austria 32 (28) Finland 30 (31) Sweden 51 (52) Switzerland 15 (14) Turkey 355 (340) Yugoslavia 160 (136). Eastern Europe planting forecast follow USSR 3400 (3440) Albania 10 (9) Bulgaria 52 (50) Czechoslovakia 195 (196) East Germany 210 (205) Hungary 108 (96) Poland 460 (440) Romania 295 (280). On basis average yield Licht forecast point total European beet sugar crop 1987/88 29.8 mln tonne raw value 31.4 mln tonne 1986/87. Licht sugar yield fairly season thanks favourable weather increase chance significant reduction production 1987/88. Based average yield EC beet sugar production fall nearly 10 pct 13.5 mln tonne 14.9 mln 1986/87 total Western Europe production 16.9 mln tonne 18.1 mln. Eastern Europe production 12.9 mln tonne 13.3 mln 1986/87. Reuter 

Britain autumn mint market bullion coin call "Britannia" contain ounce 24 carat gold together bullion coin small denomination Treasury official said. The investment coin sell worldwide fluctuate price accord international price gold. The small coin denomination half ounce quarter ounce tenth ounce. REUTER 

Benihana National Corp sign letter intent Tishman Realty Construction Co Inc> build teppanyaki-style restaurant Hilton Hotel Walt Disney World Village Lake Buena Vista Fal. Benihana National currently own operates 16 teppanyaki-style restaurant license parent Benihana Tokyo Inc>. Reuter 

Attorney General Edwin Meese benefit propose purchase American Motors Co AMO> By Chrysler Corp C> return small U.S. auto manufacturer American hands. Meese told House Appropriations Subcommittee consideration Justice Department's review propose merger. He agency yet receive formal notice merger start review process. Chrysler 1.3 billion dlr bid buy AMC French parent Renault. "I recognize merger appear portion ownership American Motors overseas hand American hands" Meese told subcommittee. "That factor weigh judgment" added. Renault currently hold 46 pct AMC. Reuter 

Dutch parliament little resolve dispute redundancy Rotterdam port's cargo sector urge union employer sort difference themselves. Both side give evidence all-party stand committee Social Affairs committee little chance parliamentary intervention. The dispute January 19 protest employers' plan 800 redundancy 4000-strong workforce start 350 year. The port transport union FNV challenge redundancy Amsterdam court tomorrow. Reuter 

Martin Sosnoff offer buy Caesars World Inc 28 dlrs share senior official company offer buy Caesars stake already hold 13.6 pct total outstanding. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Sosnoff New York investor money manager offer buy stock occur "on occasion past year." The offer Caesars World representative include chairman Henry Gluck said. Sosnoff reject proposals. The Caesars World official suggest various form payment Sosnoff's stake include security company cash said. Sosnoff detail value propose compensation. Also suggest deal involve "put" "call" option regard Sosnoff's Caesars World holding said. The propose deal include "standstill" agreement restrict Sosnoff's buy Caesars World stock "to action adverse incumbent management" said. Sosnoff's report offer receive Caesars World share amend official offer purchase company report SEC. Sosnoff hold 4.1 mln Caesars World share 13.6 pct company's 30 mln share outstanding. The Sosnoff offer buy share company already hold value 725.2 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Lured weaken dollar conviction oil price poise rebound European energy company buying cheap U.S. oil gas reserve replenish supply oil industry analyst said. They own oil reserve politically stable United States insurance future shortages. However quick pace foreign investment heat competition European firm well-heeled U.S. institutional investor major oil company snare choice domestic oil properties. Strevig Associates Houston firm track oil gas reserve sale grow foreign buyer help push reserve price recent month higher. All buyer U.S. reserve paid median price 6.45 dlrs barrel oil fourth quarter 1986 acquisition 5.33 dlrs third quarter five dlrs quarter accord firm's research. "Foreign investor nibble we're see name small company come in" Arthur Smith oil property appraisal specialist president John S. Herold Inc Greenwich Conn. "Europeans especially indigenous oil gas realize tide eventually turn favor Organization Petroleum Exporting Countries" added. Smith oil industry analyst economist believe trend foreign investment continue 1987 fall value U.S. dollar perception oil price hit bottom cheaper buy reserve explore them. Plenty property available market thanks company raise cash debt payment restructuring throughout oilpatch. In big transaction recent month French-owned Minatome Corp. unit Total Compagnie Francaise de Petroles> spent 230 mln dlrs separately acquire oil asset Texas International TEICC> Lear Petroleum Partners LPP>. A spokesman Minatome company search additional acquisitions. A partnership Belgian-owned firm Petrofina S.A.> Cometra Oil S.A.> paid 150 mln dlrs late buy virtually exploration asset Williams Cos WMB> Oklahoma pipeline firm. But Japanese investor prefer enter joint venture experienced U.S. company explore oil. Japan's Nippon Oil> partner Texaco Inc's TX> Texaco USA 100 mln dlrs U.S. drilling join Dupont's DD> Conoco Inc similar 135 dlrs mln deal. Most buyer pay-back period property geographic location lift cost crude oil factor evaluate potential acquisition rely simple price-per-barrel formula. Rich Hodges Houston-based land manager represent International Oil Gas Corp partnership Preussag Corp> C. Deilmann Inc> West Germany firm earmark 50 mln dlrs spend oil reserve Texas Oklahoma Louisiana come months. But call amount compare amount investor acquisitions. PaineWebber's Geodyne Energy Income Fund example plan spend 300 mln dlrs oil gas properties. "The competition stiff foreign investor brokerage house U.S. oil companies" said. "Our company shopping feel it's substantially risky pure exploration. If you're risk inherent exploration price high current market" added. In addition foreign investor U.S. brokerage house analyst major oil company compete prime properties. Houston-based Shell Oil Co unit Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD> active company buying sell reserve Smith said. Since 1982 Shell acquire billion dlrs reserve include 470 mln barrel oil equivalent net cost 2.80 dlrs barrel said. "Buying reserve strategy companies" Smith said. "Domestic production drop mln barrel cutback drilling drop mln barrel 1988." Reuter 

A meeting lead politician banker economist forecast Austrian real gross domestic product growth 0.5 1.5 pct government spokesman said. This compare pct growth forecast semi-official Institute Economic Research (WIFO) December. Helmut Kramer spokesman Chancellor Franz Vranitzky told Reuters forecast meeting attend Vranitzky Finance Minister Ferdinand Lacina National Bank President Stefan Koren WIFO representative. Economists cut growth forecast recently mainly due expectation poor export performance notably Eastern Europe oil export states. Hannes Androsch director Creditanstalt-Bankverein CABV.VI> 1987 GDP growth 1.5 pct. Kramer meeting heard unemployment above 5.5 pct forecast unlikely six pct. REUTER 

Shr profit primary 91 ct v loss 86 ct Shr profit dilute 90 ct v loss 86 ct Net profit 787000 v loss 751000 Sales 20 mln v 12.5 mln Year Shr profit profit 2.63 dlrs v profit five ct Shr profit dilute 2.59 dlrs v profit five ct Net profit 2273000 v profit 43000 Sales 70.1 mln v 47.1 mln Note: Prior qtr figure include gain disposal discontinue operation 76000 dlrs 79000 dlrs respectively. Reuter 

Dimis Inc extend expiration 1424500 common stock purchase warrant September 30 March 31. Each warrant allow purchase share dlrs. Reuter 

Prudential Insurance Co America> enter real estate brokerage 1988 plan develop network franchise brokerage offices. Prudential real estate unit Prudential Real Estate Affiliates head Jerome M. Cole chairman Sears Roebuck Co Inc's S> Coldwell Banker Residential Affiliates Inc unit. The unit headquarted Southern California said. Reuter 

Interleaf Inc introduce series software package allow user build electronic publishing system comprise personal computer workstation mainframe computers. In addition company announce software let user create document language mix language single document. Reuter 

Southwest Airlines Co's TranStar Airlines Corp add nonstop flight Houston's Hobby Airport Orlando Tampa/St. Petersburg San Diego Austin April One. It change increase daily service Austin roundtrips daily Tampa nonstop one-stop Orlando nonstop onestops connect flight San Diego nonstop direct flights. Reuter 

Oper shr loss nine ct v loss ct Oper net loss 108000 v loss 55000 Sales 3029000 v 2694000 Year Oper shr profit 42 ct v profit 15 ct Oper net profit 511000 v profit 177000 Sales 13.3 mln v 11.2 mln Avg shrs 1233136 v 1217981 Note: Current qtr figure exclude operating loss carryforward gain 26000 dlrs v gain 88000 dlrs prior periods. Reuter 

Qtly div 44 ct v 44 ct prior Pay June One Record May Eight Reuter 

Qtly div 68 ct v 68 ct prior Pay June One Record May Eight Reuter 

Ford Motor Co select Scicon Corp's> Systems Control unit install manufacturing automation Ford's Hermosillo Mexico plant Scicon said. The value disclose provide Ford automate vehicle track capability Scicon said. Reuter 

RLR Financial Services Inc National Association Securities Dealers decide delist stock NASDAQ March 12 threatened. The company NASD grant indeterminate amount resolve issue raise NASD market make RLR's RLR Securities Group Inc subsidiary share parent company. The NASD allege registration statement share effect. RLR contest charge stop market make stock. Reuter 

McDermott International Inc ASEA Babcock PFBC receive 48 mln dlrs contract supply combustion Tidd Power Plant Brilliant Ohio. ASEA Babcock PFBC joint venture Babcock Wilcox unit ASEA PFBC Sweden. Reuter 

Alaska Air Group Inc offer 1.8 mln share common stock 25.875 dlrs share. The company proceeds 45.1-mln-dlr offering reduce debt work capital capital expenditures. Reuter 

El Paso Electric Co agree limit rate increase New Mexico service territory maximum nine pct years. Last 18 pct utility's revenue New Mexico 70 pct retail electricity sale Texas 12 pct wholesale sale federal regulation. In January company file formal rate New Mexico regulator seek 21.66 pct increase annual rate equal 13.9 mln dlrs net fuel savings. El Paso Electric reach stipulate settlement New Mexico rate party include New Mexico Public Service Commission provide rate treatment utility's investment Palo Verde Nuclear Generating Station locate near Phoenix Ariz. The company commission hearing stipulate settlement expect start month. If approve rate effect summer. El Paso Electric's January rate remain commission pending approval settlement. El Paso Electric agreement provide continued full inclusion rate base cost Palo Verda Unit maximum rate increase pct cent kilowatt hour basis 1987 1988 1989 far rate increase 1994. Once agreement approve utility prove cost service increase support maximum increase spokesman explained. The company attempt settle cost service issue time allow rate effect summer. El Paso Electric agreement allows recovery New Mexico rate lease payment connection utility's 1986 sale leaseback investment Palo Verde Unit Two extent book value sold. The company agree none cost Palo Verde Unit Three include New Mexico rates. The utility agreement resolve issue relate prudence planning management construction Palo Verde settle issue excess generate capacity 1993. El Paso Electric expect excess generate capacity. The agreement provide portion cost service deferral recouped prior December 31 1994 recover New Mexico rate company add expect recoup deferral full date. Reuter 

Chronar Corp sign joint venture agreement Rade Koncar> Yugoslav maker electric energy equipment build 12 mln dlr megawatt photovaltaic manufacturing plant Split Yugoslavia. Under agreement Rade Koncar 60 pct venture Chronar 40 pct Chronar said. Chronar receive 7.5 mln dlrs supply equipment technology invest 2.5 mln dlrs 40 pct stake. It cancel previous pact Yugoslav firm firm raise capital. Reuter 

The Chicago Board Trade's (CBT) board director vote postpone start U.S. even future trading session April 30 April 2 participant chance ready exchange announced. Several trading firm delay start-up even session firm operational difficulty create off-hours session. CBT chairman Karsten Mahlmann statement delay "afford firm necessary 100 pct ready innovative postpone opening date." The board director accepted yesterday's recommendation committee oversee plan even session originally schedule start April 2. The session design begin global trading 1800 2100 local Chicago Monday Thursday. CBT overwhelmingly approve even session vote conduct month ago. But trading begin CBT obtain approval Commodity Futures Trading Commission. Pending regulatory approval CBT plan offer even trading world's active future contract Treasury bond Treasury note future option contracts. The even session available trader Far East rate hedge vehicle begin CBT hope attract trading capital Pacific Rim's burgeon financial centers. When idea trading session broach met resistance local trader session add physical strain jobs. Many trader member firm question whether session liquidity necessary survive complain cost man trading desk session 24-hour cycle worthwhile. Some credit market analyst include Norman Quinn president Golden Gate Futures session likely dominate institution large local trader refuse return night. Nevertheless Quinn trader session chance succeeding. Reuter 

The Bank France announce publicly auction 10.5 billion franc negotiable Treasury bill March 16. The auction comprise 3.5 billion franc 13-week bill 3.5 billion franc 26 week bill 3.5 billion franc 52-week bill fix rate. Reuter 

Shr profit nine ct v loss 45 ct Net profit 2500000 v loss 9900000 Revs 16800000 v 3300000 Note: 1986 net include 2.6 mln dlr nine ct shr writedown nine pct stake Trans-Canada Resources Ltd>. 1985 result reflect six mths mining operation due merger Erickson Gold Mines Ltd Total Eastcan Exploration Ltd June 30 1985. Reuter 

The French aerospace industry mixed 1986 military sale hit fall dollar low oil raw material price civilian sector perform Jacques Benichou president French aeronautics space industry (GIFAS) said. He told journalist sale success European Airbus Industrie consortium France 38 pct stake Aerospatiale SNECMA aero-engine 50 pct stake CFM International U.S. Group General Electric perform well. Turnover French aerospace industry 74 billion franc comparable constant term 1985 trade surplus industry 30 billion francs. "We neither optimistic nor pessimistic" Benichou said. Reuter 

Nationwide Cellular Service Inc acquire option purchase right 4000 subscriber Americom L.A. Systems Los Angeles reseller mobile telephone service 2750000 dlrs. It option exercise 120 day mark entry Los Angeles market. During option period manage American L.A.'s operations. The option subject negotiation definitive agreement receipt certify financial statement Americom. Reuter 

The Securities Industry Association strongly support decision yesterday Senate Banking Committee freeze entry commerical bank non-banking business underwriting commerical paper. "This committee vote prudent thoughtful approach review Glass-Steagall Act strong need message Senate responsibility Congress review necessary amend nation's banking laws" association statement. Reuter 

Versar Inc agree principle acquire Martin Marietta Corp's Martin Marietta Environmental Systems unit 5300000 dlrs. Versar work capital establish credit purchase subject approval board expect complete April. Marietta Environmental 1986 revenue nine mln dlrs. Versar acquisition "moderately" favorable effect earnings year. Reuter 

Transco Energy Co April 10 redeem 707905 outstanding share 3875 dlr series cumulative convertible prefer stock 51.17 dlrs share plus accrue dividend 74 cts. Transco share prefer convertible 1263 common shares. Reuter 

Merrill Corp acquire Frayn Financial printing financial printing division Frayn Printing Co Seattle. Terms disclosed. It acquire division know Merrill/Seattle becomes company's 10th financial printing service center. Reuter 

I.I.S. Intelligent Information Systems Ltd receive receive complete delivery worth 700000 dlrs supply Textron Inc's Bell Helicopter Textron Inc unit lease International Business Machines Corp IBM> 3270 3191 plug-compatible station printers. Reuter 

Two major U.K. Clearing bank announce offer total 800 mln stg mortgage fix rate 10.2 pct below current bank base lending rate 10.5 pct. Midland Bank Plc MDBL.L> initially allocate 500 mln stg loan rate Lloyds Bank Plc LLOY.L> offer 300 mln stg. Earlier week Midland cut standard rate mortgage payment 11.5 pct April 1 follow half percentage reduction lead banks' base lending rate 11 pct. Building society bank mortgage rate largely above base rate level Lloyds offer fix rate 9.9 pct loans. A Midland spokesman bank calculate current level 2.7 billion stg exist mortgage book account 5 pct total British loan market. Lloyds 3.6 billion stg outstanding mortgage loan estimate total market share. Among major clearing bank Barclays Plc BCS.L> National Westminister Bank Plc NWBL.L> immediate plan announce similar fix rate schemes. Reuter 

Primages Inc introduce daisywheel printer print 90 character feature graphic capabilities. The printer call Primage 90-GT price 1500 dlrs combine company's paper-handling system Primage said. Reuter 

Datarex Systems Inc name distributor Minnesota Mining Manufacturing Co's data record medium computer supplier accessory United States. The company sale 3M product material impact sale balance 1987. Reuter 

Jim Walter Corp complete acquisition Owens-Corning Fiberglas Corp's mineral ceiling fiberboard plant Meridian Miss. Terms disclose The plant's operation complement exist ceiling material production jim Walter's building material's generate income 54.9 mln dlrs sale 740 mln dlrs. Reuter 

House Speaker Jim Wright predict House vote substantial margin block 40 mln dlrs aid Nicaraguan "contra" rebel President Reagan account previous assistance. Wright Texas Democrat concede Congress ultimately unable stop money House vote expect tell White House contra -- Reagan's pet project -- trouble. "The adminstration reality focus way peace" Wright said. The House voting legislation block six month 40 mln dlrs appropriate year. The administration intend start use money month provide arm equipment rebels. "We expect win substantial margin" Wright said. The legislation call Reagan account previous aid include money divert contra secret U.S. arm sale Iran. The scandal arm sale diversion profit contra plunge Reagan administration deepest crisis. The legislation demand accounting 27 mln dlr humanitarian aid appropriate Congress 1985 fund contra foreign government private individual urge Reagan administration. Reuter 

American President Cos Ltd American President Lines shipping subsidiary obtain final approval U.S. Japanese authority lease ship Lykes Bros Co. The move enable boost service Pacific 15 pct 1987 American President said. The company lease ship hold additional three-year options. It American President Lines currently operating capacity Pacific ship arrive normal demand surge spring summer seasons. Reuter 

Bowne Co Inc board declare two-for-one stock split payable May 10 holder record April 17. Reuter 

The London Stock Exchange immediate comment U.S. Insider trading charge senior London executive Merrill Lynch Co MER> Exchange spokesman said. "This civil action New York no-one proper detail yet" added. The London Exchange keep touch U.K. Government's information channel U.S. Securities Exchange Commission await far development said. Trade Industry Department official decline immediate comment. Merrill Lynch London far amplification SEC charge executive Nahum Vaskevitch firms's New York office. Market query centre whether 12 company involve merger refer SEC complaint include British company Guinness Plc GUIN.L> feature recent official inquiries. Merrill Lynch member London Stock Exchange addition U.S. And international investment activities. Reuter 

Louart Corp Los Angeles investment firm raise stake Amerford International Corp 105615 share 7.8 pct total outstanding 69715 share 5.2 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Louart bought 35900 Amerford common share March 19 1986 Jan 30 1987 price range 3.92 4.29 dlrs share. It bought share investment purpose increase stake future. Reuter 

Emerson Electric Co offering U.S. debt market 100 mln New Zealand dlrs note due 1989 18.55 pct coupon par pricing lead underwriter Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. That 170 basis point below comparable New Zealand rates. Non-callable maturity issue rat top-flight AAA Moody's Investors Service Inc Standard Poor's Corp. Reuter 

Visa International> own consortium bank Bank China agree Visa member May Visa card issue China world. No international credit card currently issue China. Visa plan underway install electronic terminal Visa-accepting merchant China authorize grow credit card transaction tourist minimize operating risks. Visa plan extend worldwide telecommunication network China satellite link allow authorization request forward card issuer world. Over 1000 merchant China honor Visa card expect double card transaction China expect rise 50 pct current 130 mln dlrs 1987. Visa International already design Visa card Bank China issue. Reuter 

A pressure leak containment building hatch FPL Group Inc's Turkey Point nuclear plant force brief reactor shutdown Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC) spokesman said. Ken Clark NRC's representative Atlanta radioactivity escape incident described "a relatively minor pose safety hazard." Clark repair underway Turkey Point Unit 4 nuclear reactor site south Miami expect reactivate today. Reuter 

Austrian gross domestic product growth likely 0.5 1.5 pct Helmut Kramer semi-official Institute Economic Research (WIFO) said. This compare pct growth forecast WIFO December. Kramer forecast meeting Austria's economic outlook attend Chancellor Franz Vranitzky Finance Minister Ferdinand Lacina National Bank President Stefan Koren. REUTER 

First Boston Swiss affiliate First Boston Inc raise stake company 11262307 share 35.5 pct total 10262307 share 32.8 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Financiere Credit Suisse bought 870100 First Boston common share Feb 10 27 price range 48.125 53.000 dlrs share 22.5 mln dlrs total. It bought share agreement raise minority stake First Boston 40 pct stake level First Boston hold Financiere Credit Suisse. Reuter 

Oper shr 23 ct v 77 ct Oper net 5255179 v 17.6 mln Revs 37.8 mln v 73.7 mln NOTE: Cash flow 19.5 mln dlrs 86 ct shr v 36.7 mln dlrs 1.62 dlrs shr. 1985 net excludes 32 ct shr loss discontinue operations. Gross proven probable reserve crude oil natural gas liquiids 18.4 mln barrel 7.6 pct before. Reuter 

Farah Inc omit quarterly common stock dividend consecutive quarter. The company paid quarterly common dividend 22 ct share December consider future dividend payment basis improve profitability cash flow. Farah expect turn profit balance 1987. For quarter end January 31 Farah lose 1891000 dlrs 32 ct share sale 71 mln dlrs. In addition Farah receive shareholder approval change name Farah Inc Farah Manufacturing Co. Reuter 

The follow propose security offering file recently Securities Exchange Commission: Minnesota Power Light Co MPL> - Offering 50 mln dlrs mortgage bond due April 1 1994 75 mln dlrs mortgage bond due April 1 1997 PaineWebber Inc. International Lease Finance Corp ILFC> - Shelf offering 1000 share Dutch Auction Rate Transferable Securities (DARTS) prefer stock Salomon Brothers Inc Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. Trinity Industries Leasing Co - Offering 100 mln dlrs convertible debenture due April 1 2012 Merrill Lynch Capital Markets. Reuter 

A two-year project search oil gas Jordan agree Amman Jordan's Natural Resources Authority (NRA) Canadian company Petrocanada International Assistance Corporation (PCIAC). The 19.1 mln dlr assistance agreement sign Jordan's Minister Energy Hisham al-Khatib PCIAC chairman Peter M. Towe. PCIAC Canadian government corporation provide assistance country Jordan reduce dependence oil import Towe said. Reuter 

Keystone Camera Products Corp agree United States distribution manager Le Clip clip-on fashion watches. Keystone agreement Le Clip S.A.> Switzerland effective March 31 1990. Reuter 

NECO Enterprises Inc postpone annual meeting May 21 previously schedule April 28 record date meeting March 25 March 11. A spokesman change pending tender offer company's stock. Reuter 

Numac Oil Gas Ltd expect significant improvement operating performance 1987. The company report 1986 earnings continue operation 5255179 dlrs 17.6 mln dlrs yuear earlier due low price crude oil pipeline capacity constraints. Numac change introduce federal provincial government 1986 results. Reuter 

U.S. Senate Republican leader Robert Dole Congress consider legislation apply so-called 0/92 option producer major commodities. Dole told National Corn Growers Association proposal support Reagan administration "should seriously considered" refusal "play hand mandatory controls" place production. However Dole whether support 0/92 option offer producer 92 pct income support payment regardless planted. The Senate Republican leader 0/92 option pose problems. First view welfare. In addition debate proposal farm bill Dole said. Dole repeat call across-the-board export enhancement say subsidy offer Soviet Union improve U.S. relation country. Dole United States decision trade Moscow it's offer competitive prices. The senator predict Congress decide whether require expansion export subsidy currently target benefit recapture market lose supplier subsidize. Dole pledge offer legislation require marketing loan major crop call marketing loan wheat feedgrains. The Reagan administration's propose farm policy change "are anywhere" Dole single proposal cut target price 10 pct year. Asked reporter speech whether sense shift State Department towards support export enhancement initiative Soviet Union Dole didn't change. Dole close call Senate whether farm bill debate year. Dole encourage selection Republican David Karnes replace late Sen. Edward Zorinsky (D-Neb.) Reuter 

Tofruzen Inc King Soopers City Markets supermarket chain tentatively agree carry company's Tofruzen frozen dessert Colorado store 14-month test market. Reuter 

L.M. Ericsson Telephone Co Sweden award 7.5 mln dlr contract supply Alfaskop computer terminal West German Bundespost West Germany's telecommunication postal administration. Ericsson contract cover 2000 terminal West German post offices. Reuter 

Pre-Paid Legal Services Inc chairman Harland Stonecipher company's sale growth rate five substantially exceed average 100 pct record years. Addressing analyst Stonecipher decline specific figure attribute optimism recent loan agreement I.C.H. Corp ICH> Pre-Paid slat receive 10 mln dlrs. In 1986 Pre-Paid earn 2.5 mln dlrs sale 42.4 mln dlrs compare net 1.5 mln dlrs sale 19.8 mln dlrs 1985. Stonecipher company's product market I.C.H. subsidiaries. The agreement I.C.H. provide access 50 Pre-Paid's coverage 22 said. Pre-Paid provide insurance legal service primarily private sector. Reuter 

Shr loss seven ct v loss 3.83 dlrs Net profit 1700000 v loss 13900000 Revs 18.7 mln v 25.6 mln Note: Current shr prefer dividend 2.0 mln dlrs Prior shr net include 34.5 mln dlr writedown oil property Reuter 

Iraq repel Iranian attack position held fourth army corp east southern Iraqi town Amarah Baghdad-Basra highway. A Baghdad communique Iranian infantry brigade back tank launch overnight attack fierce fight rag six hour Iranian troop flee battlefield leave 220 kill wounded. No major battle report fought fourth army corp mainly swampland Hawizah marsh run eastward southern port city Basra. Reuter 

U.S. Senate Republican leader Robert Dole (R-Kan.) Republican lawmaker consider introduce legislation extend ethanol tax exemption 2000. Dole address National Corn Growers Association board proposal consideration rural task force Republican Congress governors. Gasoline contain 10 pct ethanol receives six cent gallon exemption nine cent federal excise tax. The exemption expire 1992. Ethanol produce primarily agribusiness firm include Archer Daniels Midland (ADM) A.E. Staley. The tax exemption help bolster ethanol production despite sharp drop price compete crude oil. Reuter 

Oak Industries sign definitive agreement buy stock Rexnord Inc's Railway Maintenance Equipment Co unit undisclosed sum. The company Railway Maintenance 1986 revenue 16 mln dlrs. Oak acquisition two-tier strategy buying releated unrelated businesses. Oak tax loss carryforward 125 mln dlrs 1986. Reuter 

Sumitomo Bank California declare 7-1/2 pct stock dividend addition regular quarterly cash dividend 29 ct share. Both dividend payable April 27 shareholder record March 31 company said. Reuter 

Qtly div 18 ct v 17 ct prior Pay April 15 Record April One Reuter 

H.J. Heinz Co board director elect Anthony O'Reilly chairman board succeed Henry Heinz II die February 23. Heinz O'Reilly retain title president chief executive officer. Reuter 

Shr 53 ct v 46 ct Qtly div 28 ct v 25 ct prior Net 74.7 mln v 63.2 mln Revs 1.08 billion v 1.01 billion Nine mths Shr 1.78 dlrs v 1.60 dlrs Net 244.4 mln v 219.7 mln Revs 3.33 billion v 3.15 billion Note: Dividend payable April 10 shareholder record March 23. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp sell 405 mln dlrs corporate bond nearly 3.5 billion dlr pension fund Wall Street investment banker vice president treasurer Fred Zuckerman said. He plan sale corporate issue fund's portfolio. Zuckerman Chrysler sell slightly billion dlrs corporates. "Phase (the sale) month so" Chrysler executive add proceeds invest exclusively equity market. Before today's sale corporate bond security comprise roughly third pension fund portfolio. "After sale equity amount 50 pct portfolio" Zuckerman said. "We believe equity market upside potential bond market" executive said. "Interest rate come I bet lot drop sharply." He add "I personally rate decline 50 basis point year." Zuckerman 405 mln dlr bond sale compose 139 separate issues. "Sixty pct utility 20 pct issue foreign government corporation 20 pct financial institutions" detailed. The Chrysler treasurer corporate paper typically 18-year maturity. "The security long-term high-quality bond mostly rat AA-minus A-plus" said. Zuckerman Chrysler sell corporate bond 1.6 pct above yesterday's closing price issues. "That show portfolio desirable" commented. Corporate bond trader note Chrysler's sale occur backdrop slightly weak secondary market. They believe Chrysler sell corporates profit issue bought automaker portfolio rate higher. Chrysler's Zuckerman company sell corporate issue Wall Street security firms. He Morgan Stanley Co Inc Salomon Brothers Inc bought bonds. However Zuckerman decline name houses. Yesterday Chrysler present investment banker list bond submit bid morning. Zuckerman Morgan Stanley bought corporate bond houses. Wall Street source believe First Boston Corp Merrill Lynch Capital Markets bidding corporate bonds. They believe firm award bond carmaker well. A spokesman Morgan decline comment refer inquiry Chrysler. Officials Salomon First Boston Merrill Lynch unavailable immediate comment. Reuter 

Maoist guerrilla use dynamite derail locomotive train wagon interrupt traffic Peru's sole railway line link capital central Andes country's mining centre locate authority said. Damages estimate 800000 dlrs dynamite blast yesterday Chacapalca explosion wreck train laden mineral 45 metre railway line. Crews hop restore traffic line clearing damage train repair track Chacapalca 225 km east Capital Lima. An official Mineroperu comercial (Minpeco) Peru's mineral marketing firm agency assess situation. There declaration force majeure contract ship mineral abroad. Foreign sale silver copper zinc mineral earn Peru half export income. Most mineral extract refine central peruvian andes ship central railway lima port callao. Reuter 

Tenneco Inc company rumor takeover candidate rise sharply speculation surface investor T. Boone Pickens target company acquisition trader analyst said. Tenneco spokesman Joseph Macrum "we comment whatsoever." Pickens available comment. Traders note activity stock increase publish report link Pickens Tenneco. Tenneco rise point 48-3/4. Paul Feretti analyst New Orleans-based Howard Weil Labouisse Friedrichs Inc surprised market rumor Tenneco target takeover attempt. "It's pure market speculation Boone Pickens interested" Feretti said. "But Tenneco challenge run sheer size diversity. Mr. Pickens like challenge." Pickens unsuccessful attempt Dallas-based Diamond Shamrock Corp DIA> winter secret plan acquire additional natural gas reserve belief gas price stabilize sooner oil prices. Tenneco hold natural gas reserve estimate excess 3.5 trillion cubic foot analyst said. Feretti conservatively estimate Tenneco's breakup value 58 dlrs share company generate cash flow 10 dlrs share "which probably attractive Pickens." Other analyst estimate breakup value 60 dlr share range. "I strongly doubt hostile takeover" Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc's Houston-based analyst John Olson put little credence rumors. "Tenneco gargantuan enterprise seven billion dlrs long-term debt prefer stock outstanding." He buyer deal "the intractable problems" Tenneco face farm equipment unit energy businesses. Analysts suggest Tenneco defensive strategy fend unwanted buyer spin non-energy business directly shareholder buy share create limited partnership natural gas pipeline interests. An analyst remain unidentified discourage Pickens rumor. "Pickens plateful already holding Burlington Northern Amerada Hess" said. "I don't willing Tenneco's problem Case (the farm equipment unit) lose 180 mln dlrs annually worth billion dlrs market today." Reuter 

Software AG Systems Inc expect report earnings third quarter "substantially weaker" earnings prior period due unexpected shortfall U.S. domestic license revenues. For quarter end November 30 Software AG earn 2089000 dlrs 5014000 dlrs before. In year's third quarter Software AG earn 1598000 dlrs. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp escalate automotive part counterfeiter service Light Signatures Inc Los Angeles. It computer technology Light Signatures initially safeguard warranty glass. Reuter 

Net 3563000 v 2821000 Sales 318.6 mln v 305.4 mln Year Net 28950000 v 20167000 Sales 1.22 billion v 1.17 billion Note: Company subsidiary Bayer AG West Germany. 1986 figure exclude Miles' Bayvet animal health sell Jan. 1 1986 Mobay Corp Bayer AG affiliate. Reuter 

Equity Silver Mines Ltd> agree sell 6.6 mln share class par value voting stock Placer Development Ltd 37.1 mln dlrs increase Placer's stake Equity 74.5 pct 68 pct. The transaction subject regulatory approval vote Equity minority shareholder April 23 annual meeting company said. Proceeds sale share price 5.625 dlrs buy deliver 4985000 ounce silver Placer Equity said. Equity Silver silver remains deliver sale agreement Placer delivery 750000 ounce minimum commitment 1987. Equity arrange acquire 4985000 ounce silver 7.40 dlrs ounce subject sell share Placer. Purchase delivery silver Placer result after-tax gain 6.6 mln dlrs Equity said. It stock silver transaction create 37059000 dlr fund dividend paid cash available. The cash fund enable Equity Silver continue pay dividend prefer share increase likelihood able pay dividend common share company said. It elaborate common share dividend paid. The company normally pay quarterly prefer dividend total 619000 dlrs retain earnings Equity Silver said. Equity Silver retain earnings 2312000 dlrs December 31 1986. Reuter 

With troop Brazil's port oil installation government Prersident Jose Sarney sought wave labour unrest show force. Yesterday government sent thousand troop support instance tank occupy nine oil refinery six area oil production. The state-oil company Petrobras request intervention threaten strike 55000 oil industry employees. The government already dispatch 1000 marine occupy country's main port seamen's strike rule illegal Friday. The strike 40000 seaman 13th represent stern challenge government. The stoppage delayed export Brazil desperately need foreign exchange. It deterioration country's trade balance precipitate Brazil's current debt crisis decision February 20 suspend payment 68 billion dlrs commercial debt. There sign seamen's strike badly hit port Santos -- South America -- country's main ports. Small group marine arm submachineguns stand quay near strike-bound ship military presence generally discreet. A total 800 marine inside dock sight. Yesterday marine police occupy ship Docemarte seamen's leader said. After explain captain striker face jail strike illegal return work. One strike leader Elmano Barbosa "it psychological war. They use force use peaceful methods." Port source Brazilian ship Santos Docemarte Henrique Leal working. At seamen's strike headquarters Rio de Janeiro spokesman total 190 ship strike-bound Brazil foreign ports. Contradicting earlier report strike headquarters Rio de Janeiro seaman Santos striker board ship run food. The current labour unrest bad face Sarney's civilian government ago. Yesterday separate protest hundred thousand farmer held rally direct largely bank rates. The current rash labour unrest industry agriculture stem failure government's now-collapsed Cruzado Plan price freeze. Reuter 

Shr profit 20 ct v profit five ct Net profit 2273000 v profit 563000 Rev 38.7 mln v 30.3 mln Avg share 11138503 v 10982699 Nine month Shr profit 40 ct v loss 10 ct Net profit 4448000 v loss 1123000 Rev 108.4 mln v 75.2 mln NOTE: Third qtr net include gain discontinue operation 3.5 mln dlrs 31 ct share v 271000 ct share fiscal 1985's third qtr. Nine month net include gain discontinue operation 3.8 mln dlrs 34 ct share v 731000 dlrs seven ct share nine month fiscal 1985. 

The U.S. House Representatives key procedural vote oppose grant 40 mln dlrs Nicaraguan rebel President Reagan account previous aid include proceeds U.S. Arms sale Iran. The major test House sentiment hour chamber final vote assistance. However 227 198 vote procedural matter see temporary defeat Reagan aid "contra" rebel major foreign policy initiatives. Congressional leader include foe contra aid acknowledge despite today's rebuff expect virtually impossible prevent 40 mln dlrs approve through. Even Senate go House postpone aid Reagan veto legislation Congress expect able override veto. But House Speaker Jim Wright Texas Democrat today's vote "send message" Reagan contra trouble. Reuter 

Shr loss ct v profit 14 ct Net loss 79778 v profit 458176 Revs 1063623 v 1165186 Note: 1986 include 400000 dlr writedown Utah oil gas property Reuter 

Paralax Video Enterprises Inc agreeed acquire American Video Group Inc> exchange 287700 Paralax restrict common share warrant buy 318600 restrict share six dlrs share. Paralax holder American Video convertible debenture elect exchange Paralax restrict common market value 380000 dlrs value determine 45 days. American Video closely held company operating video rental concession post base exchange 54 Army Air Force Navy Coast Guard installations. In recent company revenue 1.5 mln dlrs. Paralax acquisition schedule close March 16. The company 5.5 mln share outstanding. Reuter 

Shr loss 21 ct v loss 29 ct Net loss 1246000 v loss 1420000 Revs 2120000 v 1186000 Avg shrs 5853587 v 4880427 Year Shr loss 85 ct v loss 1.21 dlrs Net loss 4968000 v loss 5274000 Revs 6536000 v 5056000 Avg shrs 5854543 v 4367864 Reuter 

Dividend 34 ct v 34 ct previously Pay April 15 Record March 23 Reuter 

The Bulgarian Foreign Trade Bank sign Japanese bank 40 billion Euroyen equivalent loan large syndicate loan denominate euroyen European borrower Bank Tokyo Ltd lead managers. The financing seven provide borrower option borrow currencies. Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd lead manager nine Japanese bank join financing. The syndication deal design enhance Foreign Trade Bank's relationship Japanese financial institution Bank Tokyo said. The financing marked trip international capital market borrower 1985. The loan six grace period 1/8 pct London Interbank Offered Rate margin rise 1/4 pct thereafter. Reuter 

The U.S. Securities Exchange Commission charge manage director Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner Smith Ltd London mastermind "a massive insider trading scheme." Nahum Vaskevitch manage director Mergers Acquisitions Department broker's London office charge civil complaint SEC file Manhattan Federal Court. The complaint Vaskevitch leak information 12 company involve merger acquisition result mln dlrs profit involve scheme. Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner Smith subsidiary Merrill Lynch Co Inc. Reuter 

A Bank Italy circular give green Italian bank establish merchant banking unit stipulates unit minimum capital 50 billion lire. The circular render operative previously detailed resolution agree government interministerial committee month wider participation Italian bank merchant banking activities. Previously activity essentially confine bank operating special credit section provide medium- long-term loan industry. The circular stipulates merchant bank bank debt total maximum double capital. It stipulates total amount risk capital merchant bank hold portfolio exceed value bank's combine capital reserves. No investment single company exceed 20 pct combine value merchant bank's capital reserves. The merchant bank acquire either directly indirectly control stake company invest. Reuter 

Bayly Corp acquire 55 pct Chutes Corp maker denim-oriented sportswear headquarter Seattle Wash. Terms disclosed. Reuter 

Shadowfax Resources Ltd normal course issuer bid acquire cancellation five pct mln outstanding common share market Alberta Stock Exchange subject regulatory approvals. Reuter 

The Commodity Futures Trading Commission approve Minneapolis Grain Exchange's application trade fructose corn syrup-55 HFCS-55 future contract commission said. The contract provide delivery 48000 lb plus minus pct bulk HFCS-55 meeting specify standard regard physical chemical properties. CFTC exchange plan begin trading July 1987 HFCS-55 contract April 6. CFTC soft drink industry currently buy 95 pct U.S.-produced HFCS-55 liquid food beverage sweetener produce processing corn starch corn refiners. Reuter 

General Instrument Corp's government system division receive 35.9 mln dlr contract Naval Air Command Systems. The company contract call continued production General Instrument's electronics warfare system application naval aircraft. The contract contains option 100 system order company added. Reuter 

The London Stock Exchange immediate comment U.S. Insider trading charge senior London executive Merrill Lynch Co Exchange spokesman said. "This civil action New York no-one proper detail yet" added. The London Exchange keep touch U.K. Government's information channel U.S. Securities Exchange Commission await far development said. Trade Industry Department official decline immediate comment. Merrill Lynch London far amplification SEC charge executive Nahum Vaskevitch firms's New York office. Reuter 

Intelligent Systems Master Limited Partnership cash distribution 25 ct unit April unitholders record March 31. The company continued strength result prompt move. Intelligent Systems add current plan sell asset previously announce successful far distribution estimate 15 ct 25 ct unit. Earlier company report fiscal third quarter end December 31 net income 2.3 mln dlrs 20 ct share fiscal 1985 third quarter result 563000 dlrs five ct share. In addition report fiscal 1986 nine months' net income 4.4 mln dlrs 40 ct share versus loss 1.1 mln dlrs 10 ct share fiscal 1985's quarters. Reuter 

A official key U.S. senator corporate merger wave harm economy blame Reagan administration laxness enforce federal antitrust laws. Sen. Howard Metzenbaum Ohio Democrat chair Senate Judiciary Committee's Antitrust Subcommittee caution Department Justice (DOJ) comply request listing 1980 department official reject staff recommendation prosecute suspect antitrust violation. Metzenbaum data Monday DOJ fail meet deadline hint refuse comply. Acting Assistant Attorney General Antitrust Charles Rule defend administration's record antitrust enforcement told panel today's hearing department process prepare response Metzenbaum's request. "We hide concerned institutional interests" Rule said. He provide explanation interest were. Metzenbaum schedule hearing request data concern "that administration abandon nation's historical commitment effective antitrust enforcement." "The green on" said. "Merger mania rampant country...and serve well." Rule counter low inflation rate continue economic expansion meant administration's policy work well. He simply look challenge file pending merger mislead reason believe fix proportion merger anticompetitive. "If look individual case statistic appropriately enforce antitrust laws" Rule said. Metzenbaum's view bolster National Association Attorneys General top law enforcement officials. "The federal assault antitrust comprehensive" Robert Abrams attorney New York chairman group's antitrust committee told panel. "The reduction enforcement exacerbate federal attempt prevent attorney private party enforce law accordance clear meaning Supreme Court interpretations" Abrams said. The draft merger guideline bring uniformity attorney generals' effort enforce law level. Reuter 

Kurzweil Music Systems Inc take step reduce cost include 10 15 pct reduction force. A spokesman company 70 employees. It reduction include professional service administrative cost manufacturing overhead non-essential development service add cut expect significant impact begin quarter. Earlier Kurzweil report 1986 loss 85 ct share compare 1985 loss 1.21 dlrs share. Reuter 

The White House proposal House Speaker Jim Wright tax stock transfer "would clearly tax increase" President Reagan oppose it. Spokesman Marlin Fitzwater note 47 mln Americans own security share mutual fund pension invest stock market. He Wright's proposal differ user fee Administration propose budget "clearly tax increase." Reuter 

France support European Commission's plan European Community (EC) fat oil tax object oilseed proposal Yves Van Haecke aide French agriculture minister Francois Guillaume said. He told assembly France's Oilseeds Federation (FFCOP) suppression monthly increase oilseed support price example unacceptable. French oilseed expert add principle single tax regardless vary quality clumsy capable unneccessarily alienate exporter U.S. Reuter 

Engelhard Corp EC> Japanese joint venture Nippon Engelhard Ltd construct chemical catalyst manufacturing facility Numazu complex expand research laboratory Ichikawa. Start-up target third quarter 1987. Reuter 

H.J. Heinz Co net income third quarter rise 18.2 pct despite 17.2 pct increase marketing expenses. Meanwhile company raise quarterly dividend 28 ct share 25 ct share expectation tax rate tax law result great cash flow. For third quarter end January 31 Heinz earn 74.7 mln dlrs 55 ct share earnings 63.2 mln dlrs 46 ct share year-ago quarter. For nine month company post profit 244.4 mln dlrs 1.78 dlrs share compare profit 219.7 mln dlrs 1.60 dlrs share year-ago period. "Based company's performance nine month expect achieve 23rd consecutive growth records" Anthony J.F. O'Reilly Heinz's newly elect chairman. Reuter 

State Banking Commissioner Robert Empie order remove office allege insider trading scheme plan fight charge aide today. "There hearing allegations" spokeswoman Empie return meeting outside state. Governor Henry Bellmon yesterday issue executive remove Empie office "by reason incompetence malfeasance neglect duty." Bellmon Empie held control 50000 share stock United Oklahoma Bank firm whose asset regulated. He commisssioner "information available reason position commissioner determine sell attempt sell share stock." The give Empie 20 day request hearing aide indicate plan do. In meantime suspend office. "Empie intentionally mislead Oklahoma believe remove hmself potential conflict place ... share so-called blind trust beyond control Empie continued infomred asset trust value assest remain control disposition show transfer share December 23 1985" Bellmon said. Reuter 

Mario Branco Peres president Brazilian Association Citrus Juice Industries (Abrassuco) welcome decision U.S. Commerce Department sharply cut duty import frozen concentrate orange juice (FCOJ) Brazil. Speaking telephone Sao Paulo Peres "With decision U.S. government recognise honesty Brazilian exporter intention practise dumping." In final ruling yesterday U.S. government eliminate duty ship Sucocitrico Cutrale cut 1.96 pct duty Citrosuco. Duties 8.54 pct October. Peres Brazil orange juice meet need major clients. "We stock certainly orange juice available supply buyers" Peres decline estimate amount current stock. "To keep secret strategy" added. Peres price policy orange juice base market conditions. "There free trade policy" said. Cutrale Citrosuco official immediately available comment. Reuter 

ICH Corp's stock continued pressure low earnings expectation Wall Street analyst said. The stock 17-1/4 Thursday ICH announce reporting lower-than-expected fourth quarter net income. The company report full 1986 net income 2.00 dlrs share compare 2.32 dlrs share 1985. Analysts estimate 1987 net 3.00-4.00 dlrs look 2.50 dlr 2.80 dlr range. ICH official unavailable comment. Reuter 

Shr profit 26 ct v profit 19 ct Net profit 1458000 dlrs v profit 1070000 dlrs Rev 30.9 mln dlrs v 27.5 mln dlrs 12 mths Shr profit 60 ct v loss 19 ct Net profit 3367000 dlrs v loss 1061000 dlrs Revs 111.5 mln dlrs v 94.3 mln dlrs Reuter 

Shr 47 ct v 31 ct Net 4757000 v 2466000 Revs 32.8 mln v 33.5 mln Avg shrs 12638000 v 8941000 Reuter 

Atlantic Southeast Airlines Inc report 11.1 pct increase revenue passenger mile February 1987 ago period. The regional carrier report flew 17.5 mln passenger revenue mile month 15.7 mln mile February 1986. ASA load factor 38.8 pct 42.7 pct ago. Reuter 

Quebec housing start fell February 2191 pct drop growth Quebec housing start high Canada Canada Mortgage Housing Corp said. The February rate seasonally adjust stand 40000 79000 January government agency said. Reuter 

Invacare Corp chairman president chief executive officer A. Malachi Mixon III expect healthcare equipment company post sale increase 10 15 pct range 1987. Mixon increase internal growth potential acquisitions. "Invacare aggressively seek acquisition complement company's exist product lines" Mixon said. Earlier company report fourth quarter 1986 net 1.5 mln dlrs 26 ct share 1.1 mln dlrs 19 ct share 1985's fourth quarter. Invacare report 1986 net income 3.4 mln dlrs 60 ct share loss 1.1 mln dlrs 19 ct share 1985. Reuter 

Oper shr loss 26 ct v profit five ct Oper net loss 1506000 v profit 312000 Revs 42 mln v 27.9 mln Year Oper shr loss 43 ct v profit 16 ct Oper net loss 2535000 v profit 1236000 Revs 129.9 mln v 120.3 mln NOTE: Excludes discontinue operation loss 1.42 dlrs share versus loss nine ct quarter loss 1.62 dlrs share versus loss 12 ct year. Also excludes extraordinary loss six ct share fourth quarter 1985 gain 1.81 dlrs share full 1985. Also excludes 1986 full gain 80 ct share accounting change. Reuter 

Argentine meat export Jan/Dec 1986 total 220911 tonne 223204 tonne ship 1985 period National Meat board said. Shipments tonne comparative figure 1985 period bracket included: beef 120184 (137686) horse meat 25651 (33892) beef offal 50100 (47745). Argentina's meat export total 20481 tonne December 1986 15801 tonne 1985 month. Shipments tonne comparative figure December 1985 bracket included: beef 14384 (10339) horse meat 1609 (1539) beef offal 3388 (3098) board said. Main destination refrigerate beef (bone equivalent) follow tonne comparative figure 1985 brackets: E.C. 46300 (49700) Israel 16200 (17600) Brazil 18100 (unavailable) Peru 8100 (2300) Angola 4800 (12100) Chile 3400 (8200) Switzerland 3000 (3000) Canary Islands 2400 (3700) Singapore 1900 (1700) Aruba/Curazao 1600 (1700). Main destination can meat cooked beef (bone equivalent) tonne figure 1985 bracket were: United States 88300 (102900) E.C. 30700 (24100). Reuter 

South Korean Trade Minister Rha Woong Bae nation maintain trading surplus five cut foreign debt. He interview Reuter likely South Korea drop barrier foreign good move balance trade position. He trade surplus vital nation reduce 44.5 billion dlr foreign debt. Rha 1986 South Korea trade surplus - 4.5 billion dlrs 1985 deficit 900 mln dlrs. Rha remark two-week trade mission team lead agree buy U.S. product value 1.8 billion dlrs. About 800 mln dlrs purchase good type South Korea normally bought Japan. Rha leaf Ottawa trade talk Canadian official businessmen. Asked South Korea retaliate U.S. good Congress close U.S. market product "at moment retaliation." South Korea major exporter U.S. textile apparel electronic good television set video cassette record personal computers. Its purchase United States include electronic test equipment grain cotton. Reuter 

Shr 26 ct v 36 ct Shr dilute 25 ct v 36 ct Net 1389000 v 1412000 Revs 56.9 mln v 35.1 mln Avg shrs 5412000 v 3962000 Year Shr 90 ct v 75 ct Shr dilute 86 ct v 75 ct Net 4692000 v 2961000 Revs 201.4 mln v 140.0 mln Avg shrs 5234000 v 3954000 NOTE: Results 14 53 week period end January 3 1987 v 13 52 week period end December 28 1985 1985 net period include gain 99000 dlrs tax loss carryforward Spokeswoman average share outstanding dilute basis available Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corp (CCC) accepted bid export bonus cover sale 340000 tonne hard red winter wheat 210000 tonne soft red winter wheat China U.S. Agriculture Department said. The bonus award average 36.22 dlrs tonne wheat schedule delivery May-Oct 1987. The bonus award Cargill Inc (305000 tonnes) Continental Grain Co (155000 tonnes) Mitsubishi International Corp (60000 tonnes) Richco Grain Co (30000 tonnes). Bonuses paid exporter form commodity CCC stocks. The purchase complete Export Enhancement Program initiative China announce Jan 26. Reuter 

Qtly div 72 ct v 72 ct prior Pay April 15 Record March 23 NOTE: Company's full name Southern New England Telecommunications Corp. Reuter 

council minister approve petroleos de venezuela's plan purchase half champlin petroleum refinery corpus christi texas government source said. The cabinet authorize energy mine minister arturo hernandez grisanti approve purchase shareholder assembly oil company petroleos de venezuela (pdvsa). Pdvsa april 14 sign letter intent buy half champlin's corpus christi refinery undisclosed sum. Under term provisional agreement venezuela supply 160000 barrel plant company jointly own pdvsa champlin subsidiary union pacific corp unp>. The deal allow pdvsa joint share champlin's refinery distribution network. The purhcase series overseas joint venture venezuela manage assure market 400000 barrel approximately 1.5 mln bpd exports. Hernandez grisanti told reporter cabinet meeting pdvsa pay 93 mln dlrs half ownership champlin refinery - 33 mln dlrs cash 60 mln dlrs crude oil products. Through deal venezuela assure sale 140000 bpd crude products. Hernandez pdsva enter similar joint venture veba oel west germany nynas petroelum sweden citgo states. Reuter 

Amoskeag Co board vote seek shareholder approval April 27 annual meeting recapitalization plan call distribution Class B common share common share held. The company Class B common 10 vote share common vote share. Each common share entitle dividend Class B share freely transferrable five convert share-for-share common time. Amoskeag propose recapitalization increase total authorize stock 26.0 mln share 2.2 mln. The board propose total 20.0 mln authorize common share 6.0 mln authorize Class B shares. Reuter 

Shr 71 ct v 15 ct Net 4234000 dlrs v 803000 dlrs Revs 15.4 mln dlrs v 10.3 mln dlrs 12 mths Shr 1.26 dlrs v 67 ct Net 7299000 dlrs v 3607000 dlrs Revs 52.5 mln dlrs v 40.7 mln dlrs NOTE: Empire's investment Deltona Corp report equity method begin fourth qtr 1986. Amounts 1985 qtrs 1986 restate reflect retroactive application. During 1986 17-1/2 pct debenture 9-7/8 dlrs prefer stock redeem convert result 6028755 common share outstanding December 31 1986 compare 2408766 common share outstanding December 31 1985. Reuter 

Oper shr loss six ct v profit seven ct Oper net loss 481517 v profit 487432 Revs 7492686 v 5575043 Avg shrs 8.5 mln v 7.2 mln Year Oper shr loss six ct v profit 34 ct Oper net loss 465043 v profit 2283811 Revs 29.5 mln v 19.8 mln Avg shrs 7.8 mln v 6.7 mln NOTE: Excludes extraordinary credit ct share fourth quarter 1986 15 ct year. Reuter 

Rexnord Inc sign definitive agreement sell Railway Maintenance Equipment Co subsidiary Oak Industries Inc. Terms withheld. Also participate agreement Banner Industries Inc previously agree acquire Rexnord. Railway Maintenance 1986 sale 16 mln dlrs. Rexnord sale major divest business represent 200 mln dlrs net assets. Still divest Process Machinery Division sale 137 mln dlrs Mathews Conveyer Co sale 83 mln dlrs. -- Corrects mame purchaser Reuter 

Dart Group Corp DARTA> want acquire Supermarkets General Corp 1.62 billion dlrs likely fight target seek buyer arbitrageur said. Speculation Dart's offer 41.75 dlrs share begin bidding contest help Supermarkets share gain 42-1/8 2.3 mln shares. One rumor Federated Department Stores Inc FDS> take look Supermarkets General. "Our policy comment rumor speculation nature" Federated spokeswoman said. An arbitrageur note Dart control chairman Herbert H. Haft son Robert raise initial bid Safeway Stores approximately 10 pct Safeway resisted. However company sell buyout topped Hafts. If history repeat Hafts raise bid 46 dlrs rebuffed Supermarkets General arbitrageur said. But arbitrageur Hafts' bid "quite fair." He offer amount 10 time after-tax-cash flow "probably fully priced." Reuter 

Russo Securities Inc> statement act broker execute unsolicited order individual name Securities Exchange Commission civil suit allege insider trading violations. Russo fill order David Sofer Israeli citizen allegedly trade inside information Nahum Vaskevitch Merrill Lynch Co's MER> London merger office. Vaskevitch suspend Merrill cooperate probe. Russo "had knowledge reason believe transaction base improper inside information." Reuter 

Home Shopping Network Inc file Securities Exchange Commission offering 400 mln dlrs convertible subordinate debenture due April 1 2002. Proceeds offering build equip enlarge broadcast processing facility redeem company's 11-3/4 pct senior note due Oct 15 1996 corporate purpose company said. Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc underwrite sale. Reuter 

American Motors Corp director met Wednesday review takeover proposal corporation receive Monday Chrysler Corp C>. AMC board retain independent investment legal adviser expect meet periodically week proposal. Reuter 

Qtly div 25 ct v 25 ct Pay April 20 Record March 31 Reuter 

Kansas City Southern Industries Inc attempt Santa Fe Southern Pacific Co SFX> reopen propose merger Atchison Topeka Santa Fe Railway Co Southern Pacific Transportation Co offer "nothing truly new." In letter shipper Kansas City Chairman Landon Rowland state "This propose merger plainly anti-competitive found ICC urge Department Justice. Nothing changed." Landon Kansas City Southern continue effort acquire transportation operation Santa Fe Railway. Reuter 

Rose's Stores Inc report February sale 92.7 mln dlrs increase 18.1 mln dlrs 24.2 pct sale 74.6 mln dlrs comparable period prior. The company identical store sale increase 15 pct month February. Rose's operates 224 discount store February 1987 compare 208 store ago 13 southeastern states. Reuter 

De Laurentiis Entertainment Group Inc Embassy Communications Californai partnership affiliate Coca-Cola Co KO> plan sell 10.1 pct stake company. In filing Securities Exchange Commission secondary offering De Laurentiis Embassy offer entire stake company 964936 share common stock sale. De Laurentiis 9.6 mln share outstanding. PaineWebber Inc underwrite offering. Reuter 

Robert Halmi Inc obtain five mln dlr line revolve credit Wells Fargo Bank available February 29 1988. Halmi fund development production television program regular company business. Halmi report earnings 2800000 dlrs fiscal 1986 end May 1986 sale 17.2 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Shr nine ct v 17 ct Net 275000 v 490000 Rev 2.4 mln v mln Six month Shr 29 ct v 31 ct Net 885000 v 884000 Rev 6.1 mln v 7.1 mln NOTE: Company's full name Herley Microwave Systems Inc. Reuter 

Rockwell International Corp raise 200 mln dlrs offering note due 1997 yield 7.682 pct lead underwriter Daiwa Securities America Inc. An officer Daiwa's corporate syndicate desk believe Rockwell's debt offering 1984 company tapped Euromarkets. Daiwa U.S. unit Daiwa Securities Co Ltd Japan foreign bookrunner U.S. corporate debt market year. The firm sustain trend emerge 1986 investment banker said. Daiwa head syndicate won Rockwell note competitive bidding. Rockwell net charge 7.722 pct issue Daiwa officer said. The Japanese firm bid note 98.473 coupon 7-1/2 pct reoffering price 98.75 yield 46 basis point comparable Treasury securities. Underwriters syndicate believe 46 basis spread Treasuries aggressive. They premium 50 basis point appropriate. "It look Daiwa submit kamikaze bid business" competitor. However Daiwa officer defend firm's pricing deal. "Because Rockwell float debt 1984 company's note issue museum piece" said. The officer believe Rockwell paper sell quickly mostly company know tapped debt market years. "Investors hungry high-grade debt issue household names" agree corporate bond trader. Non-callable seven issue rat Aa-2 Moody's AA Standard Poor's. Daiwa become foreign firm manage offering domestic debt market September 1986 won competitive bidding 125 mln dlrs 10-year mortgage bond General Telephone Co California unit GTE Corp GTE>. It follow lead UBS Securities Inc U.S. unit Union Bank Switzerland. UBS won deal June 1986 bid won 100 mln dlrs Allied-Signal Inc ALD> debenture due 2016. UBS brought negotiate deal marketplace that. UBS lead late June offering 100 mln dlrs five-year note issue Transamerica Financial Corp subsidiary Transamerica Corp TA>. That follow September UBS price sole underwriter 100 mln dlrs Borg-Warner Corp BOR> note due 1991. In December Nomura Securities International Inc become third foreign security firm manage U.S. offering. The U.S. unit Nomura Securities Co Ltd Japan act sole underwriter won competitive bidding 250 mln dlrs extendible note General Electric Credit Corp subsidiary General Electric Co GE>. The Rockwell deal Daiwa's lead underwriter. Last December Daiwa Nomura name primary dealer Federal Reserve L.F. Rothschild Unterberg Towbin Inc Security Pacific National Bank. UBS Nikko Securities Co International Inc Yamaichi International (America) Inc apply Fed primary dealership status. Primary dealer consider elite firm approve purchase U.S. Treasury security directly Fed's agent Federal Reserve Bank New York investment banker explained. Reuter 

The Wall Street Journal stock Owens-Illinois Inc OI> Inco Ltd N> drop component 30 stock Dow Jones Industrial aveage effective start trading New York Stock Exchange tomorrow. They replace Coca-Cola Co KO> Boeing Co BA>. The paper publish Dow Jones Co Inc DJ> change component require revision divisor calculate industrial average related 65 stock composite index maintain statistical continuity indices. The divisor publish tommorw's editon added. It explain Owens-Illinois Dow 30 1959 object leveraged buyout. The tender offer expire March 16. The Journal Inco drop substitute stock index representative market. Previously name International Nickel Co Inco original component index establish 1928. While Owens-Illinois deletion force Inco substitution solely improve market-sector weight index change company paper stated. Such substitution recently addition McDonald's Corp MCD> October 1985 reflect long-run change economy market added. Reuter 

Panhandle Eastern Corp steady progress reduce natural gas take-or-pay exposure 4.9 billion dlrs 1.7 billion dlrs worth potential claims. Panhandle Eastern chairman R.L. O'Shields settlement payment 247 mln dlrs plus release waiver gas purchase obligation 1982 reduce company's take-or-pay exposure. "While substantial believe unresolved take-or-pay exposure remain manageable" letter shareholder appear company's annual report. Panhandle Eastern budget 78 mln dlrs 1987 capital spending increase 65 mln dlrs spent year. The company primary focus 1987 spending modernize automate pipeline great efficiency. Houston-based Panhandle Eastern earn 133.5 mln 1986 revenue 2.0 billion compare net income 113.1 mln sale 2.5 billion 1985. Reuter 

Williams Cos complete sale Agrico Chemical Co unit Freeport-McMoRan Resource Partners L.P. FRP> initial 250 mln dlrs cash. The company receive additional 100 250 mln dlrs five base operating performance unit. It cash proceeds low debt costs. Reuter 

The U.S. Austin Co Japan's Kawasaki Heavy Industries Inc join compete contact Japanese airport Kansai near Osaka. Austin design engineering construction firm statement Kawasaki bid support facility worth 200-250 mln dlrs. The Kansai project cost eight billion dls. U.S. official complain Japan American firm squeeze Kansai threaten restrict Japanese construction firm United States Kansai open U.S. companies. reuter 

The European Community Commission told EC member prepared discus EC sugar price sugar trader threaten huge sale intervention stock protest policy Commission source said. "Our position willing discus problem market price trader make threats" source said. The source Commission's view clear meeting sugar management committee today. They French West German Dutch official inform committee trader country intend sell 850000 tonne sugar EC intervention stocks. The Commission riposte signal sell sugar sell intervention onto EC market tender move push prices. The source French trader plan sell 775000 tonne intervention stock West German trader 7500 tonne Dutch trader 2500. Reuter 

Senate Republican leader Robert Dole (R-Kan.) Republican lawmaker consider introduce legislation extend ethanol tax exemption 2000. Dole address National Corn Growers Association board proposal consideration rural task force Republican Congress governors. Gasoline contain 10 pct ethanol receives six ct gallon exemption nine ct federal excise tax. The exemption expire 1992. Ethanol produce primarily agribusiness firm include Archer Daniels Midland (ADM) A.E. Staley. The tax exemption help help bolster ethanol production despite sharp drop price compete crude oil. Reuter 

Treasury balance Federal Reserve fell March 10 2.842 billion dlrs 3.073 billion dlrs previous Treasury late budget statement. Balances tax loan note account fell 9.828 billion dlrs 11.418 billion dlrs respective days. The Treasury's operating cash balance total 12.670 billion dlrs March 10 compare 14.490 billion dlrs March 9. Reuter 

South Korean Trade Minister Rha Woong Bae nation maintain trading surplus five cut foreign debt. He interview Reuters likely South Korea drop barrier foreign good move balance trade position. He trade surplus vital nation reduce 44.5 billion dlr foreign debt. Rha 1986 South Korea trade surplus - 4.5 billion dlrs 1985 deficit 900 mln dlrs. Asked South Korea drop trade barrier foreign debt substantially reduce "yes I so." Rha remark two-week trade mission team lead agree buy U.S. product value 1.8 billion dlrs. About 800 mln dlrs purchase good type South Korea normally bought Japan. Rha leave Ottawa trade talk Canadian official businessmen. He interview U.S. purchase reduce country's 7.1 billion dlr surplus United States cut 5.6 billion dlr shortfall Japan. Rha due shift exchange rate U.S. dollar yen cheaper buy U.S. good Japanese goods. He South Korea heavily rely foreign trade hop leader major trading nation resolve grow trend protectionist legislation. Rha "I hope leader together solution make mutually satisfactory concessions." But add "the leader seem hesitant concession domestic political reasons." Speaking country "We lot concession already." He cite regulation permit foreign investment industrial firm allow increase foreign banking activity crack piracy intellectual property strengthen protection copyright patents. Rha South Korea lower tariffs. Asked South Korea retaliate U.S. good Congress close U.S. market product "at moment retaliation." South Korea major exporter United States textile apparel electronic good television set video cassette record personal computers. Its puchases United States include electronic test equipment grain cotton. The trade mission's purchase include Boeing passenger plane 400 mln dlrs McDonnell Douglas plane 300 mln dlrs; machinery worth 725 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Standard Poor's low BBB-minus rating Clark Equipment Co's 108 mln dlrs long-term debt weak industry fundamental company's plan repurchase 70 mln dlrs worth common stock. Despite dramatic rationalization fork-lift truck axle transmission construction equipment operation continue intense competitive pressure limit Clark's growth profit potential S P said. The company force increase debt achieve strategic acquisition goal rating agency added. Reuter 

Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd Hong Kong investment firm raise stake Calmat Co 1480830 share 9.8 pct total outstanding common stock 1217230 share 8.0 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Industrial Equity principally own Brierley Investments Ltd publicly held New Zealand firm bought 263600 Calmat common share Feb 17 March 9 13.1 mln dlrs. It bought stock investment purpose raise stake 15 pct. Reuter 

Paralax Video Enterprises Inc sign definitive agreement buy American Video Group Inc> stock. According merger proposal American Video shareholder receive 287700 restrict Paralax share warrant buy 318600 restrict share six dlrs share. The warrant run years. In addition holder American Video convertible debenture agree exchange holding 380000 dlrs worth Paralax stock. American Video operates store U.S. military bases. Reuter 

International Business Machines Corp form sell support telecommunication products. Called Telecommunications Marketing Service organization IBM combine U.S. direct sale service support operation Rolm Corp unit marketing support operation Information Systems Group. IBM responsible direct sale installation service Rolm product line IBM telecommunication products. IBM acquire Rolm Santa Clara Calif.-based maker telephone swichboards telecommunication equipment 1984. Analysts past criticize IBM move faster integrate Rolm's telecommunication product computer systems. But Edward E. Lucente IBM vice president executive Information Systems Group statement "This step provide single IBM marketing service organization increase focus customers' telecommunication product needs." IBM Jack W. Blumenstein Rolm vice president Business Communications Group charge telecommunication organization operate unit Information Systems Group. Blumenstein name assistant executive Information Systems Group report Lucente IBM said. IBM organization oversee technical marketing support Rolm IBM telecommunication product responsible sale marketing IBM gear. IBM Rolm retain responsibility worldwide manufacture development Rolm products. Rolm continue direct sale product Rolm distributor United States overseas. At IBM Communications Products Division continue direct worldwide development U.S. manufacture IBM's non-Rolm telecommunication products. Dennis D. Paboojian Rolm's president continue report IBM senior vice president Allen J. Krowe IBM said. Reuter 

Detroit Edison Co nearly complete 50 pct level test Fermi 2 nuclear plant near Monroe Mich. The company prepare ask Nuclear Regulatory Commission go-ahead enter series test 75 pct level. Detroit Edison decision modify Fermi's reheat apparatus company schedule plant's commercial operation run June May One. Detroit Edison charge run 1.0 mln dlrs delay cause reheater modification add approximately 30 mln dlrs plant's cost raise estimate total cost 4.26 billion dlrs 4.23 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Lamson Sessions Co decide discontinue operation Youngstown Steel Door maker component equipment railroad freight cars. The company unit sell sometime include discontinue operation 1986 result announce earlier today. The company report loss continue operation 2.5 mln dlrs 1985 profit 1.2 mln dlrs. For discontinue operation report loss 9.5 mln dlrs compare earlier loss 922000 dlrs. Reuter 

Two U.S. government agency dispute proposal U.S. firm sell computer Iran official said. The Commerce Department intend approve export license firm sell computer related equipment Islamic Republic Iran News Agency Iran Power Generation Transmission spokesman B. Jay Cooper said. The export company identify sale include computer Digital Equipment Co DEC> Maynard Mass. High-technology export approve department Commerce Defense State. The Pentagon appeal Commerce's approval sale technology U.S. security Commander Bob Prucha Pentagon spokesman said. The Pentagon ask National Security Council White House prohibit sales. Cooper State Department object sale Secretary State George Shultz indicate weigh deal. Under question Rep. Jack Kemp (R-NY) hearing Shultz unaware Commerce Department prepare grant export license sale computers. "I'm favor sale Iran" advanced U.S. technology Shultz said. The Commerce Department argue excessive restriction hurt U.S. company compete foreign exporters. Cooper technology Iranian sale available elsewhere foreign company Iran U.S. export license approved. Reuter 

Rochester Telephone Corp agree buy Canton Telephone Co> undisclosed terms. Canton serf customer northeastern Penn. In 1986 operating revenue 1.3 mln dlrs company said. Reuter 

ecuador consider measure deal foreign debt follow earthquake kill 300 left 4000 homeless cost country close billion dollar information minister marco lara told reuters. "the government's position ... honour (debt) commitment sacrifice country survive comply" lara said. He nation announce plan deal country's 8.16-billion-dlr foreign debt. The government estimate economic cost earthquake thursday nearly billion dlrs include oil revenue lose oil pipeline damaged. The president ecuadorean Red Cross hugo merino told reuters official toll 300 dead 4000 miss rise rescue worker inspect stricken site helicopter wade mud reach victim northeastern province hardest hit. Reuter 

International Lease Finance Corp file Securities Exchange Commission shelf offering 500 mln dlrs debt security addition 15.75 mln dlrs debt security already register SEC unsold. Proceeds corporate purpose include acquisition aircraft company said. It underwriter include Merrill Lynch Pierce Fenner Smith Inc Salomon Brothers Inc Dean Witter Reynolds Inc Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. Reuter 

A Portland-based wood product company sign 13 mln dlr contract Iraqi government supply finish softwood lumber Iraq Edward Niedermeyer president Niedermeyer-Martin Co yesterday. Niedermeyer told House Foreign Affairs sub-committee International Economic Policy Trade Washington sale agreement contains option lumber export worth 20 mln dlrs. The delivery 8.0 mln dlrs worth plywood addition lumber hinge whether U.S. Department Agriculture interpret plywood agricultural commodity credit guarantee said. Niedermeyer government export credit guarantee (GSM-102) administer USDA key opening Iraqi market capture Scandinavian lumber producers. "This able sell wood product Iraq said. Without USDA possible. We hope lead term export market U.S. lumber products." He contract call supply 21 mln board foot 30 mln board foot softwood lumber housing construction furniture manufacturing. He estimate profit potential company sale five six pct. Niedermeyer spent week Baghdad negotiate sale late month March. He member United States-Iraq Business Forum non-profit design promote commerce Iraq. The forum include Westinghouse General Electric Niedermeyer's company wood product firm membership roster. Reuter 

The follow propose security offering file recently Securities Exchange Commission: On-Line Software International Inc OSII> - Offering 30 mln dlrs convertible subordinate debenture due March 15 2002 Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette Securities Corp. Covenant Corp - Initial offering mln share common stock include 1543916 sell current holder estimate 11.00 12.50 dlrs First Boston Corp. Marine Midland Banks Inc MM> - Offering 125 mln dlrs subordinate capital note due March 1 1997 underwriter lead First Boston Corp. Pentair Inc PNTA> - Offering mln share cumulative convertible prefer stock series 1987 Kidder Peabody Co Inc Piper Jaffray Hopwood Inc. SunGard Data Systems Inc SNDT> - Offering 1.2 mln share common stock Alex. Brown Sons Inc L.F. Rothschild Unterberg Towbin Inc. Weyerhaeuser Co WY> - Shelf offering 250 mln dlrs debt security addition 100 mln dlrs debt security already register SEC unsold. Xicor Inc XICO> - Offering 1.8 mln share common stock Montgomery Securities Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc. LyphoMed Inc LMED> - Offering 70 mln dlrs convertible subordinate debenture due March 15 2012 Alex. Brown Sons Inc Montgomery Securities. Reuter 

Qtly div 15 ct v 15 ct previously Pay June 19 Record June One Reuter 

Canadian Utilities Ltd redeem 14.5 pct cumulative redeemable prefer share series G May 1 1987. Redemption price 26 dlrs share company said. Reuter 

Oper shr loss 97 ct v loss 73 ct Oper net loss 883000 v loss 659000 Revs 19.4 mln v 16.7 mln 12 mths Oper shr loss 2.37 dlrs v loss 1.97 dlrs Oper net loss 2228000 v loss 2145000 Revs 72.4 mln v 63.8 mln NOTE: Excludes gain 3.41 dlrs share versus gain 41 ct quarter gain 5.68 dlrs share versus gain 1.99 dlrs discontinue dispose operations. Reuter 

Giant Food Inc report sale 52-week basis end month increase 10.4 pct 2.48 billion dlrs compare 2.25 billion dlrs prior 52-week period. Reuter 

Donaldson Bramham Lee investor Birmingham Alabama raise stake Penobscot Shoe Co 40500 share 6.6 pct total outstanding common stock 33500 share 5.5 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Lee bought 7000 Penobscot common share Feb 12 March 2 price range 13.75 16.25 dlrs share. Lee bought Penobscot stock investment purpose plan seek control company buy stock. Reuter 

The recent purchase 1.5 mln tonne U.S. corn Japan 600000 tonne South Korea suggests countries' demand reliable supply corn increase U.S. Agriculture Department said. In World Production Trade Report department view reinforce expectation decline exportable supply Argentine corn uncertainty availability South African Chinese corn. With corn purchase Japan commit buying 7.7 mln tonne U.S. corn 1986/87 (Sept-Aug) nearly 400000 tonne great year-ago figure date. South Korea's cumulative commitment amount 2.5 mln tonne 1.5 mln compare said. Reuter 

The Mexican Secretariat Commerce told U.S. recent implementation 10 pct ad valorem tariff fix vegetable oil fluid solid crude refine purify target sunflower oil U.S. Agriculture Department said. In World Production Trade Report department increase tariff category include sunflower corn rapeseed oil reaction importer use basket category avoid pay tariff specific high-tariff products. Reuter 

Aero Services International Inc expect achieve improvement overall operation end September 30 1987. Earlier Aero report 1986 net loss 3.0 mln dlrs compare profit 483000 dlrs 1985. The company loss attributable cost associate acquisition cost operating loss nine Beckett Aviation fix base operation purchase August 1985 discontinue weather service flight simulator segments. Reuter 

Shr loss 63 ct v profit 10 ct Net loss 3.0 mln v profit 483000 Revs 61.9 mln v 43.7 mln NOTE:1986 net loss include loss 1.4 mln dlrs 28 ct share discontinue operations. 1986 revenue include revenue eight month Beckett Aviation acquire September 1985. Year end September 30 1986. Reuter 

Franco Nevada Mining Corp Ltd> gain stock price related deep drilling conduct American Barrick Resources Corp ABXFF> Goldstrike claim Carlin camp northern Nevada. Franco Nevada stock seven dlrs share Toronto Stock Exchange. Franco Nevada American Barrick announce March nine drilling indicate significant intersection sulfide gold mineralization below depth 1000 feet. One vertical drill hole intersect gold continuously 1100 foot 1730 foot average 0.30 ounce ton announcement said. Extensive drilling continue Goldstrike company add full economic value property cannot assess far result available. Franco Nevada pct royalty plus five pct net profit acreage. Those holding 3400 acre mineral right held Franco Nevada Carlin gold belt. Reuter 

Shr 1.36 dlrs v dlr Net 1010249 v 750856 Revs 15.2 mln v 11.9 mln 12 mths Shr 3.24 dlrs v 2.18 dlrs Net 2407186 v 1627250 Revs 57 mln v 53.1 mln Reuter 

An 11-day-old strike Brazilian seaman affect coffee shipment lead short term supply squeeze abroad exporter said. They quantify coffee delayed 40 pct coffee export carry Brazilian ship movement foreign vessel disrupt port congestion cause strike. A series labor dispute bad weather meant Brazil's coffee export run average week behind schedule start source added. By February shipment fall 800000 bag behind registration leave 2.4 mln bag ship March. By March 10 230000 bag ship source said. Given Brazil's port load capacity 100000 bag normal operation resume immediately interrupt bad weather March register coffee inevitably ship April added. Reuter 

Cleaver Brooks subsidiary Aqua Chem> own French firm Societe Lyonnaise DesEaux Et de L'Eclairage plan build manufacturing plant near Tulsa. The company enter 90-day option effective March 9 purchase 20.7 acre lot vacant 143000 square foot building locate Sapula Okla. No price disclose company. Reuter 

Alcoa official acknowledge possibility position off-exchange aluminum option market decline specific comment trade speculation company hold outstanding position. An Alcoa (Aluminum Company America) source involve terminal trading company said: "We mean available manage it's possibility we're trading options." "We won't specific we're doing. But you're deal un-alloyed ingot it's commodity lot tool available (for hedging) Alcoa use tools" Al Posti Alcoa's manager corporate news. Trade source Alcoa call option equal 30000 50000 tonne aluminum due mature April May. However New York-based aluminium trader believe size Alcoa's position exaggerated. The possibility Alcoa call option factor indicate supply tightness worsen quarter trader said. "If decide exercise buy mean really squeeze market" New York trader note aluminum stock London Metal Exchange 90500 tonne week. Reuter 

Shr loss 1.32 dlrs v profit ct Net loss 5666000 v profit 84000 Revs 12.0 mln v 21.7 mln Nine mths Shr loss 1.87 dlrs v loss 71 ct Net loss 8030000 v loss 3062000 Revs 40.9 mln v 53.0 mln Note: include loss discontinue operation 190000 dlrs v loss 185000 dlrs 3rd qtr 731000 dlrs loss v 815000 dlrs loss nine mths. Reuter 

General Electric Co's GE Semiconductor Business agree sell Datel unit lead unit's president Nicolas Tagaris. Terms disclosed. Tagaris found company produce precision data acquisition conversion control component subsystem 1970. He sell GE 1979. Reuter 

Trico Industries Inc March 31 date special shareholder meeting vote propose acquisition company Paccar Inc PCAR>. In January company announce agreement cover propose acquisition Paccar Trico's approximately 8.2 mln share outstanding eight dlrs share cash. Reuter 

The federal government's transfer payment seven province rise five pct finance department announced. The payment poorer province fund various service rise 5.6 billion dlrs 5.3 billion dlrs fiscal end March 31 1987. In fiscal 1989 payment rise 5.9 billion dlrs. Payments Newfoundland Prince Edward Island Nova Scotia New Brunswick Quebec Manitoba Saskatchewan. The department 270 mln dlrs owe Ottawa Atlantic province Quebec Saskatchewan forgiven. The debt arose overpayment previous years. Reuter 

Nelson Holdings International Ltd's> Nelson Entertainment Inc unit enter agreement co-finance ten motion picture Hemdale Releasing Corp. Under pact Nelson domestic video right Hemdale responsible distribution media. Reuter 

Wall Street market analyst change component Dow Jones Industrial Average shift smokestack industry dominate 30-stock index. "It strengthens Dow" William LeFevre analyst Advest Inc. He Coca-Cola Co KO> addition "is genuine consumer stock oppose smokestack." He applaud decision drop Inco Ltd N> "a super stock hasn't lately." The editor Wall Street Journal decide add Boeing Co BA> drop Owens-Illinois Inc OI>. Charles Jensen MKI Securities Inco "stodgy number." But note put stock average 30 relatively minor change. "This distinctly index useful" Frank Korth Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc. "The movement market upside enhance shift Coke." But Shearson's aerospace analyst remove Boeing firm's recommend list take buy hold. Korth Boeing's appear lean heavily military oppose commercial. Prior tomorrow's market opening Wall Street Journal publish divisor calculate index. LeFevre divisor probably bit probably low current level 0.889 due forthcoming split component International Paper Co IP>. The divisor adjust whenver stock split drop below May year. The 0.889 divisor mean change 1/8 (12.5 cts) price component produce change 14 ct index. Reuter 

Turner Broadcasting System Inc's CNN reach agreement China Central Television air news program China. It China Central TV CNN report daily newscast channel reach audience 300 mln viewers. The company agreement give CNN sell advertising spot China Central TV. CNN reach agreement Televerket Kabel TV Sweden broadcast 24-hour news cable TV network. The reach initial 118000 viewers. Reuter 

Thomas Betts Corp U.S. Court Appeals Federal Circuit affirm earlier judgment U.S. District Court District Delaware direct unit Litton Industries LIT> pay 5781711 dlrs damage patent violations. Thomas Betts court upheld May 26 1986 award plus paid Winchester Electronics division Litton Systems Inc subsidiary Litton Industries. The company explain judgment regard lawsuit file 1978 patent violation manufacture sale transition "d" subminiature IDC connectors. Reuter 

Shr 3.13 dlrs v 2.02 dlrs Net 39.1 mln v 26.9 mln Revs 203.2 mln v 173.8 mln Reuter 

(Power Corp Canada) receive subscription 252223 share recent issue participate prefer share total proceeds 4.3 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Pacific Southwest Airlines reach agreement Southwest Crew Controllers Association need satisfy condition USAir Group's U> propose acquisition PSA. PSA third union agreement need USAir's acquisition consummated. Under agreement PSA crew controller receive assurance provide labor protective provision seniority integration process. Reuter 

Shr 32 ct v ct Net 3370000 v 353000 Revs 27.8 mln v 20.2 mln Year Shr 35 ct v 67 ct Net 3543000 v 3845000 Revs 103.6 mln v 74.8 mln Reuter 

Southwest Bancorp commence exchange offer 108710 issue outstanding share 2.50-dlr cumulative convertible prefer stock March 12. Southwest issue 11 share par value common stock exchange prefer share. Reuter 

The senior Republican U.S. Senate Agriculture Committee Richard Lugar Indiana call repeal cargo preference law aid American shipping industry hurt farmers. "Cargo preference costly special operate expense American farmer dockworkers" Lugar signing co-sponsor cargo preference repeal legislation. The law require shipment U.S. good American ship foreign vessel costly. Reuter 

Reliance Electric Co Reliance Industrial Co unit redeem April 10 outstanding 7-1/4 pct debenture due 1996 9-5/8 pct debenture due 1994. Reliance Industrial buy 7-1/4s 101 plus accrue 9-5/8s 102.344 plus accrue interest. Reliance Electric unit Exxon Corp XON> December 30 1986 investor company private leveraged buyout Reliance spokesman said. Reuter 

Shr loss 43 ct v profit eight ct Net loss 3.1 mln v profit 502896 Revs 5.6 mln v 4.2 mln NOTE:1986 net include negative effect accounting change 354650 five ct share. Reuter 

Democrats House Budget Committee meeting behind close door draft outline year's federal budget proceed snail's pace. In series interview panel concede budget panel's draft session yesterday initially expect late tomorrow extend week. "We've way go" Rep. Martin Frost (D-Tex.). told Reuters. "We make progress should" Rep. Vic Fazio (D-Calif.). Members acknowledge panel's preliminary goal spending cut revenue enable government meet 108 billion dlr deficit ceiling come federal law. Budget Commitee Chairman William Gray (D-Pa.) interviewed break lawmakers' secret deliberation committee debate shape overall budget agreement size precise form revenue spending cut pursued. But lawmaker House Democratic leadership panel package 36 billion dlrs deficit-reducing measures. The package include 18 billion dlrs revenue nine billion dlrs military spending cut nine billion dlrs domestic spending reduction said. The Democratic lawmaker try meet goal firm decisions. In particular legislator have trouble come nine billion dlrs military spending cuts. "We're talk range 15-20 billion dlrs revenue can't full amount defense cut raise revenues" Fazio said. The particular manner revenue raise decide lawmaker said. House Speaker Jim Wright (D-Texas) urge passage tax security transaction bring estimate 20 billion dlrs revenue U.S. Treasury. But administration totally oppose tax top official told Reuters yesterday. The official spoke condition identify administration oppose suggestion Wright administration delay year's cut top tax rate call recent tax overhaul law. The Congressional Democrats hint week ago seek reduce deficit 36 billion dlrs aside question whether effort meet 108 billion dlr deficit target fiscal 1988 federal balance budget law. The administration predict approval 42 billion dlrs deficit reduction meet target. Its budget plan submit January call 1.024 trillion dlrs spending revenue 916 billion dlrs. But Congressional Budget Office administration forecast base overly optimistic assumption economy. The nonpartisan office administration's budget plan adopt yield deficit 134 billion dlrs miss deficit target 26 billion dlrs and. Reuter 

Enrollment U.S. Agriculture Department's fourth conservation signup expect announce tomorrow USDA official figure high total enrollment signups. Enrollment range seven 12 mln acre USDA conservation specialist said. Total enrollment 10-year conservation 8.9 mln acres. Producers submit bid enter 11 12 mln acre Milton Hertz administrator USDA's Agricultural Stabilization Conservation Service congressional hearing yesterday. Not bid accepted Hertz enrollment expect high. As signups Great Plains expect attract great enrollment. "The Great Plains predominate we'll signup in" USDA conservation specialist said. Marginal corn acreage likely bulk acreage pull said. Fringe soybean acre southeast bean acreage midwest expect take production USDA source relatively percent total. A special dlr bonus corn producer enroll corn base acreage spark late signup USDA official said. Under USDA pay farmer annual rent land production 10 years. The average rent payment accepted signups 43.50 dlrs acre. Reuter 

Distillate fuel stock held primary storage fell 8.8 mln barrel week end March six 119.6 mln barrel Energy Information Administration (EIA) said. In weekly petroleum status report Department Energy agency gasoline stock 500000 barrel week 251.0 mln barrel refinery crude oil stock fell 1.2 mln barrel 331.8 mln. The EIA residual fuel stock fell 1.5 mln barrel 36.4 mln barrel crude oil stock Strategic Petroleum Reserve (SPR) rise 200000 barrel 516.7 mln. The total crude refine product SPR stock fell 10.3 mln barrel 1564.8 said. Reuter 

Heavy rain fell Argentina's main grain grow area week yesterday trade source said. Rains fell heaviest week particularly volume Buenos Aires province Cordoba La Pampa Santa Fe provinces. Rainfall total 20 290 mm Buenos Aires heaviest western sector province 20 145 mm La Pampa 25 120 mm Cordoba 10 75 mm Santa Fe. Rainfall lighter provinces. Rainfall total five 50 mm Corrientes five 31 mm San Luis five 30 mm Entre Rios 20 mm Misiones 11 17 mm Formosa eight mm Chaco. Growers tell whether rain damage crop maize sunflower crop suffered. Harvesting crop sorghum paralyse bad weather. For harvest resume normal rain stop soil dry allow farm machinery operate. The rain cause flood western northwestern Buenos Aires 750 mm fall area February 23 annual average 1200 mm. Flooded area total 1.2 1.5 mln hectare Buenos Aires province governor Alejandro Armendariz fly flood area. Agriculture Secretary Ernesto Figueras 500000 hectare flood plant 200000 300000 hectare lost. Growers part flood area plant low-lying flood easily. Trade source crop damage heavy rain tell exact extent damage. They likely rain combine wind uprooted sunflower maize plants. The sunflower harvest move forward centre south Cordoba Santa Fe underway isolated area northern Buenos Aires. Growers harvest 15 18 pct total plant seven nine pct week ago. Estimates total volume sunflower crop revise downward bad weather. Estimates total crop range 2.3 2.6 mln tonne 2.4 2.7 mln tonne estimate week 34.1 41.5 pct year's record harvest 4.1 mln tonnes. Maize harvest advanced reach 13 15 pct total plant compare seven nine pct week ago. The maize harvest expect total 10 10.2 mln tonne 10 10.4 mln tonne estimate week ago. Last year's maize harvest total 12.8 mln tonne accord official figures. Soybean production estimate revise downward 7.8 8.2 mln tonne compare estimate eight 8.4 mln tonne week ago. Last year's soybean harvest total 7.1 mln tonne accord official figures. Sorghum harvest move slowly forward reach six pct total plant compare pct week ago. Sorghum production estimate remain steady 3.2 3.5 mln tonne 16.7 22 pct 4.1 4.2 mln tonne produce harvest. Reuter 

Today's debt reschedule talk Philippines government bank advisory committee postpone Thursday bank consider Manila's novel proposal pay bill note instead cash banker said. The committee bank met briefly earlier decide need particular consider news report quote Reagan Administration official urge proposal serious consideration. "The bank information far consultation call for" banker said. In despatch yesterday Washington Reuters quote official say Manila's plan pay note convert equity investment Philippines fully consistent Reagan Administration strategy handle develop country debt. "The Philippine proposal interest it's quite unique I don't it's categorically reject hand" official said. Because key role U.S. play debt crisis foreign bank particular want analyze significance policymaker's comment banker said. Reuter 

An overwhelm majority Hughes Tool Co shareholder approve merger agreement Baker International Corp base revise term allow company additional sell drilling bit require U.S. Justice Department. Hughes chairman William Kistler revise term propose consent decree 10 mln dlr cap funding newly combine company spend dispute drilling bit sold. An earlier propose consent decree establish funding limit. The Baker-Hughes merger create 1.2 billion dlr oilfield service company fell earlier month Hughes balk term propose Justice Department consent decree company month buyer Reed business. Baker withdraw billion dlr lawsuit file force Hughes follow merger. Hughes' Kistler speak reporter 85 pct Hughes' shareholder approve merger revise term agreement company six month buyer Reed drilling bit business. The previous agreement propose three-month period. Kistler government indicate consider grant necessary additional three-month extension complete sale. He "several looking" domestic drilling bit business. The company Kistler decide voluntarily sell Reed plant Singapore. Kistler estimate merger complete week result annual cost saving 50 mln dlrs. He expect "substantial cutbacks" 20000-member workforce Baker-Hughes Inc name merge company take. Kistler cost saving great efficiency company profitable course. "We third fourth quarter merger close breakeven" said. In fourth quarter 1986 Hughes earn 31.7 mln dlrs sale 215.7 mln dlrs. Baker fiscal quarter end December 31 lose 34.2 mln dlrs revenue 297.7 mln dlrs. Reuter 

USX's subsidiary Marathon Petroleum Co raise contract price eleven grade crude oil 50 ct barrel effective tomorrow. The increase brings Marathon's post price West Texas Intermediate West Texas Sour grade 17.50 dlrs barrel. The Light Louisiana grade raise 50 ct 17.85 dlrs barrel. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade Baker International Corp upgraded Hughes Tool Co reflect companies' merger Baker Hughes Inc. The action affected About 840 mln dlrs debt securities. S P depressed market condition continue constrain company's operating earnings cash flow despite dominant position oil service industry. Nonetheless pro forma debt leverage 40 pct decline 35 pct proceeds asset sale S P said. Cut Baker International's senior debt A-minus A commercial paper A-2 A-1. The unit Baker International Finance NV's senior debt guaranteed Baker reduce A-minus A. S P raise Hughes Tool's senior debt A-minus B-plus subordinate debt BBB-plus B-minus commercial paper A-2 C. Reuter 

Inco Ltd expect earlier report removal Dow Jones industrial index major impact company's stock. "We don't individual institution buy share Dow Jones industrials" spokesman Ken Cherney reply query. Inco close 1-3/8 low 19-3/8 active trading Toronto Stock Exchange. Cherney stock price slide said: "I don't speculate. It appear reaction control content Dow Jones." The Wall Street Journal selects index Inco drop index representative market. Inco non-Communist world's large nickel producer member index 1928. Cherney Inco view move blow prestige. "I don't change area. We haven't factor (Dow membership) promotional material" said. Replacing Inco Owens-Illinois Inc OI> Coca-Cola Co KO> Boeing Co BA> effective tomorrow. Nickel analyst Ilmar Martens Walwyn Stodgell Cochran Murray Ltd Inco's removal index likely spark short-term sell pressure stock. "Some investor Inco suddenly 'Well it's Dow stock eliminate investment' " Martens add move unlikely serious long-term impact Inco stock. Inco struggle recent sharply low nickel prices. Its net earnings fell 200000 U.S. dlrs 1986 52.2 mln dlrs previous year. Reuter 

(Nationair) plan begin service Montreal's Mirabel airport Brussels time week unrestricted one-way fare 299 Canadian dollars. The fare rise 379 dlrs season begin June September compare regular unrestricted one-way economy fare 944 dlrs Canada's major airline Nationair said. The airline see service option travellers. Reuter 

Shr 13 ct v 40 ct Net 2509000 v 7582000 Revs 186.2 mln v 182.1 mln Year Shr 23 ct v 95 ct Net 4318000 v 17.8 mln Revs 564.8 mln v 584.4 mln Reuter 

Broad Corp acquire construction activity Vogt Conant Co Cleveland. The combine company call Broad Vogt Conant INc large structural steel erection company U.S. Combined sale operation 40 mln dlrs 1986. Reuter 

Harper Row Publishers Inc receive acquisition offer Harcourt Brace Jovanovich INc acquire Harper Row's share 50 dlrs share cash. Harper consider proposal include concern anti-trust legal considerations. On Monday Harper Row receive surprise 34 dlr-a- share bid investor Theodore Cross owner six pct share stock own. Harcourt clear offer step aside Harper's director shareholder reject bid Harper said. Harper board previously express strong determination remain independent publishing enterprise. Harper New World Pictures shareholder request copy Harper's shareholder list solicit proxies. New World 30800 share total 4.4 mln shares. Harper Row's stock close 3/4 33-1/2 rise 9-1/4 point yesterday. Shareholders due vote April 2 shareholder right plan design thwart hostile takeovers. Ivan Obolensky analyst investment banking Sterling Grace Co Harper Row remain independent publisher "back list" author stretch 200 years. He company maintains copyright estate decease author control motion picture television right stories. And printing technology edition profitable business. "Harcourt Brace need list nature willing pay it" Obolensky said. But Harper Row "has plenty beef warrant 50 dlr bid. Reuter 

The Department Transportation (DOT) ahead seven airport controversial plan reduce airline delay enable compete company coordinate schedules. Under plan DOT grant airline immunity antitrust law redistribute flight time avoid cluster flight typically occurs desirable travel times. Transportation Secretary Elizabeth Dole decide grant unconditional immunity carrier serve Atlanta's Hartsfield Chicago's O'Hare airports. At five airports--Dallas-Fort Worth Boston Denver Newark Philadelphia--Dole grant conditional immunity enable far government study. Under plan carrier serve five airport DOT summer 1987 schedule week. The agency review schedule decide Monday whether threaten cause delays. If airport add list grant wider immunity enable schedule talks. Dole confident anticompetitive effect result talk monitor U.S. official public. Flight delay nation's 22 busiest airport soar 1986 367000 295000 1985. The government believe delay cause weather. The DOT propose immunity plan late January grant total 13 airports. Dropped final plan Minneapolis-St. Paul New York-LaGuardia New York-J.F. Kennedy San Francisco St. Louis Washington-Dulles airports. Reuter 

Goldman Sachs Co told Securities Exchange Commission sell nearly entire stake First Pennsylvania Corp 2450598 share 5.2 pct total outstanding common stock. Goldman Sachs 17800 First Pennsylvania common share remaining. On February 26 company redeem convertible debenture common stock increase Goldman's stock hold total outstanding. Goldman Sachs originally bought stake arbitrage business. Marine Midland Banks MM> agreement principal acquire First Pennsylvania. Reuter 

Oper shr 1.05 dlr v 51 ct Oper net 14.1 mln v 5669000 Revs 163.2 mln v 133.2 mln Avg shrs 13.5 mln v 11.5 mln Year Oper shr 65 ct v 26 ct Oper net 8664000 v 1906000 Revs 287.8 mln v 251 mln Avg shrs 13.4 mln v 8403562 NOTE: Prior 4th qtr oper net excludes 13.1 mln dlrs 17.4 mln dlrs respectively income discontinue operations. Prior 4th qtr oper net excludes 19.2 mln dlrs 20.3 mln dlrs respectively operating loss carryforwards reogranization items. Prior 4th qtr end January 25 1986. Reuter 

U.S. oil demand measure product supply rise 1.9 pct week end March six 16.39 mln barrel 16.08 mln period ago Energy Information Administration (EIA) said. In weekly petroleum status report Energy Department agency distillate demand 2.2 pct period 3.33 mln bpd 3.40 mln earlier. Gasoline demand average 6.75 mln bpd 3.3 pct 6.53 mln residual fuel demand 1.40 mln bpd 2.7 pct 1.43 mln EIA said. Domestic crude oil production estimate 8.38 mln bpd 8.5 pct 9.15 mln ago gross daily crude import (excluding SPR) average 3.67 mln bpd 23 pct 2.97 mln EIA said. Refinery crude run week 12.05 mln bpd 1.5 pct 11.87 mln earlier said. Year-to-date figure available March 26 EIA's Petroleum Supply Monthly data January 1987 becomes available agency said. Reuter 

Shr 33 ct v 24 ct Net 6.2 mln v 4.9 mln Loans Deposits Assets 3.8 billion v Note: full name Montreal City District Savings Bank Period end January 31 Reuter 

Franco Nevada Mining Corp Ltd gain stock price related deep drilling conduct American Barrick Resources Corp Goldstrike claim Carlin camp northern Nevada. Franco Nevada stock seven dlrs share Toronto Stock Exchange. Franco Nevada American Barrick announce March nine drilling indicate significant intersection sulfide gold mineralization below depth 1000 feet. One vertical drill hole intersect gold continuously 1100 foot 1730 foot average 0.30 ounce short ton announcement said. Reuter 

The United States charge Soviet nuclear test month blew radioactive debris outside Soviet Union violation test ban treaty. The State Department charge statement give detail debris land level radioactivity measured. It Moscow told U.S. concern incident. U.S. official refuse detail fall-out say reveal intelligence gathered. The Soviet test near Siberia Kazakhstan boarder accord Swedish monitors. REUTER 

John Cotton Arizona businessman told Securities Exchange Commission acquire equivalent 213500 share Class A common share Del E. Webb Investment Properties 8.9 pct total. Cotton president Finalco Group Inc Paradise Valley Ariz. data processing equipment maker bought stake include warrant buy 186300 share 266958 dlrs. The warrant exerciseable 9.50 dlrs share said. Cotton bought stock investment purpose only. Reuter 

Shr loss nine ct v profit 22 ct Net loss 278949 v profit 346368 Revs 11.9 mln v 10.4 mln Year Shr profit 49 ct v profit 49 ct Net profit 1.2 mln v profit 949626 Revs 61.7 mln v 52.7 mln NOTE:1985 net include loss ct 49.1 mln dlrs 4th qtr loss 13 ct 258720 dlrs discontinue operations. Reuter 